
   SEP home page
   Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy
   (BUTTON) Menu
     * Browse
          + Table of Contents
          + What's New
          + Random Entry
          + Chronological
          + Archives
     * About
          + Editorial Information
          + About the SEP
          + Editorial Board
          + How to Cite the SEP
          + Special Characters
          + Advanced Tools
          + Contact
     * Support SEP
          + Support the SEP
          + PDFs for SEP Friends
          + Make a Donation
          + SEPIA for Libraries

   ____________________
   (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON) Entry Navigation
     * Entry Contents
     * Bibliography
     * Academic Tools
     * Friends PDF Preview
     * Author and Citation Info
     * Back to Top

Philosophy of Economics

   First published Fri Sep 12, 2003; substantive revision Tue Sep 4, 2018

   “Philosophy of Economics” consists of inquiries concerning (a) rational
   choice, (b) the appraisal of economic outcomes, institutions and
   processes, and (c) the ontology of economic phenomena and the
   possibilities of acquiring knowledge of them. Although these inquiries
   overlap in many ways, it is useful to divide philosophy of economics in
   this way into three subject matters which can be regarded respectively
   as branches of action theory, ethics (or normative social and political
   philosophy), and philosophy of science. Economic theories of
   rationality, welfare, and social choice defend substantive
   philosophical theses often informed by relevant philosophical
   literature and of evident interest to those interested in action
   theory, philosophical psychology, and social and political philosophy.
   Economics is of particular interest to those interested in epistemology
   and philosophy of science both because of its detailed peculiarities
   and because it possesses many of the overt features of the natural
   sciences, while its object consists of social phenomena.
     * 1. Introduction: What is Economics?
          + 1.1 The emergence of economics and of economies
          + 1.2 Contemporary economics and its several schools
     * 2. Six central methodological problems
          + 2.1 Positive versus normative economics
          + 2.2 Reasons versus causes
          + 2.3 Social scientific naturalism
          + 2.4 Abstraction, idealization, and ceteris paribus clauses in
            economics
          + 2.5 Causation in economics and econometrics
          + 2.6 Structure and strategy of economics: paradigms and
            research programmes
     * 3. Inexactness, ceteris paribus clauses, tendencies, “unrealistic
       assumptions” and models
          + 3.1 Classical economics and the method a priori
          + 3.2 Friedman and the defense of “unrealistic assumptions”
          + 3.3 Models
     * 4. Influential approaches to economic methodology
          + 4.1 Popperian approaches
          + 4.2 The rhetoric of economics
          + 4.3 “Realism” in economic methodology
          + 4.4 Economic methodology and social studies of science
          + 4.5 Case studies
     * 5. Rational choice theory
          + 5.1 Individual rationality
          + 5.2 Collective rationality and social choice
          + 5.3 Game theory
     * 6. Economics and ethics
          + 6.1 Welfare
          + 6.2 Efficiency
          + 6.3 Other directions in normative economics
     * 7. Conclusions
     * Bibliography
          + Economic methodology
          + Ethics and economics
          + Rationality
          + Other works cited
     * Academic Tools
     * Other Internet Resources
          + Websites
          + Blogs
     * Related Entries
     __________________________________________________________________

1. Introduction: What is Economics?

   Both the definition and the precise domain of economics are subjects of
   controversy within philosophy of economics. At first glance, the
   difficulties in defining economics may not appear serious. Economics
   is, after all, concerned with aspects of the production, exchange,
   distribution, and consumption of commodities and services. But this
   claim and the terms it contains are vague; and it is arguable that
   economics is relevant to a great deal more. It helps to approach the
   question, “What is economics?” historically, before turning to comments
   on contemporary features of the discipline.

1.1 The emergence of economics and of economies

   Philosophical reflection on economics is ancient, but the conception of
   the economy as a distinct object of study dates back only to the 18th
   century. Aristotle addresses some problems that most would recognize as
   pertaining to economics, mainly as problems concerning how to manage a
   household. Scholastic philosophers addressed ethical questions
   concerning economic behavior, and they condemned usury — that is, the
   taking of interest on money. With the increasing importance of trade
   and of nation-states in the early modern period, ‘mercantilist’
   philosophers and pamphleteers were largely concerned with the balance
   of trade and the regulation of the currency. There was an increasing
   recognition of the complexities of the financial management of the
   state and of the possibility that the way that the state taxed and
   acted influenced the production of wealth.

   In the early modern period, those who reflected on the sources of a
   country’s wealth recognized that the annual harvest, the quantities of
   goods manufactured, and the products of mines and fisheries depend on
   facts about nature, individual labor and enterprise, tools and what we
   would call “capital goods”, and state and social regulations. Trade
   also seemed advantageous, at least if the terms were good enough. It
   took no conceptual leap to recognize that manufacturing and farming
   could be improved and that some taxes and tariffs might be less harmful
   to productive activities than others. But to formulate the idea that
   there is such a thing as “the economy” with regularities that can be
   investigated requires a bold further step. In order for there to be an
   object of inquiry, there must be regularities in production and
   exchange; and for the inquiry to be non-trivial, these regularities
   must go beyond what is obvious to the producers, consumers, and
   exchangers themselves. Only in the eighteenth century, most clearly
   illustrated by the work of Cantillon, the physiocrats, David Hume, and
   especially Adam Smith (see the entry on Smith’s moral and political
   philosophy), does one find the idea that there are laws to be
   discovered that govern the complex set of interactions that produce and
   distribute consumption goods and the resources and tools that produce
   them (Backhouse 2002).

   Crucial to the possibility of a social object of scientific inquiry is
   the idea of tracing out the unintended consequences of the intentional
   actions of individuals. Thus, for example, Hume traces the rise in
   prices and the temporary increase in economic activity that follow an
   increase in currency to the perceptions and actions of individuals who
   first spend the additional currency (1752). In spending their
   additional gold imported from abroad, traders do not intend to increase
   the price level. But that is what they do nevertheless. Adam Smith
   expands and perfects this insight and offers a systematic Inquiry into
   the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations. From his account of the
   demise of feudalism (1776, Book II, Ch. 4) to his famous discussion of
   the invisible hand, Smith emphasizes unintended consequences. “[H]e
   intends only his own gain; and he is in this, as in many other cases,
   led by an invisible hand to promote an end which was no part of his
   intention. Nor is it always the worse for the society that it was no
   part of it. By pursuing his own interest, he frequently promotes that
   of the society more effectually than when he really intends to promote
   it” (1776, Book IV, Ch. 2). The existence of regularities, which are
   the unintended consequences of individual choices gives rise to an
   object of scientific investigation.

   One can distinguish the domain of economics from the domain of other
   social scientific inquiries either by specifying some set of causal
   factors or by specifying some range of phenomena. The phenomena with
   which economists are concerned are production, consumption,
   distribution and exchange—particularly via markets. But since so many
   different causal factors are relevant to these, including the laws of
   thermodynamics, metallurgy, geography and social norms, even the laws
   governing digestion, economics cannot be distinguished from other
   inquiries only by the phenomena it studies. Some reference to a set of
   central causal factors is needed. Thus, for example, John Stuart Mill
   maintained that, “Political economy…[is concerned with] such of the
   phenomena of the social state as take place in consequence of the
   pursuit of wealth. It makes entire abstraction of every other human
   passion or motive, except those which may be regarded as perpetually
   antagonising principles to the desire of wealth, namely aversion to
   labour, and desire of the present enjoyment of costly indulgences.”
   (1843, Book VI, Chapter 9, Section 3) In Mill’s view, economics is
   mainly concerned with the consequences of individual pursuit of
   tangible wealth, though it takes some account of less significant
   motives such as aversion to labor.

   Mill takes it for granted that individuals act rationally in their
   pursuit of wealth and luxury and avoidance of labor, rather than in a
   disjointed or erratic way, but he has no theory of consumption, or
   explicit theory of rational economic choice, and his theory of resource
   allocation is rather thin. These gaps were gradually filled during the
   so-called neoclassical or marginalist revolution, which linked choice
   of some object of consumption (and its price) not to its total utility
   but to its marginal utility. For example, water is obviously extremely
   useful, but in much of the world it is plentiful enough that another
   glass more or less matters little to an agent. So water is cheap. Early
   “neoclassical” economists such as William Stanley Jevons held that
   agents make consumption choices so as to maximize their own happiness
   (1871). This implies that they distribute their expenditures so that a
   dollar’s worth of water or porridge or upholstery makes the same
   contribution to their happiness. The “marginal utility” of a dollar’s
   worth of each good is the same.

   In the Twentieth Century, economists stripped this theory of its
   hedonistic clothing (Pareto 1909, Hicks and Allen 1934). Rather than
   supposing that all consumption choices can be ranked by how much they
   promote an agent’s happiness, economists focused on the ranking itself.
   All that they suppose concerning evaluations is that agents are able
   consistently to rank the alternatives they face. This is equivalent to
   supposing first that rankings are complete — that is, for any two
   alternatives x and y that the agent considers, either the agent ranks x
   above y (prefers x to y), or the agent prefers y to x, or the agent is
   indifferent. Second, economists suppose that agent’s rankings of
   alternatives (preferences) are transitive. To say that an agent’s
   preferences are transitive is to claim that if the agent prefers x to y
   and y to z, then the agent prefers x to z, with similar claims
   concerning indifference and combinations of indifference and
   preference. Though there are further technical conditions to extend the
   theory to infinite sets of alternatives and to capture further
   plausible rationality conditions concerning gambles, economists
   generally subscribe to a view of rational agents as at least possessing
   complete and transitive preferences and as choosing among the feasible
   alternatives whichever they most prefer. In the theory of revealed
   preference, economists have attempted unsuccessfully to eliminate all
   reference to subjective preference or to define preference in terms of
   choices (Samuelson 1947, Houtthaker 1950, Little 1957, Sen 1971, 1973,
   Hausman 2012, chapter 3).

   In clarifying the view of rationality that characterizes economic
   agents, economists have for the most part continued to distinguish
   economics from other social inquiries by the content of the motives or
   preferences with which it is concerned. So even though people may seek
   happiness through asceticism, or they may rationally prefer to
   sacrifice all their worldly goods to a political cause, economists have
   supposed that such preferences are rare and unimportant to economics.
   Economists are concerned with the phenomena deriving from rationality
   coupled with a desire for wealth and for larger bundles of goods and
   services.

   Economists have flirted with a less substantive characterization of
   individual motivation and with a more expansive view of the domain of
   economics. In his influential monograph, An Essay on the Nature and
   Significance of Economic Science, Lionel Robbins defined economics as
   “the science which studies human behavior as a relationship between
   ends and scarce means which have alternative uses” (1932, p. 15).
   According to Robbins, economics is not concerned with production,
   exchange, distribution, or consumption as such. It is instead concerned
   with an aspect of all human action. Robbins’ definition helps one to
   understand efforts to apply economic concepts, models, and techniques
   to other subject matters such as the analysis of voting behavior and
   legislation, even as economics maintains its connection to a
   traditional domain.

1.2 Contemporary economics and its several schools

   Contemporary economics is diverse. There are many schools and many
   branches. Even so-called “orthodox” or “mainstream” economics has many
   variants. Some mainstream economics is highly theoretical, though most
   of it is applied and relies on rudimentary theory. Theoretical and
   applied work can be distinguished as microeconomics or macroeconomics.
   There is also a third branch, econometrics which is devoted to the
   empirical estimation, elaboration, and to some extent testing of
   microeconomic and macroeconomic models (but see Summers 1991 and Hoover
   1994).

   Microeconomics focuses on relations among individuals (with firms and
   households frequently counting as honorary individuals and little said
   about the idiosyncrasies of the demand of particular individuals).
   Individuals have complete and transitive preferences that govern their
   choices. Consumers prefer more commodities to fewer and have
   “diminishing marginal rates of substitution” — i. e. they will pay less
   for units of a commodity when they already have lots of it than when
   they have little of it. Firms attempt to maximize profits in the face
   of diminishing returns: holding fixed all the inputs into production
   except one, output increases when there is more of the remaining input,
   but at a diminishing rate. Economists idealize and suppose that in
   competitive markets, firms and individuals cannot influence prices, but
   economists are also interested in strategic interactions, in which the
   rational choices of separate individuals are interdependent. Game
   theory, which is devoted to the study of strategic interactions, is of
   growing importance in economics. Economists model the outcome of the
   profit-maximizing activities of firms and the attempts of consumers
   optimally to satisfy their preferences as an equilibrium in which there
   is no excess demand on any market. What this means is that anyone who
   wants to buy anything at the going market price is able to do so. There
   is no excess demand, and unless a good is free, there is no excess
   supply.

   Macroeconomics grapples with the relations among economic aggregates,
   such as relations between the money supply and the rate of interest or
   the rate of growth, focusing especially on problems concerning the
   business cycle and the influence of monetary and fiscal policy on
   economic outcomes. Many mainstream economists would like to unify
   macroeconomics and microeconomics, but few economists are satisfied
   with the attempts that have been made to do so, especially via so
   called “representative agents” (Kirman 1992, Hoover 2001a).
   Macroeconomics is immediately relevant to economic policy and hence
   (and unsurprisingly) subject to much more heated (and
   politically-charged) controversy than microeconomics or econometrics.
   Schools of macroeconomics include Keynesians (and “new-Keynesians”),
   monetarists, “new classical economics” (rational expectations theory —
   Begg 1982, Carter and Maddock 1984, Hoover 1988, Minford and Peel
   1983), and “real business cycle” theories (Kydland and Prescott 1991,
   1994; Sent 1998).

   Branches of mainstream economics are also devoted to specific questions
   concerning growth, finance, employment, agriculture, housing, natural
   resources, international trade, and so forth. Within orthodox
   economics, there are also many different approaches, such as agency
   theory (Jensen and Meckling 1976, Fama 1980), the Chicago school
   (Becker 1976), or public choice theory (Brennan and Buchanan 1985,
   Buchanan 1975). These address questions concerning incentives within
   firms and families and the ways that institutions guide choices.

   Although mainstream economics is dominant and demands the most
   attention, there are many other schools. Austrian economists accept
   orthodox views of choices and constraints, but they emphasize
   uncertainty and question whether one should regard outcomes as
   equilibria, and they are skeptical about the value of mathematical
   modeling (Buchanan and Vanberg 1989, Dolan 1976, Kirzner 1976, Mises
   1949, 1978, 1981, Rothbard 1957, Wiseman 1983, Boettke 2010, Holcombe
   2014, Nell 2014a, 2014b, 2017, Boettke and Coyne 2015, Hagedorn 2015,
   Horwitz 2015, Dekker 2016, Linsbichler 2017 ).

   Traditional institutionalist economists question the value of abstract
   general theorizing and emphasize evolutionary concepts (Dugger 1979,
   Wilber and Harrison 1978, Wisman and Rozansky 1991, Hodgson 2000, 2013,
   2016, Hodgson and Knudsen 2010, Delorme 2010, Richter 2015). They
   emphasize the importance of generalizations concerning norms and
   behavior within particular institutions. Applied work in institutional
   economics is sometimes very similar to applied orthodox economics. More
   recent work in economics, which is also called institutionalist,
   attempts to explain features of institutions by emphasizing the costs
   of transactions, the inevitable incompleteness of contracts, and the
   problems “principals” face in monitoring and directing their agents
   (Coase 1937; Williamson 1985; Mäki et al. 1993, North 1990; Brousseau
   and Glachant 2008).

   Marxian and socialist economists traditionally articulated and
   developed Karl Marx’s economic theories, but recently many socialist
   economists have revised traditional Marxian concepts and themes with
   tools borrowed from orthodox economic theory (Morishima 1973, Roemer
   1981, 1982, Bowles 2012, Piketty 2014, Lebowitz 2015, Auerbach 2016,
   Beckert 2016, Jacobs and Mazzucato 2016).

   There are also socio-economists, who are concerned with the norms that
   govern choices (Etzioni 1988, 2018), behavioral economists, who study
   the nitty-gritty of choice behavior (Winter 1962, Thaler 1994, Ben Ner
   and Putterman 1998, Kahneman and Tversky 2000, Camerer 2003, Camerer
   and Loewenstein 2003, Camerer et al. 2003, Loewenstein 2008, Thaler and
   Sunstein 2008, Saint-Paul 2011, Oliver 2013), post-Keynesians, who look
   to Keynes’s work and especially his emphasis on demand (Dow 1985,
   Kregel 1976, Harcourt and Kriesler 2013 Rochon and Rossi 2017),
   evolutionary economists, who emphasize the importance of institutions
   (Witt 2008, Hodgson and Knudsen 2010, Vromen 2009, Hodgson 2013, 2016,
   Carsten 2013, Dopfer and Potts 2014, Wilson and Kirman 2016),
   neo-Ricardians, who emphasize relations among economic classes (Sraffa
   1960, Pasinetti 1981, Roncaglia 1978), and even neuroeconomists, who
   study neurological concomitants of choice behavior (Camerer 2007,
   Camerer et al. 2005, Camerer et al. 2008, Glimcher et al. 2008,
   Loewenstein et al. 2008, Rusticinni 2005, 2008, Glimcher 2010).
   Economics is not one homogeneous enterprise.

2. Six central methodological problems

   Although the different branches and schools of economics raise a wide
   variety of epistemological and ontological issues concerning economics,
   six problems have been central to methodological reflection (in this
   philosophical sense) concerning economics:

2.1 Positive versus normative economics

   Policy makers look to economics to guide policy, and it seems
   inevitable that even the most esoteric issues in theoretical economics
   may bear on some people’s material interests. The extent to which
   economics bears on and may be influenced by normative concerns raises
   methodological questions about the relationships between a positive
   science concerning “facts” and a normative inquiry into values and what
   ought to be. Most economists and methodologists believe that there is a
   reasonably clear distinction between facts and values, between what is
   and what ought to be, and they believe that most of economics should be
   regarded as a positive science that helps policy makers choose means to
   accomplish their ends, though it does not bear on the choice of ends
   itself.

   This view is questionable for several reasons (Mongin 2006, Hausman,
   McPherson, and Satz 2017). First, economists have to interpret and
   articulate the incomplete specifications of goals and constraints
   provided by policy makers (Machlup 1969b). Second, economic “science”
   is a human activity, and like all human activities, it is governed by
   values. Those values need not be the same as the values that influence
   economic policy, but it is debatable whether the values that govern the
   activity of economists can be sharply distinguished from the values
   that govern policy makers. Third, much of economics is built around a
   normative theory of rationality. One can question whether the values
   implicit in such theories are sharply distinguishable from the values
   that govern policies. For example, it may be difficult to hold a
   maximizing view of individual rationality, while at the same time
   insisting that social policy should resist maximizing growth, wealth,
   or welfare in the name of freedom, rights, or equality. Fourth,
   people’s views of what is right and wrong are, as a matter of fact,
   influenced by their beliefs about how people in fact behave. There is
   evidence that studying theories that depict individuals as
   self-interested leads people to regard self-interested behavior more
   favorably and to become more self-interested (Marwell and Ames 1981,
   Frank et al. 1993). Finally, people’s judgments are clouded by their
   interests. Since economic theories bear so centrally on people’s
   interests, there are bound to be ideological biases at work in the
   discipline (Marx 1867, Preface). Positive and normative are especially
   interlinked within economics, because economists are not all
   researchers and teachers. In addition, economists work as commentators
   and as it were “hired guns” whose salaries depend on arriving at the
   conclusions their employers want. The bitter polemics concerning
   macroeconomic policy responses to the great recession beginning in 2008
   testify to the influence of ideology.

2.2 Reasons versus causes

   Orthodox theoretical microeconomics is as much a theory of rational
   choices as it a theory that explains and predicts economic outcomes.
   Since virtually all economic theories that discuss individual choices
   take individuals as acting for reasons, and thus in some way rational,
   questions about the role that views of rationality and reasons should
   play in economics are of general importance. Economists are typically
   concerned with the aggregate results of individual choices rather than
   with the actions of particular individuals, but their theories in fact
   offer both causal explanations for why individuals choose as they do
   and accounts of the reasons for their choices. See also the entries on
   methodological individualism and reasons for action: justification,
   motivation, explanation.

   Explanations in terms of reasons have several features that distinguish
   them from explanations in terms of causes. Reasons purport to justify
   the actions they explain, and indeed so called “external reasons”
   (Williams 1981) only justify action, without purporting to explain it.
   Reasons can be evaluated, and they are responsive to criticism.
   Reasons, unlike causes, must be intelligible to those for whom they are
   reasons. On grounds such as these, many philosophers have questioned
   whether explanations of human action can be causal explanations (von
   Wright 1971, Winch 1958). Yet merely giving a reason — even an
   extremely good reason — fails to explain an agent’s action, if the
   reason was not in fact “effective.” Someone might, for example, start
   attending church regularly and give as his reason a concern with
   salvation. But others might suspect that this agent is deceiving
   himself and that the minister’s attractive daughter is in fact
   responsible for his renewed interest in religion. Donald Davidson
   (1963) argued that what distinguishes the reasons that explain an
   action from the reasons that fail to explain it is that the former are
   also causes of the action. Although the account of rationality within
   economics differs in some ways from the folk psychology people tacitly
   invoke in everyday explanations of actions, many of the same questions
   carry over (Rosenberg 1976, ch. 5; 1980, Hausman 2012).

   An additional difference between explanations in terms of reasons and
   explanations in terms of causes, which some economists have emphasized,
   is that the beliefs and preferences that explain actions may depend on
   mistakes and ignorance (Knight 1935). As a first approximation,
   economists can abstract from such difficulties caused by the
   intentionality of belief and desire. They thus often assume that people
   have perfect information about all the relevant facts. In that way
   theorists need not worry about what people’s beliefs are. (If people
   have perfect information, then they believe and expect whatever the
   facts are.) But once one goes beyond this first approximation,
   difficulties arise which have no parallel in the natural sciences.
   Choice depends on how things look “from the inside”, which may be very
   different from the actual state of affairs. Consider for example the
   stock market. The “true” value of a stock depends on the future profits
   of the company, which are of course uncertain. In 2006 house prices in
   the U.S. were extremely inflated. But whether they were “too high”
   depended at least in the short run, on what people believe. They were
   excellent investments if one could sell them to others who would be
   willing to pay even more for them. Economists disagree about how
   significant this subjectivity is. Members of the Austrian school argue
   that these differences are of great importance and sharply distinguish
   theorizing about economics from theorizing about any of the natural
   sciences (Buchanan and Vanberg 1989, von Mises 1981).

2.3 Social scientific naturalism

   Of all the social sciences, economics most closely resembles the
   natural sciences. Economic theories have been axiomatized, and articles
   and books of economics are full of theorems. Of all the social
   sciences, only economics boasts an ersatz Nobel Prize. Economics is
   thus a test case for those concerned with the extent of the
   similarities between the natural and social sciences. Those who have
   wondered whether social sciences must differ fundamentally from the
   natural sciences seem to have been concerned mainly with three
   questions:

   (i) Are there fundamental differences between the structure or concepts
   of theories and explanations in the natural and social sciences? Some
   of these issues were already mentioned in the discussion above of
   reasons versus causes.

   (ii) Are there fundamental differences in goals? Philosophers and
   economists have argued that in addition to or instead of the predictive
   and explanatory goals of the natural sciences, the social sciences
   should aim at providing us with understanding. Weber and others have
   argued that the social sciences should provide us with an understanding
   “from the inside”, that we should be able to empathize with the
   reactions of the agents and to find what happens “understandable”
   (Weber 1904, Knight 1935, Machlup 1969a). This (and the closely related
   recognition that explanations cite reasons rather than just causes)
   seems to introduce an element of subjectivity into the social sciences
   that is not found in the natural sciences.

   (iii) Owing to the importance of human choices (or perhaps free will),
   are social phenomena too irregular to be captured within a framework of
   laws and theories? Given human free will, perhaps human behavior is
   intrinsically unpredictable and not subject to any laws. But there are,
   in fact, many regularities in human action, and given the enormous
   causal complexity characterizing some natural systems, the natural
   sciences must cope with many irregularities, too.

2.4 Abstraction, idealization, and ceteris paribus clauses in economics

   Economics raises questions concerning the legitimacy of severe
   abstraction and idealization. For example, mainstream economic models
   often stipulate that everyone is perfectly rational and has perfect
   information or that commodities are infinitely divisible. Such claims
   are exaggerations, and they are clearly false. Other schools of
   economics may not employ idealizations that are this extreme, but there
   is no way to do economics if one is not willing to simplify drastically
   and abstract from many complications. How much simplification,
   idealization, abstraction or “isolation” (Mäki 2006) is legitimate?

   In addition, because economists attempt to study economic phenomena as
   constituting a separate domain, influenced only by a small number of
   causal factors, the claims of economics are true only ceteris paribus —
   that is, they are true only if there are no interferences or disturbing
   causes. What are ceteris paribus clauses, and when if ever are they
   legitimate in science? Questions concerning ceteris paribus clauses are
   closely related to questions concerning simplifications and
   idealizations, since one way to simplify is to suppose that the various
   disturbing causes or interferences are inactive and to explore the
   consequences of some small number of causal factors. These issues and
   the related question of how well supported economics is by the evidence
   have been the central questions in economic methodology. They will be
   discussed further below mainly in Section 3.

2.5 Causation in economics and econometrics

   Many important generalizations in economics are causal claims. For
   example, the law of demand asserts that a price increase will (ceteris
   paribus) diminish the quantity demanded. (It does not merely assert an
   inverse relationship between price and demand. When demand increases
   for some other reason, such as a change in tastes, price increases.)
   Econometricians have also been deeply concerned with the possibilities
   of determining causal relations from statistical evidence and with the
   relevance of causal relations to the possibility of consistent
   estimation of parameter values. Since concerns about the consequences
   of alternative policies are so central to economics, causal inquiry is
   unavoidable.

   Before the 1930s, economists were generally willing to use causal
   language explicitly and literally, despite some concerns that there
   might be a conflict between causal analysis of economic changes and
   “comparative statics” treatments of equilibrium states. Some economists
   were also worried that thinking in terms of causes was not compatible
   with recognizing the multiplicity and mutuality of determination in
   economic equilibrium. In the anti-metaphysical intellectual environment
   of the 1930s and 1940s (of which logical positivism was at least
   symptomatic), any mention of causation became suspicious, and
   economists commonly pretended to avoid causal concepts. The consequence
   was that they ceased to reflect carefully on the causal concepts that
   they continued implicitly to invoke (Hausman 1983, 1990, Helm 1984,
   Runde 1998). For example, rather than formulating the law of demand in
   terms of the causal consequences of price changes for quantity
   demanded, economists tried to confine themselves to discussing the
   mathematical function relating price and quantity demanded. There were
   important exceptions (Haavelmo 1944, Simon 1953, Wold 1954), and during
   the past generation, this state of affairs has changed dramatically.

   For example, in his Causality in Macroeconomics (2001b) Kevin Hoover
   develops feasible methods for investigating large scale causal
   questions, such as whether changes in the money supply (M) cause
   changes in the rate of inflation P or accommodate changes in P that are
   otherwise caused. If changes in M cause changes in P, then the
   conditional distribution of P on M should remain stable with exogenous
   changes in M, but should change with exogenous changes in P. Hoover
   argues that historical investigation, backed by statistical inquiry,
   can justify the conclusion that some particular changes in M or P have
   been exogenous. One can then determine the causal direction by
   examining the stability of the conditional distributions.
   Econometricians have made vital contributions to the contemporary
   revival of philosophical interest in the notion of causation. In
   addition to Hoover’s work, see for example Geweke (1982), Granger
   (1969, 1980), Cartwright (1989), Sims (1977), Zellner and Aigner
   (1988), Pearl (2000), Spirtes, Glymour and Scheines (2001).

   One relatively secure way to determine causal relations is via
   randomized controlled experiments. If the experimenters sort subjects
   randomly into experimental and control groups and vary just one factor,
   then, unless by bad luck the two groups differ in some unknown way,
   changes in the outcomes given the common features of the control and
   treatment groups should be due to the difference in the one factor.
   Indeed, in the case of quantitative variables, one can calculate
   average causal effects (Deaton 2010). This makes randomized controlled
   trials very attractive, though no panacea, since the treatment and
   control groups may not be representative of the population in which
   policy-makers hope to apply the causal conclusions, and the causal
   consequences of the intervention might differ across different
   subgroups within the control and treatment groups (Worrall 2007,
   Cartwright and Hardie 2013).

   For both practical and ethical reasons, it is often hard to experiment
   in economics (though, as discussed in section 4.5, far from
   impossible). But with some ingenuity and with far greater enthusiasm
   for experimentation than had been the case previously, economists are
   experimenting much more frequently both in the laboratory and in the
   field. In addition, as a substitute for experimentation, or as a way of
   stretching the limits on experimentation, economists in recent years
   have become very enthusiastic about so-called “instrumental variable”
   techniques. For example, merely examining the correlation between
   economic growth and development aid, even controlling for other factors
   known to influence economic growth is unlikely to reveal the causal
   influence of aid on growth, because aid may reciprocally depend on
   growth and well as many factors that are hard to measure that also
   influence growth. These problems can be to some extent circumvented if
   economists can find an “instrumental” variable x upon which aid depends
   that influences growth (if at all) only by its influence on aid and
   which is probabilistically independent of all other determinants of
   growth. In that case, one can use the effect of x on growth to estimate
   the effect of aid on growth. Instrumental variable techniques, policy
   experimentation, and reliance on “natural experiments” have become
   widespread, though they bring with them new problems extrapolating
   experimental results to the target population (Deaton 2010; Cartwright
   and Hardie 2013).

2.6 Structure and strategy of economics: paradigms and research programmes

   In the wake of the work of Kuhn (1970) and Lakatos (1970), philosophers
   are much more aware of and interested in the larger theoretical
   structures that unify and guide research within particular research
   traditions. Since many theoretical projects or approaches in economics
   are systematically unified, they pose questions about what guides
   research, and many economists have applied the work of Kuhn or Lakatos
   in the attempt to shed light on the overall structure of economics
   (Baumberg 1977, Blaug 1976, de Marchi and Blaug 1991, Bronfenbrenner
   1971, Coats 1969, Dillard 1978, Hands 1985b, Hausman 1992, ch. 6,
   Hutchison 1978, Latsis 1976, Jalladeau 1978, Kunin and Weaver 1971,
   Stanfield 1974, Weintraub 1985, Worland 1972). Whether these
   applications have been successful is controversial, but the comparison
   of the structure of economics to Kuhn’s and Lakatos’ schema served to
   highlight distinctive features of economics and may have contributed to
   some of the changes that economics has undergone. For example, asking
   what the “positive heuristic” of mainstream economics consists in
   permits one to see that mainstream theoretical models typically
   attempted to demonstrate that an economic equilibrium will obtain, and
   thus that mainstream models were unified in more than just their common
   assumptions. Since the success of research projects in economics is
   controversial, understanding their global structure and strategy helped
   to clarify their drawbacks as well as their advantages.

3. Inexactness, ceteris paribus clauses, tendencies, “unrealistic
assumptions” and models

   As mentioned in the previous section, the most important methodological
   issue concerning economics involves the very considerable
   simplification, idealization, and abstraction that characterizes
   economic theory and the consequent doubts these features of economics
   raise concerning whether economics is well supported. Claims such as,
   “Agents prefer larger commodity bundles to smaller commodity bundles,”
   raise serious questions, because if they are interpreted as universal
   generalizations, they are false; and philosophy of science has
   traditionally supposed that science is devoted to the discovery of
   genuine laws—that is, true universal generalizations. Even though it is
   false that everyone always prefers larger commodity bundles to smaller,
   the generalization seems informative and useful. Can a science rest on
   false generalizations? If these claims are not universal
   generalizations, then what is their logical form? And how can claims
   that appear in this way to be false or approximate be tested and
   confirmed or disconfirmed? These problems have bedeviled economists and
   economic methodologists from the first methodological reflections to
   the present day.

3.1 Classical economics and the method a priori

   The first extended reflections on economic methodology appear in the
   work of Nassau Senior (1836) and John Stuart Mill (1836). Their essays
   must be understood against the background of both the economic theory
   and the philosophy of science of their times. Like Smith’s economics
   (to which it owed a great deal) and modern economics, the “classical”
   economics of the middle decades of the 19th century traced economic
   regularities to the choices of individuals facing social and natural
   constraints. But, as compared to Smith, more reliance was placed on
   severely simplified models. David Ricardo’s Principles of Political
   Economy (1817), draws a portrait in which wages above the subsistence
   level lead to increases in the population, which in turn require more
   intensive agriculture or cultivation of inferior land. The extension of
   cultivation leads to lower profits and higher rents; and the whole tale
   of economic development leads to a gloomy stationary state in which
   profits are too low to command any net investment, wages slide back to
   subsistence levels, and only the landlords are affluent.

   Fortunately for the world, but unfortunately for economic theorists of
   the mid 19th century, the data consistently contradicted the trends the
   theory predicted (de Marchi 1970). Yet the theory continued to hold
   sway for more than half a century, and the consistently unfavorable
   data were explained away as due to various “disturbing causes.” It is
   consequently not surprising that Senior’s and Mill’s accounts of the
   method of economics emphasize the relative autonomy of theory.

   Mill distinguishes between two main kinds of inductive methods. The
   method a posteriori is a method of direct experience. In his view, it
   is only suitable for phenomena in which few causal factors are
   operating or in which experimental controls are possible. Mill’s famous
   methods of induction provide an articulation of the method a
   posteriori. In his method of difference, for example, one holds fixed
   every causal factor except one and checks to see whether the effect
   ceases to obtain when that one factor is removed. The goal is to
   identify exceptionless causal laws.

   Mill maintains that direct inductive methods cannot be used to study
   phenomena in which many causal factors are in play. If, for example,
   one attempts to investigate whether tariffs enhance or impede
   prosperity by comparing the prosperity of nations with high tariffs and
   nations without high tariffs, the results will be uninformative,
   because prosperity depends on so many other causal factors. So, Mill
   argues, one needs instead to employ the method a priori. Despite its
   name, this too is an inductive method. However, unlike the method a
   posteriori, the method a priori is an indirect inductive method.
   Scientists first determine the laws governing individual causal factors
   in domains in which Mill’s methods of induction are applicable. Having
   then determined the laws of the individual causes, they investigate
   their combined consequences deductively. Finally, there is a role for
   “verification” of the combined consequences, but owing to the causal
   complications, this testing has comparatively little weight. The
   testing of the conclusions serves only as a check on the scientist’s
   deductions and as an indicator of whether there are significant
   disturbing causes that scientists have not yet accounted for.

   Mill gives the example of the science of the tides. Physicists
   determined the law of gravitation by studying planetary motion, in
   which gravity is the only significant causal factor. Then physicists
   develop the theory of tides deductively from that law and information
   concerning the positions and motions of the moon and sun. The
   implications of the theory will be inexact and sometimes badly
   mistaken, because many subsidiary causal factors influence tides.
   Testing theories of tides can uncover mistakes in the deductions
   physicists made, and it may uncover evidence concerning the role of the
   subsidiary factors. But because of the causal complexity, such testing
   does little to confirm or disconfirm the law of gravitation, which has
   already been established. Although Mill does not often use the language
   of “ceteris paribus”, his view that the principles or “laws” of
   economics hold in the absence of “interferences” or “disturbing causes”
   provides an account of how the principles of economics can be true
   ceteris paribus (Hausman 1992, ch. 8, 12).

   Because economic theory includes only the most important causes and
   necessarily ignores minor causes, its claims, like claims concerning
   tides, are inexact. Its predictions will be imprecise, and sometimes
   far off. Mill maintains that it is nevertheless possible to develop and
   confirm economic theory by studying in simpler domains the laws
   governing the major causal factors and then deducing their consequences
   in more complicated circumstances. For example, the statistical data
   are ambiguous concerning the relationship between minimum wages and
   unemployment of unskilled workers; and since the minimum wage has never
   been extremely high, there are no data about what unemployment would be
   in those circumstances. On the other hand, everyday experience teaches
   economists that firms can choose among more or less labor-intensive
   processes and that a high minimum wage will make more labor-intensive
   processes more expensive. On the assumption that firms try to keep
   their costs down, economists have good (though not conclusive) reason
   to believe that a high minimum wage will increase unemployment.

   In defending a view of economics as in this way inexact and employing
   the method a priori, Mill thought he was able to reconcile his
   empiricism and his commitment to Ricardo’s economics. Although Mill’s
   views on economic methodology were challenged later in the nineteenth
   century by economists who believed that theory was too remote from the
   contingencies of policy and history (Roscher 1874, Schmoller 1888,
   1898), Mill’s methodological views dominated the mainstream of economic
   theory for a century (for example, Cairnes 1875). Mill’s vision
   survived the so-called neoclassical revolution in economics beginning
   in the 1870s and is clearly discernible in the most important
   methodological treatises concerning neoclassical economics, such as
   John Neville Keynes’ The Scope and Method of Political Economy (1891)
   or Lionel Robbins’ An Essay on the Nature and Significance of Economic
   Science (1932). Hausman (1992) argues that current methodological
   practice closely resembles Mill’s methodology, despite the fact that
   few economists explicitly defend it.

   Although this way of interpreting Mill and the methodology of economics
   is coherent and conforms to an old-fashioned empiricist philosophy of
   science that finds the nomological force of generalizations in their
   universality, it is not faithful to the way in which economists see
   their theories. Rather than regarding generalizations such as
   acquisitiveness as universal laws carrying implicit ceteris paribus
   qualifications in their antecedents, economists are much more likely to
   regard these generalizations as “tendencies” that continue to operate
   even when defeated by interferences and that need to be studied
   separately (Woodward 2003). Even Mill speaks of tendencies, though
   without reconciling his talk of tendencies with his empiricism. If one
   sets aside metaphysical qualms about tendencies and counterfactuals,
   the most natural way to see economic theorizing is as the
   counterfactual investigation of combinations of tendencies. As the
   discussion below of models confirms, such views are congenial to
   economists and puzzling to philosophers with empiricist scruples.

   Conceptualizing of economic inquiry as the study of models and
   tendencies, seems to shift the terms of the problems posed by
   inexactness rather than to offer a solution. Julian Reiss has, in
   effect, rediscovered the problem in an influential essay, “The
   Explanation Paradox.” (2013), where he argues that the following three
   propositions are inconsistent: (1) Economic models are false. (2)
   Economic models are explanatory. (3) Explanation requires truth.The
   formulation is a bit obscure, since models are not single sentences or
   propositions that can be true or false, but it should be clear that
   Reiss’s putative paradox is a reformulation of the problem posed by the
   inexactness of economic theories or models.

3.2 Friedman and the defense of “unrealistic assumptions”

   Although some contemporary philosophers have argued that Mill’s method
   a priori is largely defensible (Bhaskar 1975, Cartwright 1989, and
   Hausman 1992), by the middle of the Twentieth Century Mill’s views
   appeared to many economists out of step with their understanding of
   contemporary philosophy of science. Without studying Mill’s text
   carefully, it was easy for economists to misunderstand his terminology
   and to regard his method a priori as opposed to empiricism. Others took
   seriously Mill’s view that the basic principles of economics should be
   empirically established and found evidence to cast doubt on some of the
   basic principles, particularly the view that firms attempt to maximize
   profits (Hall and Hitch 1938, Lester 1946, 1947). Methodologists who
   were well-informed about contemporary developments in philosophy of
   science, such as Terence Hutchison (1938), denounced “pure theory” in
   economics as unscientific.

   Philosophically reflective economists proposed several ways to replace
   the old-fashioned Millian view with a more up-to-date methodology that
   would continue to justify much of current practice (see particularly
   Machlup 1955, 1960 and Koopmans 1957). By far the most influential of
   these efforts was Milton Friedman’s 1953 essay, “The Methodology of
   Positive Economics.” This essay has had an enormous influence, far more
   than any other work on methodology.

   Friedman begins his essay by distinguishing in a conventional way
   between positive and normative economics and conjecturing that policy
   disputes are typically really disputes about the consequences of
   alternatives and can thus be resolved by progress in positive
   economics. Turning to positive economics, Friedman asserts (without
   argument) that correct prediction concerning phenomena not yet observed
   is the ultimate goal of all positive sciences. He holds a practical
   view of science and finds the value of science in predictions that will
   guide policy.

   Since it is difficult and often impossible to carry out experiments and
   since the uncontrolled phenomena economists observe are difficult to
   interpret (owing to the same causal complexity that bothered Mill), it
   is hard to judge whether a particular theory is a good basis for
   predictions or not. Tendencies are not universal laws. A claim such as
   “firms attempt to maximize profits” will be “unrealistic” in the sense
   that it is not a true universal generalization. Although not in these
   terms, Friedman objects to criticisms of tendencies that in effect
   complain that they are merely tendencies, rather than universal laws.
   If his criticism stopped there, it would be sensible, although it would
   avoid the problems of understanding and appraising claims about
   tendencies.

   But Friedman draws a much more radical conclusion. In his terminology,
   the mistake economists make who criticize claims such as “firms attempt
   to maximize profits” lies in the attempt to test theories by the
   “realism” of their “assumptions” rather than by the accuracy of their
   predictions. He maintains that the realism of a theory’s assumptions is
   irrelevant to its predictive value. It does not matter whether the
   assumption that firms maximize profits is realistic. Theories should be
   appraised exclusively in terms of the accuracy of their predictions.
   What matters is exclusively whether the theory of the firm makes
   correct and significant predictions.

   As critics have pointed out (and almost all commentators have been
   critical), Friedman refers to several different things as “assumptions”
   of a theory and means several different things by speaking of
   assumptions as “unrealistic” (Brunner 1969). Since Friedman aims his
   criticism to those who investigate empirically whether firms in fact
   attempt to maximize profits, he must take “assumptions” to include
   central economic generalizations, such as “Firms attempt to maximize
   profits,” and by “unrealistic,” he must mean, among other things,
   “false.” In arguing that it is a mistake to appraise theories in terms
   of the realism of assumptions, Friedman is arguing at least that it is
   a mistake to appraise theories by investigating whether their central
   generalizations are true or false.

   It would seem that this interpretation would render Friedman’s views
   inconsistent, because in testing whether firms attempt to maximize
   profits, one is checking whether predictions of theory concerning the
   behavior of firms are true or false. An “assumption” such as “firms
   maximize profits” is itself a prediction. But there is a further
   wrinkle. Friedman is not concerned with every prediction of economic
   theories. In Friedman’s view, “theory is to be judged by its predictive
   power exclusively for the class of phenomena which it is intended to
   explain” (1953, p. 8 [italics added]). Economists are interested in
   only some of the implications of economic theories. Other predictions,
   such as those concerning the results of surveys of managers, are
   irrelevant to policy. What matters is whether economic theories are
   successful at predicting the phenomena that economists are interested
   in. In other words, Friedman believes that economic theories should be
   appraised in terms of their predictions concerning prices and
   quantities exchanged on markets. In his view, what matters is “narrow
   predictive success” (Hausman 2008a), not overall predictive adequacy.

   So Friedman permits economists to ignore the disquieting findings of
   surveys, or the fact that people do not always prefer larger bundles of
   commodities to smaller bundles of commodities. Nor do economists need
   to be concerned about whether there is a tendency to prefer more
   commodities to fewer. They need not be troubled that some of their
   models suppose extravagantly that all agents know the prices of all
   present and future commodities in all markets. All that matters is
   whether the predictions concerning market phenomena turn out to be
   correct. And since anomalous market outcomes could be due to any number
   of uncontrolled causal factors, while experiments are difficult to
   carry out, it turns out that economists need not worry about ever
   encountering evidence that would strongly disconfirm fundamental
   theory. Detailed models may be confirmed or disconfirmed, but
   fundamental theory is safe. In this way one can understand how
   Friedman’s methodology, which appears to justify the eclectic and
   pragmatic view that economists should use any model that appears to
   “work” regardless of how absurd or unreasonable its assumptions might
   appear, has been deployed in service of a rigid theoretical orthodoxy.
   For other discussions of Friedman’s essay, see Bear and Orr 1969,
   Boland 1979, Hammond 1992, Hirsch and de Marchi 1990, Mäki 1990a,
   Melitz 1963, Rotwein 1959, and Samuelson 1963.

   Over the last two decades there has been a surge of experimentation in
   economics, and Friedman’s methodological views probably do not command
   the same near unanimity that they used to. But they are still
   enormously influential, and they still serve as a way of avoiding
   awkward questions concerning simplifications, idealizations, and
   abstraction in economics rather than responding to them.

3.3 Models

   A century ago economists talked of their work in terms of “principles,”
   “laws,”, and “theories.” That language has not disappeared altogether:
   economists still talk of “game theory”, “consumer choice theory”, or
   the “law of demand”. But nowadays the standard intellectual tool or
   form in economics is a “model.” Econometricians speak of models and
   structures. Economists are more comfortable describing the axioms
   concerning rational choice as constituting a model of rational choice
   than as delineating a theory of rational choice. Many of the most
   distinguished commentators on models regard them as fictional worlds,
   whose study informs our understanding of actual phenomena (Frigg,
   2010). “Creating models is ‘world-making.’” (Morgan 2012, pp. 95, 405).
   In their view, economists are able to investigate how causal factors
   would operate in the absence of interferences by constructing models
   —that is fictional economies—in which the interferences are absent.
   Uskali Mäki maintains that “Models are experiments. Experiments are
   models.” (2005). Dani Rodrik (2015) argues that economics consists of a
   collection of models, and that doing economics consists in selecting or
   customizing a model from this collection. Is the ubiquity of talk of
   models just a change in terminological fashion, or does the concern
   with models (which is by no means unique to economics) signal a
   methodological shift? What are models? These questions have been
   discussed by Cartwright 1989, 1999, Godfrey Smith 2006, Grüne-Yanoff
   2009, Hausman 1992, 2015a, Kuorikoski and Lehtinen 2009, Mäki, ed.
   1991, Mäki 2005, 2009a, 2009b, Morgan 2001, 2004, 2012, Morgan and
   Morrison 1999, Rappaport 1998, Sugden 2000, 2009, Weisberg 2007, and
   Lehtinen, Kuorikoski and Ylikoski 2012.

   The view of models to which economists are most attracted is
   philosophically problematic, because it is apparently committed to the
   existence of fictional entities whose properties and causal
   propensities economists can investigate. In experiments, whether
   carried out in a laboratory or in the field, experimenters interact
   causally with flesh and blood experimental subjects, and the outcome
   may contradict the economist’s predictions. In investigating a model,
   in contrast, the economist “interacts” with fictional entities, which
   are arguably nothing other than his or her own thoughts, and the
   logical implications of the axioms that define the model are never
   disappointed. This is not to say that the logical investigation of
   models never results in surprises. Humans are not logically omniscient,
   and discovering the implications of a set of axioms may be an arduous
   task. But it is a different task than carrying out an experiment in the
   laboratory or the field, and ontology of the “worlds” that economists
   allegedly “create” and then study is deeply puzzling. Although less
   faithful to economic practice, it is far more intelligible
   philosophically to regard models as predicates or as definitions of
   predicates (Hausman 1992). For example, when economists write down a
   model of a firm with a single output and just two inputs, they are
   defining a concept that they can use to describe actual firms.

4. Influential approaches to economic methodology

   The past half century has witnessed the emergence of a large literature
   devoted to economic methodology. That literature explores many
   methodological approaches and applies its conclusions to many schools
   and branches of economics. Much of the literature has focused on the
   fundamental theory of mainstream economics — the theory of the
   equilibria resulting from constrained rational individual choice — but
   the tremendous importance of macroeconomics in determining the proper
   responses to the great recession beginning in 2008, coupled with the
   rapidly increasing role of empirical and experimental inquiries in the
   day-to-day work of economists have seen echoes in methodological
   inquiries (Backhouse 2010). Since 1985, there has been a journal
   Economics and Philosophy devoted specifically to philosophy of
   economics, and since 1994 there has also been a Journal of Economic
   Methodology. This section will sample some of the methodological
   approaches of the past two decades.

4.1 Popperian approaches

   Karl Popper’s philosophy of science has been influential among
   economists, as among other scientists. Popper defends what he calls a
   falsificationist methodology (1968, 1969). Scientists should formulate
   theories that are “logically falsifiable” — that is, inconsistent with
   some possible observation reports. “All crows are black” is logically
   falsifiable; it is inconsistent with (and would be falsified by) an
   observation report of a red crow. (Probabilistic claims are obviously
   not in this sense falsifiable.) Popper insists on falsifiability on the
   grounds that unfalsifiable claims that rule out no observations are
   uninformative. They provide no guidance concerning what to expect, and
   there is nothing to be learned from testing them. Second, Popper
   maintains that scientists should subject theories to harsh test and
   should be willing to reject them when they fail the tests. Third,
   scientists should regard theories as at best interesting conjectures.
   Passing a test does not confirm a theory or provide scientists with
   reason to believe it. It only justifies on the one hand continuing to
   employ the hypothesis (since it has not yet been falsified) and, on the
   other hand, devoting increased efforts to attempting to falsify it
   (since it has thus far survived testing). Popper has defended what he
   calls “situational logic” (which is basically rational choice theory)
   as the correct method for the social sciences (1967, 1976). There
   appear to be serious tensions between Popper’s falsificationism and his
   defense of situational logic, and his discussion of situational logic
   has not been as influential as his falsificationism. For discussion of
   how situational logic applies to economics, see Hands (1985a).

   Given Popper’s falsificationism, there seems little hope of
   understanding how extreme simplifications can be legitimate or how
   current economic practice could be scientifically reputable. Economic
   theories and models are almost all unfalsifiable, and if they were, the
   widespread acceptance of Friedman’s methodological views would insure
   that they are not subjected to serious test. When models apparently
   fail tests, they are rarely repudiated. Economists conclude instead
   merely that they chose the wrong model for the task, or that there were
   disturbing causes. Economic models, which have not been well tested,
   are often taken to be well-established guides to policy, rather than
   merely conjectures. Critics of neoclassical economics have made these
   criticisms (Eichner 1983), but most of those who have espoused Popper’s
   philosophy of science have not repudiated mainstream economics and have
   not been harshly critical of its practitioners.

   Mark Blaug (1992) and Terence Hutchison (1938, 1977, 1978, 2000), who
   are the most prominent Popperian methodologists, criticize particular
   features of economics, and they both call for more testing and a more
   critical attitude. For example, Blaug praises Gary Becker (1976) for
   his refusal to explain differences in choices by differences in
   preferences, but criticizes him for failing to go on and test his
   theories severely (1980a, chapter 14). However, both Blaug and
   Hutchison understate the radicalism of Popper’s views and take his
   message to be little more than that scientists should be critical and
   concerned to test their theories.

   Blaug’s and Hutchison’s criticisms have sometimes been challenged on
   the grounds that economic theories cannot be tested, because of their
   ceteris paribus clauses and the many subsidiary assumptions required to
   derive testable implications (Caldwell 1984). But this response ignores
   Popper’s insistence that testing requires methodological decisions not
   to attribute failures of predictions to mistakes in subsidiary
   assumptions or to “interferences.” For views of Popper’s philosophy and
   its applicability to economics, see de Marchi (1988), Caldwell (1991),
   Boland (1982, 1989, 1992, 1997), and Boylan and O’Gorman (2007),
   Backhouse (2009), and Thomas (2017).

   Applying Popper’s views on falsification literally would be
   destructive. Not only neoclassical economics, but all significant
   economic theories would be condemned as unscientific, and there would
   be no way to discriminate among economic theories. One major problem
   with a naive reading of Popper’s views is that one cannot derive
   testable implications from theories by themselves. To derive testable
   implications, one also needs subsidiary assumptions concerning
   probability distributions, measurement devices, proxies for unmeasured
   variables, the absence of interferences, and so forth. This is the
   so-called “Duhem-Quine problem” (Duhem 1906, Quine 1953, Cross 1982).
   These problems arise generally, and Popper proposes that they be solved
   by a methodological decision to regard a failure of the deduced
   testable implication to be a failure of the theory. But in economics
   the subsidiary assumptions are dubious and in many cases known to be
   false. Making the methodological decision that Popper requires is
   unreasonable and would lead one to reject all economic theories.

   Imre Lakatos (1970), who was for most of his philosophical career a
   follower of Popper, offers a broadly Popperian solution to this
   problem. Lakatos insists that testing is always comparative. When
   theories face empirical difficulties, as they always do, one attempts
   to modify them. Scientifically acceptable (in Lakatos’ terminology
   “theoretically progressive”) modifications must always have some
   additional testable implications; otherwise they are purely ad hoc. If
   some of the new predictions are confirmed, then the modification is
   “empirically progressive,” and one has reason to reject the unmodified
   theory and to employ the new theory, regardless of how unsuccessful in
   general either theory may be. Though progress may be hard to come by,
   Lakatos’ views do not have the same destructive implications as
   Popper’s. Lakatos appears to solve the problem of how to appraise
   mainstream economic theory by arguing that what matters is empirical
   progress or retrogression rather than empirical success or failure.
   Lakatos’ views have thus been more attractive to economic
   methodologists than Popper’s.

   Developing Thomas Kuhn’s notion of a “paradigm” (1970) and some hints
   from Popper, Lakatos also presented a view of the global theory
   structure of whole theoretical enterprises, which he called “scientific
   research programmes.” Lakatos emphasized that there is a “hard core” of
   basic theoretical propositions that define a research programme and
   that are not to be questioned within the research programme. In
   addition members of a research programme accept a common body of
   heuristics that guide them in the articulation and modification of
   specific theories. These views have also been attractive to economic
   methodologists, since theory development in economics is sharply
   constrained and since economics appears at first glance to have a “hard
   core.” The fact that economists do not give up basic theoretical
   postulates that appear to be false might be explained and justified by
   regarding them as part of the “hard core” of the “neoclassical research
   programme”.

   Yet Lakatos’ views do not provide a satisfactory account of how
   economics can be a reputable science despite its reliance on extreme
   simplifications. For it is questionable whether the development of
   neoclassical economic theory has demonstrated empirical progress. For
   example, the replacement of “cardinal” utility theory by “ordinal”
   utility theory (see below Section 5.1) in the 1930s, which is generally
   regarded as a major step forward, involved the replacement of one
   theory by another that had no additional empirical content.
   Furthermore, despite his emphasis on heuristics as guiding theory
   modification, Lakatos still emphasizes testing. Science is for Lakatos
   more empirically driven than mainstream economics has been (Hands
   1992). It is also doubtful whether research enterprises in economics
   have “hard cores” (Hoover 1991, Hausman 1992, ch. 6). For attempts to
   apply Lakatos’ views to economics see Latsis (1976), and Weintraub
   (1985). As is apparent in de Marchi and Blaug (1991), writers on
   economic methodology have in recent years become increasingly
   disenchanted with Lakatos’ philosophy (Backhouse 2009).

   There is a second major problem with Popper’s philosophy of science,
   which plagues Lakatos’ views as well. Both maintain that there is no
   such thing as empirical confirmation (for some late qualms, see Lakatos
   1974). Popper and Lakatos maintain that evidence never provides reason
   to believe that scientific claims are true, and both also deny that
   results of tests can justify relying on statements in practical
   endeavours or in theoretical inquiry. There is no better evidence for
   one unfalsified proposition than for another. On this view, someone who
   questions whether there is enough evidence for some proposition to
   justify relying on it in theoretical studies or for policy purposes
   would be making the methodological “error” of supposing that there can
   be evidence in support of hypotheses. With the notable exception of
   Watkins (1984), few philosophers within the Popperian tradition have
   faced up to this challenging consequence.

4.2 The rhetoric of economics

   One radical reaction to the difficulties of justifying the reliance on
   severe simplifications is to deny that economics passes methodological
   muster. Alexander Rosenberg (1992) maintains that economics can only
   make imprecise generic predictions, and it cannot make progress,
   because it is built around folk psychology, which is a mediocre theory
   of human behavior and which (owing to the irreducibility of intentional
   notions) cannot be improved. Complex economic theories are
   scientifically valuable only as applied mathematics, not as empirical
   theory. Since economics does not show the same consistent progress as
   the natural sciences, one cannot dismiss Rosenberg’s suggestion that
   economics is an empirical dead end. But his view that it has made no
   progress and that it does not permit quantitative predictions is hard
   to accept. For example, contemporary economists are much better at
   pricing stock options or designing auctions than economists were even a
   generation ago.

   An equally radical but opposite reaction is Deirdre McCloskey’s, who
   denies that there are any non-trivial methodological standards that
   economics must meet (1985, 1992, 1994, 2000, McCloskey and Ziliak 2003,
   Ziliak and McCloskey 2008). In her view, the only relevant and
   significant criteria for assessing the practices and products of a
   discipline are those accepted by the practitioners. Apart from a few
   general standards such as honesty and a willingness to listen to
   criticisms, the only justifiable criteria for any conversation are
   those of the participants. Economists can thus dismiss the arrogant
   pretensions of philosophers to judge economic discourse. Whatever a
   group of respected economists takes to be good economics is
   automatically good economics. Philosophical standards of empirical
   success are just so much hot air. Those who are interested in
   understanding the character of economics and in contributing to its
   improvement should eschew methodology and study instead the “rhetoric”
   of economics — that is, the means of argument and persuasion that
   succeed among economists.

   McCloskey’s studies of the rhetoric of economics have been valuable and
   influential (1985, esp. ch. 5–7, McCloskey and Ziliak 2003, Ziliak and
   McCloskey 2008), but a great deal of her work during the 1980s and
   1990s consists of philosophical critiques of economic methodology
   rather than studies of the rhetoric of economics. Her philosophical
   critiques are problematic, because the position sketched in the
   previous paragraph is hard to defend and potentially self-defeating. It
   is hard to defend, because epistemological standards have already
   influenced the conversation of economists. The standards of predictive
   success which lead one to have qualms about economics are already
   standards that many economists accept. The only way to escape these
   doubts is to surrender the standards that gave rise to them. But
   McCloskey’s position undermines any principled argument for a change in
   standards. Furthermore, as Rosenberg has argued (1988), it seems that
   economists would doom themselves to irrelevance if they were to
   surrender standards of predictive success, for it is upon such
   standards that policy decisions are made.

   McCloskey does not, in fact, want to preclude the possibiity that
   economists are sometimes persuaded when they should not be or are not
   persuaded when they should be. For she herself criticizes the bad habit
   some economists have of conflating statistical significance with
   economic importance (1985, ch. 9, McCloskey and Ziliak 2003, Ziliak and
   McCloskey 2008). McCloskey typically characterizes rhetoric
   descriptively as the study of what in fact persuades, but sometimes she
   instead characterizes it normatively as the study of what ought to
   persuade (1985, ch. 2). And if rhetoric is the study of what ought
   rationally to persuade, then it is methodology, not an alternative to
   methodology. Questions about whether economics is a successful
   empirical science cannot be conjured away.

4.3 “Realism” in economic methodology

   Economic methodologist have paid little attention to debates within
   philosophy of science between realists and anti-realists (van Fraassen
   1980, Boyd 1984, Psillos 1999, Niniluoto 2002, Chakravarty 2010, Dicken
   2016), because economic theories rarely postulate the existence of
   unobservable entities or properties, apart from variants of “everyday
   unobservables,” such as beliefs and desires. Methodologists have, on
   the other hand, vigorously debated the goals of economics, but those
   who argue that the ultimate goals are predictive (such as Milton
   Friedman) do so because of their interest in policy, not because they
   seek to avoid or resolve epistemological and semantic puzzles
   concerning references to unobservables.

   Nevertheless there are two important recent realist programs in
   economic methodology. The first, developed mainly by Uskali Mäki, is
   devoted to exploring the varieties of realism implicit in the
   methodological statements and theoretical enterprises of economists
   (see Mäki 1990a, b, c, 2007, and Lehtinen, Kuorikoski and Ylikoski
   2012). The second, which is espoused by Tony Lawson and his co-workers,
   mainly at Cambridge University, derives from the work of Roy Bhaskar
   (1975) (see Lawson 1997, 2015, Bhaskar et al. 1998, Fleetwood 1999,
   Brown and Fleetwood 2003, Ackroyd and Fleetwood 2004, Edwards, Mahoney,
   and Vincent 2014). In Lawson’s view, one can trace many of the
   inadequacies of mainstream economics (of which he is a critic) to an
   insufficient concern with ontology. In attempting to identify
   regularities on the surface of the phenomena, mainstream economists are
   doomed to failure. Economic phenomena are in fact influenced by a large
   number of different causal factors, and one can achieve scientific
   knowledge only of the underlying mechanisms and tendencies, whose
   operation can be glimpsed intermittently and obscurely in observable
   relations. Mäki’s and Lawson’s programs have little to do with one
   another, though Mäki (like Mill, Cartwright, and Hausman) shares
   Lawson’s and Bhaskar’s concern with underlying causal mechanisms. See
   also the entry on scientific realism.

4.4 Economic methodology and social studies of science

   Throughout its history, economics has been the subject of sociological
   as well as methodological scrutiny. Many sociological discussions of
   economics, like Marx’s critique of classical political economy, have
   been concerned to identify ideological distortions and thereby to
   criticize particular aspects of economic theory and economic policy.
   Since every political program finds economists who testify to its
   economic virtues, there is a never-ending source of material for such
   critiques. For example, in the wake of the near collapse of the
   international financial system in 2008, American economists who argued
   for austerity were mostly Republicans, while those who defended efforts
   to increase aggregate demand were mostly Democrats.

   The influence of contemporary sociology of science and social studies
   of science, coupled with the difficulties methodologists have had
   making sense of and rationalizing the conduct of economics, have led to
   efforts at fusing economics and sociology (Granovetter 1985, Swedberg
   1990, 2007) as well as to a sociological turn within methodological
   reflection itself. Rather than showing that there is good evidence
   supporting developments in economic theory or that those developments
   have other broadly epistemic virtues, methodologists and historians
   such as D. Wade Hands (2001); Hands and Mirowski 1998), Philip Mirowski
   (1990, 2002, 2004, 2013), and E. Roy Weintraub (1991) have argued that
   these changes reflect a wide variety of non-rational factors, from
   changes in funding for theoretical economics, political commitments,
   personal rivalries, attachments to metaphors, or mathematical
   interests.

   Furthermore, many of the same methodologists and historians have argued
   that economics is not only an object of social inquiry, but that it can
   be a tool of social inquiry into science. By studying the incentive
   structure of scientific disciplines and the implicit or explicit market
   forces impinging on research (including of course research in
   economics), it should be possible to write the economics of science and
   the economics of economics itself (Hands 1995, Hull 1988, Leonard 2002,
   Mirowski and Sent 2002).

   Exactly how, if at all, this work is supposed to bear on questions
   concerning how well supported are the claims economists make is not
   clear. Though eschewing traditional methodology, Mirowski’s monograph
   on the role of physical analogy in economics (1990) is often very
   critical of mainstream economics. In his Reflection without Rules
   (2001) D. W. Hands maintains that general methodological rules are of
   little use. He defends a naturalistic view of methodology and is
   skeptical of prescriptions that are not based on detailed knowledge.
   But he does not argue that no rules apply.

4.5 Case studies

   The above survey of approaches to the fundamental problems of
   appraising economic theory is far from complete. For example, there
   have been substantial efforts to apply structuralist views of
   scientific theories (Sneed 1971, Stegmüller 1976, 1979) to economics
   (Stegmüller et al. 1981, Hamminga 1983, Hands 1985c, Balzer and
   Hamminga 1989). The above discussion documents the diversity and
   disagreements concerning how to interpret and appraise economic
   theories. It is not surprising that there is no consensus among those
   writing on economic methodology concerning the overall empirical
   appraisal of specific approaches in economics, including mainstream
   microeconomics, macroeconomics, and econometrics. When practitioners
   cannot agree, it is questionable whether those who know more philosophy
   but less economics will be able to settle the matter. Since the debates
   continue, those who reflect on economic methodology should have a
   continuing part to play.

   Meanwhile, there are many other more specific methodological questions
   to address, and it is a sign of the maturity of the subdiscipline that
   a large and increasing percentage of work on economic methodology
   addresses more specific questions. There is plethora of work, as a
   perusal of any recent issue of the Journal of Economic Methodology or
   Economics and Philosophy will confirm. Some of the range of issues
   currently under discussion were mentioned above in Section 2. Here is a
   list of three of the many areas of current interest:

   1. Although more concerned with the content of economics than with its
   methodology, the recent explosion of work on feminist economics is shot
   through with methodological and sociological self-reflection. The fact
   that a considerably larger percentage of economists are men than is
   true of any of the other social sciences and indeed than most of the
   natural sciences raises questions about whether there is something
   particularly masculine about the discipline. Important texts are Ferber
   and Nelson (1993, 2003), Nelson (1995, 1996, 2001), Barker and Kuiper
   (2003). Since 1995, there has been a journal, Feminist Economics, which
   pulls together much of this work.

   2. During the past decades, laboratory experimentation in economics has
   expanded rapidly. Laboratory experimentation has many different
   objectives (see Roth 1988) and apparently holds out the prospect of
   bridging the gulf between fundamental economic theory and empirical
   evidence. Some of it casts light on the way in which methodological
   commitments influence the extent to which economists heed empirical
   evidence. A good deal of laboratory experimentation in contemporary
   economics is in the service of behavioral economics, which prides
   itself on heeding experimental evidence concerning the structure and
   determinants of individual choices. Although behavioral economics has
   secured a foothold within mainstream economics, it remains
   controversial substantively and methodologically, and its implications
   for normative economics, discussed below in section 6, are
   controversial.

   For example, in the case of preference reversals, discussed briefly
   below in Section 5.1, economists devoted considerable attention to the
   experimental findings and conceded that they disconfirmed central
   principles of economics. But economists have been generally unwilling
   to pay serious attention to the theories proposed by psychologists that
   predicted the phenomena before they were observed. The reason seems to
   be that these psychological theories do not have the same wide scope as
   the basic principles of mainstream economics (Hausman 1992, chapter
   13). Hesitation concerning neuroeconomics (Camerer et al. 2005, Camerer
   2009, Marchionni and Vromen 2014, Rustichini 2005, 2009, Glimcher and
   Fehr 2013, Reuter and Montag 2016, Vromen and Marchionni 2018) is also
   common. In an extremely influential essay, “The Case for Mindless
   Economics.” Gul and Pesandorfer (2008) argue that the findings of
   behavioral economics (and neuroeconomics) are irrelevant to economics.
   They are at most of heuristic value. They maintain that the findings of
   behavioral economics are irrelevant to economics, because they do not
   concern market choices and their consequences, which are the only
   germane data. Sometimes Gul and Pesandorfer appear to identify economic
   theory with the empirical consequences economists are concerned with,
   while at other points they echo Milton Friedman (see section 3.2) and
   deny that the “realism” of the “assumptions” of economic models
   matters. They do not address sophisticated defenses of realism
   concerning mental states like Dietrich and List (2016). It seems to me
   that theoretical resistance to engaging with behavioral economists like
   that one finds in Gul and Pesandorfer’s essay is weakening. But it is
   clear that the methodological commitments governing theoretical
   economics are much more complex and more specific to economics than the
   general rules proposed by philosophers such as Popper and Lakatos.

   The relevance of laboratory experimentation remains controversial.
   Behavioral economists are enthusiastic, while more traditional
   theorists question whether experimental findings can be generalized to
   non-experimental contexts and, more generally, concerning the
   possibilities of learning from experiments (Caplin and Schotter 2008).
   For discussions of experimental economics, see Guala (2000a, b, 2005),
   Hey (1991), Kagel and Roth (1995, 2016), Plott (1991), Smith (1991),
   Starmer (1999), Camerer (2003), Bardsley and Cubitt 2009, Durlauf and
   Blume (2009), Branas-Garza and Cabrales (2015), Fréchette and Schotter
   (2015), Jacquemet and L’Haridon (2018), and the June, 2005 special
   issue of the Journal of Economic Methodology. Al Roth’s Game Theory,
   Experimental Economics, and Market Design Page
   (http://kuznets.fas.harvard.edu/~aroth/alroth.html) is a useful source.
   For recent work on behavioral economics see the Journal of Behavioral
   Economics, the Review of Behavioral Economics, and Behavioural Public
   Policy.

   3. During the past generation, there has been a radical transformation
   in the attitudes of economists toward empirical causal inquiry,
   especially in the form of field experiments and natural experiments,
   often employing instrumental variables. For example, about two-thirds
   of the articles in the February, 2018 American Economic Review are
   based on empirical studies. The titles of the first four entries in the
   table of contents are: “The Effects of Pretrial Detention on
   Conviction, Future Crime, and Employment: Evidence from Randomly
   Assigned Judges,” “Implications of US Tax Policy for House Prices,
   Rents, and Homeownership,” “The Welfare Cost of Perceived Policy
   Uncertainty: Evidence from Social Security,” “The Economic Consequences
   of Hospital Admissions.” If one goes back twenty-five years, only about
   one-eighth of the first issue of the 1993 American Economic Review
   appear to rely on any empirical studies. The first four entries are:
   “Today’s Task for Economists,” “Trigger Points and Budget Cuts:
   Explaining the Effects of Fiscal Austerity,” “Economic Policy, Economic
   Performance, and Elections,” “The Macroeconomics of Dr. Strangelove.” A
   Rip Van Winkle who had gone to sleep in 1983 reading the principal
   economics journals would be staggered when he awoke in 2018.

   Field experiments have been especially important in development
   economics where the results of various foreign aid projects have too
   often provided meagre benefits. One can find good introductions to this
   work in Carpenter et al. (2005), Duflo and Banerjee (2011, 2017),
   Gugerty and Karlan (2018), Karlan and Appel (2011, 2016), Kremer and
   Glennerster (2011), List and Samek (2018), and Mullainathan and Shafir
   (2013). See also the Poverty Action Lab. Although field experiments
   appear to be hard-nosed inquiries that establish what works and what
   does not work, matters are not so simple (Deaton 2010, Cartwright and
   Hardie 2013). Without knowledge of the mechanisms, it is all too easy
   for an intervention that works splendidly at a specific time and place
   to fail abysmally when tried elsewhere. Atheoretical inquiry, even when
   methodologically sophisticated, has severe limits as a tactic of
   knowledge acquisition.

   The empirical turn in economics has also had the effect of increasing
   the importance of economic history. With some ingenuity, especially in
   identifying possible instrumental variables, history is full of
   “natural experiments.” For example (J. Hausman 2016), in 1936, the
   American Congress voted to pay pensions to veterans of World War I
   eight years before they were due to be paid. Because the percentages of
   veterans differed across states, Hausman can use the differing economic
   performances of states to estimate the effects of the economic stimulus
   the pensions provided. Although less decisive than randomized
   controlled trials (which are often impossible to carry out),
   examination of historical episodes such as this one provide significant
   evidence concerning economic hypotheses.

5. Rational choice theory

   Insofar as economics explains and predicts phenomena as consequences of
   individual choices, which are themselves explained in terms of alleged
   reasons, it must depict agents as to some extent rational. Rationality,
   like reasons, involves evaluation, and just as one can assess the
   rationality of individual choices, so one can assess the rationality of
   social choices and examine how they are and ought to be related to the
   preferences and judgments of individuals. In addition, there are
   intricate questions concerning rationality in strategic situations in
   which outcomes depend on the choices of multiple individuals. Since
   rationality is a central concept in branches of philosophy such as
   action theory, epistemology, ethics, and philosophy of mind, studies of
   rationality frequently cross the boundaries between economics and
   philosophy.

5.1 Individual rationality

   The barebones theory of rationality discussed above in Section 1.1
   takes an agent’s preferences (rankings of states of affairs) to be
   rational if they are complete and transitive, and it takes the agent’s
   choice to be rational if the agent does not prefer any feasible
   alternative to the one he or she chooses. Such a theory of rationality
   is clearly too weak, because it says nothing about belief or what
   rationality implies when agents do not know (with certainty) everything
   relevant to their choices. But it may also be too strong, since, as
   Isaac Levi in particular has argued (1986), there is nothing irrational
   about having incomplete preferences in situations involving
   uncertainty. Sometimes it is rational to suspend judgment and to refuse
   to rank alternatives that are not well understood. On the other hand,
   transitivity is a plausible condition, and the so-called “money pump”
   argument demonstrates that if one’s preferences are intransitive and
   one is willing to make exchanges, then one can be exploited. (Suppose
   an agent A prefers X to Y, Y to Z and Z to X, and that A will pay some
   small amount of money $P to exchange Y for X, Z for Y, and X for Z.
   That means that, starting with Z, A will pay $P for Y, then $P again
   for X, then $P again for Z and so on. Agents are not this stupid. They
   will instead refuse to trade or adjust their preferences to eliminate
   the intransitivity (but see Schick 1986).

   On the other hand, there is considerable experimental evidence that
   people’s preferences are not in fact transitive. Such evidence does not
   establish that transitivity is not a requirement of rationality. It may
   show instead that people are sometimes irrational. In the case of
   so-called “preference reversals,” for example, it seems plausible that
   people in fact make irrational choices (Lichtenstein and Slovic 1971,
   Tversky and Thaler 1990). Evidence of persistent violations of
   transitivity is disquieting, since standards of rationality should not
   be impossibly high.

   A further difficulty with the barebones theory of rationality concerns
   the individuation of the objects of preference or choice. Consider, for
   example, data from multistage ultimatum games. Suppose A can propose
   any division of $10 between A and B. B can accept or reject A’s
   proposal. If B rejects the proposal, then the amount of money drops to
   $5, and B gets to offer a division of the $5 which A can accept or
   reject. If A rejects B’s offer, then both players get nothing. Suppose
   that A proposes to divide the money with $7 for A and $3 for B. B
   declines and offers to split the $5 evenly, with $2.50 for each.
   Behavior such as this is, in fact, common (Ochs and Roth 1989, p. 362).
   Assuming that B prefers more money to less, these choices appear to be
   a violation of transitivity. B prefers $3 to $2.50, yet declines $3 for
   certain for $2.50 (with some slight chance of A declining and B getting
   nothing). But the objects of choice are not just quantities of money. B
   is turning down $3 as part of “a raw deal” in favor of $2.50 as part of
   a fair arrangement. If the objects of choice are defined in this way,
   there is no failure of transitivity.

   This plausible observation gives rise to a serious problem. Unless
   there are constraints on how the objects of choice are individuated,
   conditions of rationality such as transitivity are empty. A’s choice of
   X over Y, Y over Z and Z over X does not violate transitivity if “X
   when the alternative is Y” is not the same object of choice as “X when
   the alternative is Z”. John Broome (1991) argues that further
   substantive principles of rationality are required to limit how
   alternatives are individuated or to require that agents be indifferent
   between alternatives such as “X when the alternative is Y” and “X when
   the alternative is Z.”

   To extend the theory of rationality to circumstances involving risk
   (where the objects of choice are lotteries with known probabilities)
   and uncertainty (where agents do not know the probabilities or even all
   the possible outcomes of their choices) requires further principles of
   rationality, as well as controversial technical simplifications.
   Subjective Bayesians suppose that individuals in circumstances of
   uncertainty have well-defined subjective probabilities (degrees of
   belief) over all the payoffs and thus that the objects of choice can be
   modeled as lotteries, just as in circumstances involving risk, though
   with subjective probabilities in place of objective probabilities. See
   the entries on Bayes’ theorem and Bayesian epistemology. The most
   important of the axioms needed for the theory of rational choice under
   conditions of risk and uncertainty is the independence condition. It
   says roughly that the preferences of rational agent between two
   lotteries that differ in only one outcome should match their
   preferences between the differing outcomes. Although initially
   plausible, the independence condition is very controversial. See Allais
   and Hagen (1979) and McClennen (1983, 1990).

   A considerable part of rational choice theory is concerned with
   formalizations of conditions of rationality and investigation of their
   implications. When an agent’s preferences are complete and transitive
   and satisfy a further continuity condition, then they can be
   represented by a so-called ordinal utility function. What this means is
   that it is possible to define a function that represents an agent’s
   preferences so that U(X) > U(Y) if and only if the agent prefers X to
   Y, and U(X) = U(Y) if and only if the agent is indifferent between X
   and Y. This function merely represents the preference ranking. It
   contains no information beyond the ranking. Any order-preserving
   transformation of “U” would represent the agent’s preferences just as
   well.

   When an agent’s preferences in addition satisfy the independence
   condition and some other technical conditions, then they can be
   represented by an expected utility function (Harsanyi 1977b, ch. 4,
   Hernstein and Milnor 1953, Ramsey 1926, and Savage 1972). Such a
   function has two important properties. First, the expected utility of a
   lottery is equal to the sum of the (expected) utilities of its prizes
   weighted by their probabilities. Second, expected utility functions are
   unique up to a positive affine transformation. What this means is that
   if U and V are both expected utility functions representing the
   preferences of an agent, then for all objects of preference, X, V(X)
   must be equal to aU(X) + b, where a and b are real numbers and a is
   positive. In addition, the axioms of rationality imply that the agent’s
   degrees of belief will satisfy the axioms of the probability calculus.

   A great deal of controversy surrounds the theory of rationality, and
   there have been many formal investigations into weakened or amended
   theories of rationality. For further discussion, see Allais and Hagen
   1979, Barberà, Hammond and Seidl 1999, Kahneman and Tversky 1979,
   Loomes and Sugden 1982, Luce and Raiffa 1957, Machina 1987, and Gilboa
   and Schmeidler 2001.

5.2 Collective rationality and social choice

   Although societies are very different from individuals, they have
   mechanisms to evaluate alternatives and make choices, and their
   evaluations and choices may be rational or irrational. It is not,
   however, obvious, what principles of rationality should govern the
   choices and evaluations of society. Transitivity is one plausible
   condition. It seems that a society that chooses X when faced with the
   alternatives X or Y, Y when faced with the alternatives Y or Z and Z
   when faced with the alternatives X or Z either has had a change of
   heart or is choosing irrationally. Yet, purported irrationalities such
   as these can easily arise from standard mechanisms that aim to link
   social choices and individual preferences. Suppose there are three
   individuals in the society. Individual One ranks the alternatives X, Y,
   Z. Individual Two ranks them Y, Z, X. Individual Three ranks them Z, X,
   Y. If decisions are made by pairwise majority voting, X will be chosen
   from the pair (X, Y), Y will be chosen from (Y, Z), and Z will be
   chosen from (X, Z). Clearly this is unsettling, but are possible cycles
   in social choices irrational?

   Similar problems affect what one might call the logical coherence of
   social judgments (List and Pettit 2002). Suppose society consists of
   three individuals who make the following judgments concerning the truth
   or falsity of the propositions P and Q and that social judgment follows
   the majority.
                P     if P then Q Q
   Individual 1 true  true        true
   Individual 2 false true        false
   Individual 3 true  false       false
   Society      true  true        false

   The judgments of each of the individuals are consistent with the
   principles of logic, while social judgments violate them. How important
   is it that social judgments be consistent with the principles of logic?

   Although social choice theory in this way bears on questions of social
   rationality, most work in social choice theory explores the
   consequences of principles of rationality coupled with explicitly
   ethical constraints. The seminal contribution is Kenneth Arrow’s
   impossibility theorem (1963, 1967). Arrow assumes that both individual
   preferences and social preferences are complete and transitive and that
   the method of forming social preferences (or making social choices)
   issues in some social preference ranking or social choice for any
   possible profile of individual preferences. In addition, Arrow imposes
   a weak unanimity condition: if everybody prefers X to Y, then Y must
   not be socially preferred. Third, he requires that there be no dictator
   whose preferences determine social preferences or choices irrespective
   of the preferences of anybody else. Lastly, he imposes the condition
   that the social preference between X and Y should depend on how
   individuals rank X and Y and on nothing else. Arrow then proved the
   surprising result that no method of relating social and individual
   preferences can satisfy all these conditions!

   In the sixty years since Arrow wrote, there has been a plethora of work
   in social choice theory, a good deal of which is arguably of great
   importance to ethics. For example, John Harsanyi proved that if
   individual preferences and social evaluations both satisfy the axioms
   of expected utility theory (with shared or objective probabilities) and
   that social preferences conform to unanimous individual preferences,
   then social evaluations are determined by a weighted sum of individual
   utilities (1955, 1977a). Matthew Adler (2012) has extended an approach
   like Harsanyi’s to demonstrate that a form of weighted utilitarianism,
   which prioritizes the interests of those who are worse off, uniquely
   satisfies a longer list of rational and ethical constraints. When there
   are instead disagreements in probability assignments, there is an
   impossibility result: the unanimity condition implies that for some
   profiles of individual preferences, social evaluations will not satisfy
   the axioms of expected utility theory (Hammond 1983, Seidenfeld, et al.
   1989, Mongin 1995). For further discussion of social choice theory and
   the relevance of utility theory to social evaluation, see the entry on
   social choice theory, Sen (1970) and for recent reappraisals Fleurbaey
   (2007) and Adler (2012).

5.3 Game theory

   When outcomes depend on what several agents do, one agent’s best choice
   may depend on what other agents choose. Although the principles of
   rationality governing individual choice still apply, arguably there are
   further principles of rationality governing expectations of the actions
   of others (and of their expectations concerning your actions and
   expectations, and so forth). Game theory occupies an increasingly
   important role within economics, and it is also relevant both to
   inquiries concerning rationality and inquiries concerning ethics. For
   further discussion see the entries on game theory, game theory and
   ethics, and evolutionary game theory.

6. Economics and ethics

   As discussed above in Section 2.1 most economists distinguish between
   positive and normative economics, and most would argue that economics
   is relevant to policy mainly because of the (positive) information it
   provides concerning the consequences of policy. Yet the same economists
   also offer their advice concerning how to fix the economy, and there is
   a whole field of normative economics.

   Economic outcomes, institutions, and processes may be better or worse
   in several different ways. Some outcomes may make people better off.
   Other outcomes may be less unequal. Others may restrict individual
   freedom more severely. Economists typically evaluate outcomes
   exclusively in terms of welfare. This does not imply that they believe
   that only welfare is of moral importance. They focus on welfare,
   because they believe that economics provides an excellent set of tools
   to address questions of welfare and because they hope that questions
   about welfare can be separated from questions about equality, freedom,
   or justice. As sketched below, economists have had some things to say
   about other dimensions of moral appraisal, but welfare takes center
   stage. Indeed normative economics is standardly called “welfare
   economics.”

6.1 Welfare

   One central question of moral philosophy has been to determine what
   things are intrinsically good for human beings. This is a central
   question, because all plausible moral views assign an important place
   to individual welfare or well-being. This is obviously true of
   utilitarianism (which holds that what is right maximizes total or
   average welfare), but even non-utilitarian views are concerned with
   welfare, if they recognize the virtue of benevolence, or if they are
   concerned with the interests of individuals or with avoiding harm to
   individuals.

   There are many ways to think about well-being, and the prevailing view
   among economists has shifted from hedonism (which takes the good to be
   a mental state such as pleasure or happiness) to the view that welfare
   should be measured by the satisfaction of preferences. A number of
   prominent economists are currently arguing for a return to hedonism,
   but they remain a minority. (See Bavetta et al. 2014. Clark Flèche
   2018, Dolan and Kahneman 2014, Frey 2010, 2018, Frey and Stutzer 2001,
   Kahneman 1999, 2000a, 2000b, Kahneman and Krueger 2006, Kahneman and
   Sugden 2005, Kahneman and Thaler 2006, Layard 2006, Ormerod 2008,
   Radcliff 2013, Weimann and Knabe 2015 and for criticism Davies 2015,
   Etzioni 2018, and Hausman 2010.) Unlike hedonism, taking welfare to be
   preference satisfaction specifies how to find out what is good for a
   person rather than committing itself to any substantive view of a
   person’s good. Note that equating welfare with the satisfaction of
   preferences is not equating welfare with any feeling of satisfaction.
   If welfare can be measured by the satisfaction of preferences, then a
   person is better off if what he or she prefers comes to pass,
   regardless of whether that occurrence makes the agent feel satisfied.

   Since mainstream economics attributes a consistent preference ordering
   to all agents, and since more specific models typically take agents to
   be well-informed and self-interested, it is easy for economists to
   accept the view that an individual agent A will prefer X to Y if and
   only if X is in fact better for A than Y is. This is one place where
   positive theory bleeds into normative theory. In addition, the
   identification of welfare with the satisfaction of preferences is
   attractive to economists, because it prevents questions about the
   justification of paternalism (to which most economists are strongly
   opposed) from even arising.

   Welfare and the satisfaction of preferences may coincide because the
   satisfaction of preferences constitutes welfare or because people are
   self-interested and good judges of their own interests and hence prefer
   what is good for them. There are many obvious objections to the view
   that the satisfaction of preferences constitutes welfare. Preferences
   may be based on mistaken beliefs. People may prefer to sacrifice their
   own well-being for some purpose they value more highly. Preferences may
   reflect past manipulation or distorting psychological influences
   (Elster 1983). In addition, if preference satisfaction constitutes
   welfare, then policy makers can make people better off by molding their
   wants rather than by improving conditions. Furthermore, it seems
   unreasonable that social policy should attend to extravagant
   preferences. Rather than responding to these objections and attempting
   to defend the view that preference satisfaction constitutes well-being,
   economists can blunt these objections by taking preferences in
   circumstances where people are self-interested and good judges of their
   interests to be merely good evidence of what will promote welfare
   (Hausman and McPherson 2009, Hausman 2012). There are some exceptions,
   most notably Amartya Sen (1987a,b,c, 1992), but most economists take
   welfare to coincide with the satisfaction of preference.

6.2 Efficiency

   Because the identification of welfare with preference satisfaction
   makes it questionable whether one can make interpersonal welfare
   comparisons, few economists defend a utilitarian view of policy as
   maximizing total or average welfare. (Harsanyi is one exception, for
   another see Ng 1983). Economists have instead explored the possibility
   of making welfare assessments of economic processes, institutions,
   outcomes, and policies without making interpersonal comparisons.
   Consider two economic outcomes S and R, and suppose that some people
   prefer S to R and that nobody prefers R to S. In that case S is “Pareto
   superior” to R, or S is a “Pareto improvement” over R. Without making
   any interpersonal comparisons, one can conclude that people’s
   preferences are better satisfied in S than in R. If there is no state
   of affairs that is Pareto superior to S, then economists say that S is
   “Pareto optimal” or “Pareto efficient.” Efficiency here is efficiency
   with respect to satisfying preferences rather than minimizing the
   number of inputs needed to produce a unit of output or some other
   technical notion (Le Grand 1991). If a state of affairs is not Pareto
   efficient, then society is missing an opportunity costlessly to satisfy
   some people’s preferences better. A Pareto efficient state of affairs
   avoids this failure, but it has no other obvious virtues. For example,
   suppose nobody is satiated and people care only about how much food
   they get. Consider two distributions of food. In the first, millions
   are starving but no food is wasted. In the second, nobody is starving,
   but some food is wasted. The first is Pareto efficient, while the
   second is not.

   The notions of Pareto improvements and Pareto efficiency might seem
   useless, because economic policies almost always have both winners and
   losers. Mainstream economists have nevertheless found these concepts
   useful in two ways. First, they have proved two theorems concerning
   properties of perfectly competitive equilibria (Arrow 1968). The first
   theorem says that equilibria in perfectly competitive markets are
   Pareto optimal, and the second says that any Pareto optimal allocation,
   with whatever distribution of income policy makers might prefer, can be
   achieved as a perfectly competitive market equilibrium, provided that
   one begins with just the right distribution of endowments among
   economic agents. The first theorem has been regarded as underwriting
   Adam Smith’s view of the invisible hand (Arrow and Hahn 1971, preface;
   Hahn 1973). This interpretation is problematic, because no economy has
   ever been or will ever be in perfectly competitive equilibrium. The
   second theorem provides some justification for the normative division
   of labor economists prefer, with economists concerned about efficiency
   and others concerned about justice. The thought is that the second
   theorem shows that theories of just distribution are compatible with
   reliance on competitive markets. The two fundamental theorems of
   welfare economics go some way toward explaining why mainstream
   economists, whether they support laissez-faire policies or government
   intervention to remedy market imperfections, think of perfectly
   competitive equilibria as ideals. But the significance of the theorems
   is debatable, since actual markets differ significantly from perfectly
   competitive markets and, when there are multiple market imperfections,
   the “theory of the second best” shows that fixing some of the
   imperfections may lead the society away from a perfectly competitive
   equilibrium (and diminish efficiency and welfare) rather than toward
   one (Lipsey and Lancaster 1956–7).

   The other way that economists have found to extend the Pareto
   efficiency notions leads to cost-benefit analysis, which is a practical
   tool for policy analysis (Mishan 1971; Sugden and Williams 1978; Adler
   and Posner 2000, 2006; Broadman et al. 2010; Boadway 2016). Suppose
   that S is not a Pareto improvement over R. Some members of the society
   would be losers in a shift from R to S. Those losers prefer R to S, but
   there are enough winners — enough people who prefer S to R — that the
   winners could compensate the losers and make the preference for S′ (S
   with compensation paid) over R unanimous. S is a “potential Pareto
   improvement” over R. In other terms, the amount of money the winners
   would be willing to pay to bring about the change is larger than the
   amount of money the losers would have to be compensated so as not to
   object to the change. (Economists are skeptical about what one learns
   from asking people how much they would be willing to pay, and they
   attempt instead to infer how much individuals are willing to pay
   indirectly from market phenomena.) When S is a potential Pareto
   improvement over R, there is said to be a “net benefit” to the policy
   of bringing about S. According to cost-benefit analysis, among eligible
   policies (which satisfy legal and moral constraints), one should, other
   things being equal, employ the one with the largest net benefit. Note
   that the compensation is entirely hypothetical. Potential Pareto
   improvements result in winners and losers, the justice or injustice of
   which is irrelevant to cost-benefit analysis. Justice or beneficence
   may require that the society do something to mitigate distributional
   imbalances. Because there is a larger “pie” of goods and services to
   satisfy preferences (since compensation could be paid and everybody’s
   preferences better satisfied), selecting policies with the greatest net
   benefit serves economic efficiency (Hicks 1939, Kaldor 1939).

   Despite the practical importance of cost-benefit analysis, the
   technique and the justification for it sketched in the previous
   paragraph are problematic. One technical difficulty is that it is
   possible for S to be a potential Pareto improvement over R and for R to
   be a potential Pareto improvement over S (Scitovsky 1941, Samuelson
   1950)! That means that the fact that S is a potential Pareto
   improvement over R does not imply that there is a larger economic “pie”
   in S than in R, because there cannot, of course, be a larger economic
   pie in S than in R and a larger economic pie in R than in S. A second
   problem is that willingness to pay for some policy and the amount one
   would require in compensation if one opposes the policy depend on how
   much wealth one has as well as on one’s attitude to the policy.
   Cost-benefit analysis weights the preferences of the rich more than the
   preferences of the poor (Baker 1975). It is possible to compensate
   roughly for the effects of income and wealth (Harburger 1978,
   Fankhauser et al. 1997), but it is bothersome to do so, and
   cost-benefit analysis is commonly employed without any adjustment for
   wealth or income.

   A further serious difficulty for traditional welfare economics, which
   has been as it were hiding in plain sight, is the fact that choices are
   imperfect indicators of preferences, which are in turn imperfect
   indicators of what enhances well-being. The same facts that show that
   preference satisfaction does not constitute well-being (false beliefs,
   lack of information, other-directed and non-rational preferences) show
   that choices and preferences are sometimes misleading indicators of
   well-being. Moreover, once one recognizes that preferences are good
   indicators of welfare only if agents are good judges of what will
   benefit them, one is bound to recognize that agents are not always good
   judges of what will benefit themselves, even when they have all the
   information they need. In some contexts, these problems may be minor.
   For example, people’s preferences among new automobiles are largely
   self-interested, thoughtful, and well-informed. In other contexts, such
   as environmental protection, preferences for ignoring the problems are
   often badly informed, while preferences to take action are typically
   not self-interested. Either way, popular preferences among policies to
   address environmental problems are unlikely to be a good guide to
   welfare.

   Ignoring these problems has been a great convenience to normative
   economics. If what people choose reveals their preferences, which in
   turn indicate what is good for them, then, as noted before, government
   action to steer someone’s choices can never make that person better
   off, and so questions about whether to endorse paternalistic policies
   cannot arise. But whether or not it is advisable, successful
   paternalism is not impossible; and recent work by behavioral
   economists, which document a wide variety of systematic deliberative
   foibles, has put questions concerning paternalism back on the table
   (Ariely 2009, Kahneman 2011). Some economists have searched for ways to
   identify an agent’s “true” preferences (as described by Infante et al.
   2016). Others have argued that policy makers must respect the
   preferences of agents among their ends or objectives, while overruling
   preferences among means when these are distorted by bad judgment or
   false beliefs (Thaler and Sunstein 2008, Le Grand and New 2015).
   Moreover, Thaler and Sunstein’s proposal that government explore
   non-coercive methods of influencing people to make better choices
   (“nudges”) has been popular among policy makers and has arguably
   shifted philosophical discussion of paternalism away from Mill’s (1859)
   focus on avoiding coercion (Shiffrin 2000, Hausman and Welch 2010, Le
   Grand and New 2015).

6.3 Other directions in normative economics

   Although welfare economics and concerns about efficiency dominate
   normative economics, they do not exhaust the subject, and in
   collaboration with philosophers, economists have made important
   contributions to contemporary work in ethics and normative social and
   political philosophy. Section 5.2 and Section 5.3 gave some hint of the
   contributions of social choice theory and game theory. In addition
   economists and philosophers have worked on the problem of providing a
   formal characterization of freedom so as to bring tools of economic
   analysis to bear (Pattanaik and Xu 1990, Sen 1988, 1990, 1991, Carter
   1999, Sugden 2018). Others have developed formal characterizations of
   social welfare functions that prioritize the interests of those who are
   less well off or that favor equality of resources, opportunity, and
   outcomes and that separate individual and social responsibility for
   inequalities (Pazner and Schmeidler 1974, Varian 1974, 1975, Roemer
   1986b, 1987, Fleurbaey 1995, 2008, Fleurbaey and Maniquet 2014, Greaves
   2015, McCarthy 2015, 2017). John Roemer has put contemporary economic
   modeling to work to offer precise characterizations of exploitation
   (1982). Amartya Sen and Martha Nussbaum have not only developed novel
   interpretations of the proper concerns of normative economics in terms
   of capabilities (Sen 1992, Nussbaum and Sen 1993, Nussbaum 2000), which
   Sen has linked to characterizations of egalitarianism and to
   operational measures of deprivation (1999). There are many lively
   interactions between normative economics and moral philosophy. See also
   the entries on libertarianism, paternalism, egalitarianism, and
   economics [normative] and economic justice.

7. Conclusions

   The frontiers between economics and philosophy concerned with
   methodology, rationality, ethics and normative social and political
   philosophy are buzzing with activity. This activity is diverse and
   concerned with very different questions. Although many of these are
   related, philosophy of economics is not a single unified enterprise. It
   is a collection of separate inquiries linked to one another by
   connections among the questions and by the dominating influence of
   mainstream economic models and techniques.

Bibliography

   The following bibliography is not comprehensive. It generally avoids
   separate citations for methodological essays in collections. It does
   not list separately the essays on economic methodology from special
   issues on philosophy and economics. A large number of essays on
   philosophy of economics can be found in the journals, Economics and
   Philosophy, The Journal of Economic Methodology and the annual series
   Research in the History of Economic Thought and Methodology.

   Readers may want to consult the Journal of Economic Methodology, Vol.
   8, No. 1, March 2001 Millennium symposium on “The Past, Present and
   Future of Economic Methodology” the and Binder et al. 2016. For an
   encyclopedic overview of economic methodology, see the Handbook of
   Economic Methodology edited by Davis, Hands, and Mäki. For a
   comprehensive bibliography of works on economic methodology through
   1988, see Redman 1989. Essays from economics journals are indexed in
   The Journal of Economic Literature, and the Index of Economic Articles
   in Journal and Collective Volumes also indexes collections. Since 1991,
   works on methodology can be found under the number B4. Works on ethics
   and economics can be found under the numbers A13, D6, and I3.
   Discussions of rationality and game theory can be found under A1, C7,
   D00, D7, D8, and D9.

Economic methodology

     * Ackroyd, S. and S. Fleetwood, 2004. Critical Realist Applications
       in Organisation and Management Studies, London: Routledge.
     * Alchian, A., 1950. “Uncertainty, Evolution and Economic Theory”,
       Journal of Political Economy, 57: 211–21.
     * Alt, J., M. Levi, and E. Ostrom (eds.), 1999. Competition and
       Cooperation: Conversations with Nobelists about Economics and
       Political Science, New York: Russell Sage Foundation.
     * Amariglio, J., S. Cullenberg, D. Ruccio (eds.), 2001.
       Post-Modernism, Economics and Knowledge, London: Routledge.
     * Angyrous, G., 1967. “Refutation or Comparison?” British Journal for
       the Philosophy of Science, 17: 279–96.
     * Ardalan, K., 2016, Paradigms in Political Economy, London:
       Routledge.
     * Ariely, D., 2009, Predictably Irrational: The Hidden Forces That
       Shape Our Decisions, New York, Harper.
     * Arrow, K., 1968. “Economic Equilibrium”, pp. 376–89, International
       Encyclopedia of the Social Sciences, New York: Macmillan.
     * –––, 1974. The Limits of Organization, New York: Norton.
     * Arrow, K. and F. Hahn, 1971. General Competitive Analysis, San
       Francisco: Holden-Day.
     * Aruka, Y., 2015. Evolutionary Foundations of Economic Science: How
       Can Scientists Study Evolving Economic Doctrines from the Last
       Centuries?, New York: Springer.
     * Auerbach, P., 2016, Socialist Optimism: An Alternative Political
       Economy for the Twenty-First Century, New York: Palgrave Macmillan.
     * Ayer, A., 1936. Language, Truth and Logic, 2nd edition, reprinted
       New York: Dover, 1946.
     * Backhouse, R. (ed.), 1994. New Perspectives on Economic
       Methodology, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 1997. Truth and Progress in Economic Knowledge, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * –––, 2009. “The Rise and fall of Popper and Lakatos in Economics”,
       pp. 25-48 of Mäki, et al, (2009).
     * –––, 2010. The Puzzle of Modern Economics, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * Backhouse, R., D. Hausman, and U. Mäki (eds.), 1998. Economics and
       Methodology: Crossing Boundaries, London: Palgrave Macmillan.
     * Backhouse, R. and S. Medema, 2009. “The Definition of Economics”,
       Journal of Economic Perspectives, 23(1): 221–33.
     * Backhouse, R. and P. Fontaine (eds.), 2010. The Unsocial Social
       Science? Economics and Neighboring Disciplines since 1945, Durham,
       NC: Duke University Press.
     * Backhouse, R.E. and B.W. Bateman, 2011. Capitalist Revolutionary:
       John Maynard Keynes, Cambridge and London: Harvard University
       Press.
     * Balzer, W. and B. Hamminga (eds.), 1989. Philosophy of Economics,
       Dordrecht: Kluwer-Nijhoff.
     * Bardsley, Nicholas and Robin Cubitt, 2009. Experimental Economics:
       Rethinking the Rules, Princeton, Princeton University Press.
     * Barker, D. and E. Kuiper (eds.), 2003. Toward a Feminist Philosophy
       of Economics, London: Routledge.
     * Bateman, B., 1990. “Keynes, Induction and Econometrics”, History of
       Political Economy, 22: 359–79.
     * Baumberger, J., 1977. “No Kuhnian Revolutions in Economics”,
       Journal of Economic Issues, 11: 1–20.
     * Bavetta, Sebastiano, Pietro Navarra, and Dario Maimone, 2014,
       Freedom and the Pursuit of Happiness: An Economic and Political
       Perspective, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Bear, D. and D. Orr, 1967. “Logic and Expediency in Economic
       Theorizing”, Journal of Political Economy, 75: 188–96.
     * Becker, G., 1962. “Irrational Behavior and Economic Theory”,
       Journal of Political Economy, 70: 1–13.
     * –––, 1976. The Economic Approach to Human Behavior, Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
     * Beckert, J., 2016, Imagined Futures: Fictional Expectations and
       Capitalist Dynamics, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press\.
     * Beed, C., 1991. “Philosophy of Science and Contemporary Economics”,
       Journal of Post Keynesian Economics, 13: 459–94.
     * Begg, D., 1982. The Rational Expectations Revolution in
       Macroeconomics: Theories and Evidence, Baltimore: Johns-Hopkins
       University Press.
     * Bell, D. and I. Kristol (eds.), 1981. The Crisis in Economic
       Theory, New York: Basic Books.
     * Ben-Ner, A. and L. Putterman (eds.), 1998. Economics, Values and
       Organization, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Berger, L., 1989. “Economics and Hermeneutics”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 5: 209–34.
     * Bhaskar, R., M. Archer, A. Collier, T. Lawson, and A. Norrie
       (eds.), 1998. Critical Realism, London: Routledge.
     * Billings, D., 2016, Introducing Economic Actualism, 2nd edition,
       Bloomington, IN: Author House.
     * Binder, C., C. Heilmann, and J. Vromen, 2016. The Future of the
       Philosophy of Economics, London: Routledge.
     * Birks, S., 2015, Rethinking Economics: From Analogies to the Real
       World, New York: Springer.
     * Birner, J., 1990. Strategies and Programmes in Capital Theory: A
       Contribution to the Methodology of Theory Development, Ph.D.
       Dissertation, University of Amsterdam.
     * Blaug, M., 1975. The Cambridge Revolution. Success or Failure?,
       London: Institute of Economic Affairs.
     * –––, 1976. “Kuhn versus Lakatos or, Paradigms versus Research
       Programmes in the History of Economics”, in Latsis (ed.) 1976, pp.
       149–80.
     * –––, 1980a. The Methodology of Economics: Or How Economists
       Explain, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press; Second Edition
       1992.
     * –––, 1980b. A Methodological Appraisal of Marxian Economics,
       Amsterdam: North-Holland.
     * Blinder, A., 1974. “The Economics of Brushing Teeth”, Journal of
       Political Economy, 82: 887–91.
     * –––, 1990. “Learning by Asking Those Who are Doing”, Eastern
       Economic Journal, 16: 297–306.
     * Boehm, S. et al (eds.), 2002. Is There Progress in Economics?
       Knowledge, Truth and the History of Economic Thought, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * Boettke, P.J. (ed.), 2010. Handbook on Contemporary Austrian
       Economics, Cheltenham, UK and Northampton, MA: Elgar.
     * Boettke, P. and, C. Coyne, eds. 2015, The Oxford Handbook of
       Austrian Economics, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Boland, L., 1979. “A Critique of Friedman’s Critics”, Journal of
       Economic Literature, 17: 503–22.
     * –––, 1982. The Foundations of Economic Method, London: George Allen
       & Unwin.
     * –––, 1989. The Methodology of Economic Model Building: Methodology
       after Samuelson, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 1992. The Principles of Economics: Some Lies my Teachers Told
       Me, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 1997. Critical Economic Methodology: A Personal Odyssey,
       London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2014. Model Building in Economics: Its Purposes and
       Limitations, New York: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 2017. Equilibrium Models in Economics: Purposes and Critical
       Limitations, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Bonar, J., 1893. Philosophy and Political Economy, reprinted
       London: Allen & Unwin, 1967.
     * Boulding, K., 1970. Economics as a Science, New York: McGraw-Hill.
     * Boulier, B., 1991. “Pisces Economicus: The Fish as Economic Man”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 7: 83–86.
     * Boumans, M., 2015, Science Outside the Laboratory. Measurement in
       Field Science and Economics, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Boumans, M. and J.B. Davis, 2015. Economic Methodology:
       Understanding Economics as a Science, 2nd edition, New York:
       Palgrave Macmillan.
     * Boylan, T. and P. O’Gorman, 1995. Beyond Rhetoric and Realism in
       Economics: Towards a Reformulation of Economic Methodology, London:
       Routledge.
     * Boylan, T. and P. O’Gorman (eds.), 2007. Popper and Economic
       Methodology: Contemporary Challenges, London: Routledge.
     * Branas–Garza, P. and A. Cabrales (eds.), 2015. Experimental
       Economics, 2 volumes, London: Macmillan.
     * Bray, J., 1977. “The Logic of Scientific Method in Economics”,
       Journal of Economic Studies, 4: 1–28.
     * Brennan J. and P. Jaworski, 2016. Markets Without Limits: Moral
       Virtues and Commercial Interests, London: Routledge.
     * Brennan, T., 1989. “A Methodological Assessment of Multiple Utility
       Frameworks”, Economics and Philosophy, 5: 189–208.
     * Bronfenbrenner, M., 1971. “The Structure of Revolutions in Economic
       Thought”, History of Political Economy, 3: 136–51.
     * Broome, J., 2012, Climate Matters: Ethics in a Warming World, New
       York: Norton.
     * Brousseau, E. and J. Glachant (eds.), 2008. New Institutional
       Economics: A Guidebook, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Brown, Andrew and Steve Fleetwood, 2003. Critical Realism and
       Marxism, London: Routledge.
     * Bruni, L., 2012, The Genesis and Ethos of the Market, New York:
       Palgrave-Macmillan.
     * Brunner, K., 1969. “‘Assumptions’ and the Cognitive Quality of
       Theories”, Synthese, 20: 501–25.
     * Brzezinski, J., F. Coniglione, R. Kuipers, and L. Nowak (eds.),
       1990. Idealization I: General Problems (Poznan Studies in the
       Philosophy of the Sciences and Humanities, Volumes 16), Amsterdam:
       Rodopi.
     * Buchanan, J., 1958. “Ceteris Paribus: Some Notes on Methodology”,
       Southern Economic Journal, 24: 259–70.
     * –––, 1975. The Limits of Liberty: Between Anarchy and the
       Leviathan, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * –––, 1979. What Should Economists Do? Indianapolis: Liberty Press.
     * –––, 2007. Economics from the Outside In: “Better than Plowing” and
       Beyond, College Station: Texas A&M University Press.
     * Buchanan, J. and V. Vanberg, 1979. “The Market as a Creative
       Process”, Economics and Philosophy, 7: 167–86.
     * Buechner, M.N., 2011. Objective Economics: How Ayn Rand’s
       Philosophy Changes Everything about Economics, Lanham, MD: Rowman
       and Littlefield.
     * Cairnes, J., 1875. The Character and Logical Method of Political
       Economy, 2nd edition, reprinted New York: A. M. Kelley, 1965.
     * Caldwell, B., 1982. Beyond Positivism: Economic Methodology in the
       Twentieth Century, London: Allen & Unwin.
     * –––, 1983. “The Neoclassical Maximization Hypothesis: Comment”,
       American Economic Review, 75: 824–7.
     * –––, 1990. “Does Methodology Matter? How Should It Be Practiced?”
       Finnish Economic Papers, 3: 64–71.
     * –––, 1991. “Clarifying Popper”, Journal of Economic Literature, 29:
       1–33.
     * Caldwell, B. (ed.), 1984. Appraisal and Criticism in Economics,
       London: Allen & Unwin.
     * ––– (ed.), 1993. The Philosophy and Methodology of Economics,
       Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Camerer, C., 2003. Behavioral Game Theory: Experiments in Strategic
       Interaction, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * –––, 2007. “Neuroeconomics: Using Neuroscience to Make Economic
       Predictions”, Economic Journal, 117: C26–42.
     * Camerer, C., G. Loewenstein, and M. Rabin (eds.), 2003. Advances in
       Behavioral Economics, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Camerer, C., G. Loewenstein and D. Prelec, 2005. “Neuroeconomics:
       How Neuroscience Can Inform Economics”, Journal of Economic
       Literature, 43: 9–64.
     * Camerer, C., J. Cohen, E. Fehr, P. Glimcher, D. Laibson, G.
       Loewenstein, and R. Montague, 2008. “Neuroeconomics”, in J. Kagel
       and A. Roth (eds.), The Handbook of Experimental Economics,
       Princeton: Princeton University Press, 2nd edition.
     * Camerer, C. and G. Loewenstein (eds.), 2013. Advances in Behavioral
       Economics, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Caplin, A. and A. Schotter (eds.), 2008. Handbook of Economic
       Methodology, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Carpenter, Jeffrey, Glenn Harrison, and John List (eds.), 2005.
       Research in Experimental Economics, Bingley, UK: Emerald
       Publishing.
     * Carter, M. and R. Maddock, 1984. Rational Expectations:
       Macroeconomics for the 1980s? London: Macmillan.
     * Chipman, J., 1965. “The Nature and Meaning of Equilibrium in
       Economic Theory”, in D. Martindale (ed.), Functionalism in the
       Social Sciences: The Strength and Limits of Functionalism in
       Anthropology, Economics, Political Science and Sociology,
       Philadelphia: American Academy of Political and Social Science, pp.
       35–64.
     * Clark, Andrew and Sarah Flèche, 2018. The Origins of Happiness: The
       Science of Well-Being over the Life Course, Princeton: Princeton
       University Press.
     * Clift, E.M. (ed.), 2008. How Language Is Used to Do Business:
       Essays on the Rhetoric of Economics, Lewiston, NY and Queenston,
       Ont.: Edwin Mellen Press.
     * Coase, R., 1960. “The Problem of Social Cost”, Journal of Law and
       Economics, 3: 1–30.
     * Coats, A., 1969. “Is There a ‘Structure of Scientific Revolutions’
       in Economics?” Kyklos, 22: 289–94.
     * –––, 1982. “The Methodology of Economics: Some Recent
       Contributions”, Kylos, 35: 310–21.
     * Coddington, A., 1972. “Positive Economics”, Canadian Journal of
       Economics, 5: 1–15.
     * Coddington, A., 1975. “The Rationale of General Equilibrium
       Theory”, Economic Inquiry, 13: 539–58.
     * Cohen, I., N. Daniels, and N.Eyal (eds.), 2015,Identified Versus
       Statistical Lives: An Interdisciplinary Perspective, New York:
       Oxford University Press.
     * Colander, D. and A. Klamer, 1987. “The Making of An Economist”,
       Journal of Economic Perspectives, 1: 95–112.
     * Cole, K., J. Cameron, and C. Edwards, 1991. What Economists
       Disagree, 2nd ed. London: Longmans.
     * Coleman, J., 1984. “Economics and the Law: A Critical Review of the
       Foundations of the Economic Approach to Law”, Ethics, 94: 649–79.
     * Collins, H., 1991. “The Meaning of Replication and the Science of
       Economics”, History of Political Economy, 23: 123–42.
     * Cook, S.J., 2009. The Intellectual Foundation of Alfred Marshall’s
       Economic Science: A Rounded Globe of Knowledge, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Cooter, R. and P. Rappoport, 1984. “Were the Ordinalists Wrong
       About Welfare Economics?” Journal of Economic Literature, 22:
       507–30.
     * Coyne, C. and V. Storr (eds.), 2015. New Thinking in Austrian
       Political Economy, Bingley, UK: Emerald Publishing.
     * Crespo, R., 2013. Philosophy of the Economy: An Aristotelian
       Approach, New York: Springer.
     * Cross, R., 1982. “The Duhem-Quine Thesis, Lakatos and the Appraisal
       of Theories in Macroeconomics”, Economic Journal, 92: 320–40.
     * Cullenberg, S., J. Amariglio, and F. Ruccio (eds.), 2001.
       Postmodernism, Economics, and Knowledge, London: Routledge.
     * Cyert, R., and E. Grunberg, 1963. “Assumption, Prediction and
       Explanation in Economics”, in Cyert and March 1963, pp. 298–311.
     * Cyert, R. and G. Pottinger, 1979. “Towards a Better Micro-economic
       Theory”, Philosophy of Science, 46: 204–22.
     * Danner, P., 2002. The Economic Person, Lanham, MD: Rowman and
       Littlefield.
     * D’Autume, A. and J. Cartelier (eds.), 1997. Is Economics Becoming a
       Hard Science?, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Davies, William, 2015. The Happiness Industry: How the Government
       and Big Business Sold us Well-Being, London: Verso.
     * Davis, J., 2003. The Theory of the Individual in Economics:
       Identity and Value, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2011. Individuals and Identity in Economics, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Davis, J. (ed.), 2006. Recent Developments in Economic Methodology,
       Cheltenham: Edward Edgar.
     * Davis, J. and M. Boumans, 2010. Economic Methodology: Understanding
       Economics as a Science, London: Palgrave.
     * Davis, J. and D. Wade Hands (eds.), 2011. The Elgar Companion to
       Recent Economic Methodology, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * –––, 2015. Reflexivity and Economics: George Soros’s theory of
       reflexivity and the methodology of economic science, London:
       Routledge.
     * Davis, J., D. Wade Hands, and Uskali Mäki (eds.), 1998. The
       Handbook of Economic Methodology, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Davis, J., A. Marciano, and J. Runde (eds.), 2004. The Elgar
       Companion to Economic and Philosophy, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * De Alessi, L., 1971. “Reversals of Assumptions and Implications”,
       Journal of Political Economy, 79: 867–77.
     * Deaton, A., 2010. “Instruments, Randomization, and Learning about
       Development”, Journal of Economic Literature, 48: 424–55.
     * Debreu, G., 1959. Theory of Value, New York: Wiley.
     * Dekker, E., 2016, The Viennese Students of Civilization: The
       Meaning and Context of Austrian Economics Reconsidered, New York:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Delorme, R., 2010. Deep Complexity and the Social Sciences:
       Experience, Modelling and Operationality (New Horizons in
       Institutional and Evolutionary Economics), Northampton, MA and
       Cheltenham, UK: Elgar.
     * de Marchi, N., 1970. “The Empirical Content and Longevity of
       Ricardian Economics”, Economica, 37: 257–76.
     * de Marchi, N. (ed.), 1988. The Popperian Legacy in Economics,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * ––– (ed.), 1992. Post-Popperian Methodology of Economics:
       Recovering Practice, Boston: Kluwer.
     * De Marchi, D. and M. Blaug (eds.), 1991. Appraising Modern
       Economics: Studies in the Methodology of Scientific Research
       Programs, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * DeVroey, M., 1990. “The Base Camp Paradox: A Reflection on the
       Place of Tâtonnement in General Equilibrium Theory”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 6: 235–54.
     * Diesing, P., 1982. Science and Ideology in the Policy Sciences, New
       York: Aldine.
     * Dietrich, F. and C. List, 2016. “Mentalism versus Behaviourism in
       Economics: A Philosophy-of-Science Perspective”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 32: 249–82
     * Dietsch, P., 2015, Catching Capital: The Ethics of Tax Competition,
       Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Dillard, D., 1978. “Revolutions in Economic Theory”, Southern
       Economic Journal, 44: 705–24.
     * Dolan, E. (ed.), 1976. The Foundations of Modern Austrian
       Economics, Kansas City: Sheed & Ward.
     * Dolan, Paul and Daniel Kahneman, 2014. Happiness by Design: Change
       What You Do, Not How You Think New York: Avery Press.
     * Dopfer, K. and J. Potts, 2008. The General Theory of Economic
       Evolution, New York: Routledge.
     * ––– (eds.), 2014, The New Evolutionary Economics, 3 volumes,
       Cheltenham, U.K.: Elgar.
     * Dow, S., 1985. Macroeconomic Thought: A Methodology Approach,
       Oxford: Blackwell.
     * –––, 2002. Economic Methodology: An Inquiry, Oxford: Oxford
       University Press.
     * –––, 2012. Foundations for New Economic Thinking, London: Palgrave
       Macmillan.
     * Duflo, Esther and Abhijit Banerjee, 2011, Poor Economics, New York:
       Public Affairs.
     * Duflo, Esther and Abhijit Banerjee, 2017, Handbook of Field
       Experiments,Amsterdam: North-Holland.
     * Dugger, W., 1979. “Methodological Differences between Institutional
       and Neoclassical Economics”, Journal of Economic Issues, 13:
       899–909.
     * Durlauf, Steven and Lawrence Blume (eds.), 2009, Behavioural and
       Experimental Economics, London: Macmillan.
     * Dyke, C., 1981. Philosophy of Economics, Englewood Cliffs, NJ:
       Prentice-Hall.
     * Edwards, P., J. Mahoney, and S. Vincent (eds.), 2014,Studying
       Organizations Using Critical Realism: A Practical Guide, Oxford:
       Oxford University Press.
     * Eichner, A., 1983. “Why Economics Is not yet a Science”, in A.
       Eichner (ed.), Why Economics Is not yet a Science, Armonk, NY: M.E.
       Sharpe, pp. 205–41.
     * Elster, J., 1985. Making Sense of Marx, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * Elster, J. and J. Roemer (eds.), 1991. Interpersonal Comparisons of
       Well-Being, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Engle, R., D. Hendry, and J. Richard, 1983. “Exogeneity”,
       Econometrica, 51: 277–304.
     * Engelskirchen, H., 2011. Capital as a Social Kind: Definitions and
       Transformations in the Critique of Political Economy, New York:
       Routledge.
     * Epstein, Brian, 2015, The Ant Trap: Rebuilding the Foundations of
       the Social Sciences, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Etzioni, A., 1988. The Moral Dimension. Toward a New Economics, New
       York: Macmillan.
     * –––, 2018, Happiness is the Wrong Metric: A Liberal Communitarian
       Response to Populism, New York: Springer.
     * Fama, E., 1980. “Agency Problems and the Theory of the Firm”,
       Journal of Political Economy, 88: 288–307.
     * Ferber, M. and J. Nelson (eds.), 2003. Feminist Economics Today:
       Beyond Economic Man, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * Fisher, R., 1986. The Logic of Economic Discovery: Neoclassical
       Economics and the Marginal Revolution, New York: New York
       University Press.
     * Fleetwood, S. (ed.), 1999. Critical Realism in Economics:
       Development and Debate, London: Routledge.
     * Foldvary, F. (ed.), 1996. Beyond Neoclassical Economics: Heterodox
       Approaches to Economic Theory, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Fox, G., 1997. Reason and Reality in the Methodologies of
       Economics, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Frank, R., 1988. Passions within Reason: The Strategic Role of the
       Emotions, New York: W. W. Norton.
     * Frankfurter, G. and E. McGoun (eds.), 2002. From Individualism to
       the Individual: Ideology and Inquiry in Financial Economics,
       Aldershot: Ashgate.
     * Fraser, L., 1937. Economic Thought and Language. A Critique of Some
       Fundamental Concepts, London: A & C Black.
     * Freedman, C.F., 2008. Chicago Fundamentalism: Ideology and
       Methodology in Economics, Hackensack, NJ: World Scientific.
     * Frey, B., 1999. Economics as a Science of Human Behaviour: Towards
       a New Social Science Paradigm, 2nd edition, Dordrecht: Kluwer.
     * –––, 2010. Happiness: A Revolution in Economics, Cambridge: MA: MIT
       Press.
     * –––, 2018. Economics of Happiness, New York: Springer
     * Fréchette, Guillaume and Andrew Schotter, 2015. Handbook of
       Experimental Economic Methodology, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Friedman, M., 1953. “The Methodology of Positive Economics”, Essays
       in Positive Economics, Chicago: University of Chicago Press, pp.
       3–43.
     * –––, 1970. “Leon Walras and His Economic System”, in I. Rima (ed.),
       Readings in the History of Economic Theory, New York: Holt,
       Rinehart & Winston, pp. 145–53.
     * Fullbrook, E., 2004. A Guide to What’s Wrong with Economics, New
       York: Anthem Press.
     * Fullbrook, E. (ed.), 2001. Intersubjectivity in Economics: Agents
       and Structures, London: Routledge.
     * ––– (ed.), 2003. The Crisis in Economics, London: Routledge.
     * ––– (ed.), 2009. Ontology and Economics: Tony Lawson and His
       Critics, New York: Routledge.
     * Furubotn, E.G. and R. Richter (eds.), 2010. The New Institutional
       Economics of Markets, Cheltenham, UK and Northampton, MA: Elgar.
     * Gani, M., 2003. Foundations of Economic Science, Dhaka, Bangladesh
       and Ontario: Scholars.
     * Gaus, G., 2008. On Philosophy, Politics, and Economics, Belmont,
       CA: Wadsworth.
     * Gay, D., 2009. Reflexivity and Development Economics: Methodology,
       Policy and Practice, New York: St. Martin’s Press, Palgrave
       Macmillan.
     * George, D. (ed.), 2007. Issues in Heterodox Economics, Journal of
       Economic Surveys, Volume 21, No. 3, Malden, MA and Oxford:
       Blackwell.
     * Gerrard, B., 1990. “On Matters Methodological in Economics: Review
       Article”, Journal of Economic Surveys, 4: 197–219.
     * –––, 1995. “The Scientific Basis of Economics: A Review of the
       Methodological Debates in Economics and Econometrics”, Scottish
       Journal of Political Economy, 42: 201–20.
     * Georgescu-Roegen, N., 1979. “Methods in Economic Science”, Journal
       of Economic Issues, 13: 317–28.
     * Geweke, J., 1982. “Causality, Exogeneity and Inference”, in W.
       Hildenbrand (ed.), Advances in Econometrics, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * Gibbard, A. and H. Varian, 1978. “Economic Models”, Journal of
       Philosophy, 75: 664–77.
     * Giocoli, Nicola, 2003. Modeling Rational Agents: From Interwar
       Economics to Early Modern Game Theory, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Glimcher, P., 2010. Foundations of Neuroeconomic Analysis. New
       York: Oxford University Press.
     * Glimcher, P., C. Camerer, R. Poldrack, and E. Fehr (eds.), 2009.
       Neuroeconomics: Decision Making and the Brain, Amsterdam: Elsevier.
     * Glimcher, P. and E. Fehr (eds.), 2013. Neuroeconomics, second
       edition, New York: Academic Press.
     * Gonzalez, W., 2008. Scientific Prediction and Economics: A
       Philosophical Analysis, Pittsburgh: University of Pittsburgh Press.
     * Gordon, D., 1955. “Operational Propositions in Economic Theory”,
       Journal of Political Economy, 63: 150–61.
     * Granger, C., 1969. “Investigating Causal Relations by Econometric
       Models and Cross-Spectral Methods”, Econometrica, 37: 424–38.
     * –––, 1980. “Testing for Causality: A Personal Viewpoint”, Journal
       of Economic Dynamics and Control, 2: 329–52.
     * Granovetter, M., 1985. “Economics and Social Structure: The Problem
       of Embeddedness”, American Journal of Sociology 91: 481–510.
     * Grapard, U. and G. Hewitson (eds.), 2011. Robinson Crusoe’s
       Economic Man: A Construction and Deconstruction, New York:
       Routledge.
     * Green, E., 1981. “On the Role of Fundamental Theory in Positive
       Economics”, in Pitt 1981, pp. 5–15.
     * Grönkvist, U., 1992. Economic Methodology: Patterns of Reasoning
       and the Structure of Theories, Lund: University of Lund.
     * Grossbard-Shechtman, S. and C. Clague (eds.), 2002. The Expansion
       of Economics: Toward a more Inclusive Social Science, Armonk, N.Y.:
       M. E. Sharpe.
     * Grundberg, E., 1978. “‘Complexity’ and ‘Open Systems’ in Economic
       Discourse”, Journal of Economic Issues, 12: 541–60.
     * Grüne-Yanoff, T., 2009. “Learning from Minimal Economic Models”,
       Erkenntnis, 70: 81–99.
     * Guala, F., 2000a. “Artefacts in Experimental Economics: Preference
       Reversals and the Becker-DeGroot-Marschak Mechanism”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 16: 47–75.
     * –––, 2000b. “The Logic of Normative Falsification: Rationality and
       Experiments in Decision Theory”, Journal of Economic Methodology,
       7: 59–93.
     * –––, 2005. The Methodology of Experimental Economics, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 2016. Understanding Institutions: The Science and Philosophy
       of Living Together, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Gugerty, Mary Kay and Dean Karlan, 2018. The Goldilocks Challenge:
       Right-Fit Evidence for the Social Sector, Oxford: Oxford University
       Press.
     * Gul, F. and W. Pesandorfer, 2008. “The Case for Mindless
       Economics”, in Caplin and Schotter (eds.) 2008, pp. 3–39.
     * Gurak, H., 2018, Economic Growth and Development 2: Complementary
       Articles in the Pursuit of Economic Realities, Frankfurt am Main:
       Peter Lang.
     * Gustafsson, B., C. Knudsen, and U. Mäki (eds.), 1993. Rationality,
       Institutions and Economic Methodology, London: Routledge.
     * Haavelmo, T., 1944. “The Probability Approach in Econometrics”,
       Econometrica, 12 (Supplement): 1–118.
     * Hahn, F., 1973. “The Winter of Our Discontent”, Economica, 40:
       322–30.
     * Hagedorn, H., 2015, A Model of Austrian Economics, Wiesbaden:
       Springer Gabler.
     * Hahn, F. and M. Hollis (eds.), 1979. Philosophy and Economic
       Theory, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Hall, R. and C. Hitch, 1939. “Price Theory and Business Behaviour”,
       Oxford Economic Papers, 2: 12–45.
     * Hamminga, B., 1983. Neoclassical Theory Structure and Theory
       Development: An Empirical-Philosophical Case Study Concerning the
       Theory of International Trade, Boston: Springer.
     * Hamminga, B. and N. DeMarchi (eds.), 1994. Idealization in
       Economics, Amsterdam: Rodopi.
     * Hammond, J.D., 1991. “Frank Knight’s Antipositivism”, History of
       Political Economy, 23: 355–81.
     * –––, 1992. “An Interview with Milton Friedman on Methodology”, in
       Samuels (ed.) 1992, pp. 91–118.
     * Händler, E., 1980. “The Logical Structure of Modern Neoclassical
       Static Microeconomic Equilibrium Theory”, Erkenntnis, 15: 33–53.
     * Hands, D. W., 1985a. “Karl Popper and Economic Methodology”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 1: 83–100.
     * –––, 1985b. “Second Thoughts on Lakatos”, History of Political
       Economy, 17: 1–16.
     * –––, 1985c. “The Structuralist View of Economic Theories: The Case
       of General Equilibrium in Particular”, Economics and Philosophy, 1:
       303–36.
     * –––, 1988. “Ad Hocness in Economics and the Popperian Tradition”,
       in de Marchi (1988), pp. 121–39.
     * –––, 1992. Testing, Rationality and Progress, Totowa, NJ: Rowman
       and Littlefield.
     * –––, 1995. “Social Epistemology Meets the Invisible Hand: Kitcher
       on the Advancement of Science”, Dialogue, 34: 605–21.
     * –––, 2001. Reflection Without Rules: Economic Methodology and
       Contemporary Science Theory, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Hands, D.W. and P. Mirowski, 1998. “Harold Hotelling and the
       Neoclassical Dream”, in Backhouse et al. (eds.) 1998, pp. 322–397.
     * Harcourt, G. and P. Kriesler (eds.), 2013. The Oxford Handbook of
       Post-Keynesian Economics (Volume 2: Critiques and Methodology),
       Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Hardt, L., 2017. Economics without Laws: Toward a New Philosophy of
       Economics, Cham, Switzerland: Palgrave Macmillan.
     * Harrod, R., 1938. “Scope and Method of Economics”, Economic
       Journal, 48: 383–412.
     * Hausman, D., 1981. Capital, Profits, and Prices: An Essay in the
       Philosophy of Economics, New York: Columbia University Press.
     * –––, 1983. “Are There Causal Relations Among Dependent Variables?”
       Philosophy of Science, 50: 58–81.
     * –––, 1990. “Supply and Demand Explanations and their Ceteris
       Paribus, Clauses”, Review of Political Economy, 2: 168–86.
     * –––, 1992a. Essays on Philosophy and Economic Methodology,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1992b. The Inexact and Separate Science of Economics,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1998. “Problems with Realism in Economics”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 14: 185–213.
     * –––, 2008a. “Why Look Under the Hood”, pp. 217–21 of Hausman 2008b.
     * –––, 2011. “Mistakes about Preferences in the Social Sciences”,
       Philosophy of the Social Sciences, 41: 3–25.
     * –––, 2012. Preference, Value, Choice, and Welfare, New York:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 2013. “Paradox Postponed”, Journal of Economic Methodology,
       20: 250-54.
     * –––, 2015a. “Much Ado about Models”, Review of Mary Morgan, The
       World in the Model: How Economists Work and Think. Journal of
       Economic Methodology. 22: 241–46.
     * –––, 2015b. Valuing Health: Well-Being, Freedom, and Suffering, New
       York: Oxford University Press.
     * Hausman, D. (ed.), 2008b. The Philosophy of Economics: An
       Anthology, 3rd. ed. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Hausman, J., 2016, “Fiscal Policy and Economic Recovery: The Case
       of the 1936 Veterans’ Bonus”, American Economic Review, 106:
       1100—1143.
     * Hayek, F., 1937. “Economics and Knowledge”, Economica, 4: 33–54.
     * Heilbroner, R., 1970. “On the Limited ‘Relevance’ of Economics”,
       Public Interest, 21: 80–93.
     * Helm, D., 1984. “Predictions and Causes: A Comparison of Friedman
       and Hicks on Method”, Oxford Economic Papers, 36 (Supplement):
       118–34.
     * Henderson, W., T. Dudley-Evans, and R. Backhouse (eds.), 1993.
       Economics and Language, London: Routledge.
     * Hendry, D., 1993. Econometrics — Alchemy or Science?, Oxford:
       Blackwell.
     * Herrmann-Pillath, C., 2013. Foundations of Economic Evolution: A
       Treatise on the Natural Philosophy of Economics, Cheltenham, U.K.:
       Elgar.
     * Herzog, L., 2013, Inventing the Market: Smith, Hegel, and Political
       Theory, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Hey, J.D., 1991. Experiments in Economics, Oxford: Blackwell.
     * Hicks, J., 1939. “The Foundations of Welfare Economics”, Economic
       Journal, 49: 696–712.
     * –––, 1979. Causality in Economics, New York: Basic Books.
     * Hicks, J. and R. Allen, 1934. “A Reconsideration of the Theory of
       Value”, Economica, N.S. 1: 52–76 and 196–219.
     * Hirsch, A. and N. de Marchi, 1990. Milton Friedman: Economics in
       Theory and Practice, Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press.
     * Hirsch, F., 1976. The Social Limits to Growth, Cambridge, MA:
       Harvard University Press.
     * Hirschman, A., 1985. “Against Parsimony: Three Easy Ways of
       Complicating Some Categories of Economic Discourse”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 1: 7–22.
     * Hodgson, B., 2001. Economics as Moral Science, Heidelberg and New
       York: Springer.
     * Hodgson, G., 2000. “What Is the Essence of Institutional
       Economics?” Journal of Economic Issues, 34: 317–29.
     * –––, 2004. The Evolution of Institutional Economics, London:
       Routledge.
     * –––, 2013. From Pleasure Machines to Moral Communities: An
       Evolutionary Economics without Homo economicus. London: University
       of Chicago Press.
     * –––, 2016. Conceptualizing Capitalism: Institutions, Evolution,
       Future, London: University of Chicago Press.
     * Hodgson, G.M. and T. Knudsen, 2010. Darwin’s Conjecture: The Search
       for General Principles of Social and Economic Evolution, Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
     * Holcombe, R., 2014. Advanced Introduction to the Austrian School of
       Economics, Cheltenham, U.K. and Northampton, Mass.: Elgar.
     * Holland, J., K. Holyoak, R. Nisbett, and P. Thagard, 1986.
       Induction: Processes of Inference, Learning, and Discovery,
       Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Hollis, M. and E. Nell, 1975. Rational Economic Man: A
       Philosophical Critique of Neo-Classical Economics, London:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Hoover, K., 1988. The New Classical Macroeconomics: A Sceptical
       Inquiry, Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
     * –––, 1994. “Econometrics as Observation: The Lucas Critique and the
       Nature of Econometric Inference”, Journal of Economic Methodology,
       1: 65–80.
     * –––, 2001a. Causality in Macroeconomics, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * –––, 2001b. The Methodology of Empirical Macroeconomics, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Horn, K.I., 2009. Roads to Wisdom, Conversations with Ten Nobel
       Laureates in Economics, Cheltenham, UK and Northampton, MA: Edward
       Elgar.
     * Horwitz, S., 2015, Hayek’s Modern Family: Classical Liberalism and
       the Evolution of Social Institutions, New York: St. Martin’s Press.
     * Hull, D., 1988. Science as a Process: An Evolutionary Account of
       the Social and Conceptual Development of Science, Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
     * Hume, D., 1752. “Of Money”, “Of the Balance of Trade”, reprinted in
       E. Rotwein (ed.), David Hume Writings on Economics, Madison:
       University of Wisconsin Press, 1970.
     * Humphries, J. (ed.), 1995. Gender and Economics, Aldershot: Edward
       Elgar.
     * Hutchison, T., 1938. The Significance and Basic Postulates of
       Economic Theory, reprinted with a new Preface, New York: A.M.
       Kelley, 1960.
     * –––, 1941. “The Significance and Basic Postulates of Economic
       Theory: A Reply to Professor Knight”, Journal of Political Economy,
       49: 732–50.
     * –––, 1956. “Professor Machlup on Verification in Economics”,
       Southern Economic Journal, 22: 476–83.
     * –––, 1960. “Methodological Prescriptions in Economics: A Reply”,
       Economica, 27: 158–60.
     * –––, 1977. Knowledge and Ignorance in Economics, Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
     * –––, 1978. On Revolutions and Progress in Economic Knowledge,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1981. The Politics and Philosophy of Economics: Marxians,
       Keynesians and Austrians, Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
     * –––, 2000. On the Methodology of Economics and the Formalist
       Revolution, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Infante, G., G. Lecouteux, and R. Sugden, 2016. “Preference
       Purification and the Inner Rational Agent: A Critique of the
       Conventional Wisdom of Behavioural Welfare Economics”, Journal of
       Economic Methodology, 23: 1–25.
     * Jacquemet, N. and O. L’Haridon, 2018. Experimental Economics:
       Method and Applications, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Jacobs, M. and M. Mazzucato (eds.), 2016. Rethinking Capitalism:
       Economics and Policy for Sustainable and Inclusive Growth, Oxford:
       Wiley-Blackwell.
     * Jalladeau, J., 1978. “Research Program versus Paradigm in the
       Development of Economics”, Journal of Economic Issues, 12: 583–608.
     * Janssen, M. and Y. Tan, 1992. “Friedman’s Permanent Income
       Hypothesis as an Example of Diagnostic Reasoning”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 8: 23–50.
     * Jarvie, I. and J. Zamora-Bonilla, 2011. The SAGE Handbook of the
       Philosophy of Social Sciences, New York: SAGE Publications.
     * Jensen, M. and W. Meckling, 1976. “Theory of the Firm: Managerial
       Behavior, Agency Costs and Ownership Structure”, Journal of
       Financial Economics, 3: 305–60.
     * Jespersen, J., 2009. Macroeconomic Methodology: A Post-Keynesian
       Perspective, Cheltenham, UK and Northampton, MA: Edward Elgar.
     * Jevons, W., 1871. The Theory of Political Economy, first edition,
       London and New York: MacMillan and Co.
     * Johnson, J., A. Nowak, P. Ormerod, B. Rosewell, and Y. Zhan (eds.),
       2017. Non-equilibrium Social Science and Policy: Introduction and
       Essays on New and Changing Paradigms in Socio-economic Thinking,
       New York: Springer.
     * Kagel, J.H. and A.E. Roth (eds.), 1995. The Handbook of
       Experimental Economics, Princeton: Princeton University Press; 2nd
       edition, 2008.
     * –––, 2016, The Handbook of Experimental Economics (Volume 2),
       Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Kahneman, D., J. Knetsch, and R. Thaler, 1986. “Fairness as a
       Constraint on Profit Seeking”, American Economic Review, 76:
       728–41.
     * Kaldor, N., 1939. “Welfare Propositions of Economics and
       Interpersonal Comparisons of Utility”, Economic Journal, 49:
       549–52.
     * Kamarck, A., 1983. Economics and the Real World, Philadelphia:
       University of Pennsylvania Press.
     * –––, 2001. Economics for the Twenty-First Century: The Economics of
       the Economist-Fox, Aldershot: Ashgate.
     * Karlan, Dean and Jacob Appel, 2018. More Than Good Intentions:
       Improving the Ways the World’s Poor Borrow, Save, Farm, Learn, and
       Stay Healthy, New York, Dutton.
     * –––, 2016. Failing in the Field: What We Can Learn When Field
       Research Goes Wrong, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Katouzian, H., 1980. Ideology and Method in Economics, New York:
       New York University Press.
     * Kaufmann, F., 1933. “On the Subject-Matter and Method of Economic
       Science”, Economica, 13: 381–401.
     * –––, 1934. “The Concept of Law in Economic Science”, Review of
       Economic Studies, 1: 102–9.
     * –––, 1942. “On the Postulates of Economic Theory”, Social Research,
       9: 379–95.
     * –––, 1944. Methodology of the Social Sciences, London: Oxford
       University Press.
     * Keen, S., 2001. Debunking Economics: The Naked Emperor of the
       Social Sciences, New York: St. Martin’s Press.
     * Keynes, J. N., 1917. The Scope and Method of Political Economy, 4th
       edition, reprinted New York: A. M. Kelley, 1955; 1st edition,
       1891..
     * Kincaid, H., 1996. Philosophical Foundations of the Social
       Sciences: Analyzing Controversies in Social Research, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Kincaid, H. and D. Ross (eds.), 2009. Oxford Handbook of Philosophy
       of Economics, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Kincaid, H. (ed.), 2012. The Oxford Handbook of Philosophy of
       Social Science, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Kirman, A., 1992. “Who or What Does the Representative Agent
       Represent?” Journal of Economic Perspectives, 6: 117–36.
     * Kirzner, I., 1976. The Economic Point of View, 2nd edition, Kansas
       City: Sheed & Ward.
     * Klamer, A., 1984. Conversations with Economists: New Classical
       Economists and Opponents Speak Out on the Current Controversy in
       Macroeconomics, Totowa, NJ: Rowman and Allanheld.
     * Klamer, A. and D. Colander, 1990. The Making of An Economist,
       Boulder, CO: Westview Press.
     * Klamer, A., D. McCloskey, and R. Solow (eds.), 1988. The
       Consequences of Economic Rhetoric, New York: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * Klant, J., 1984. The Rules of the Game, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * –––, 1994. The Nature of Economic Thought: Essays in Economic
       Methodology, Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Klappholz, K., 1964. “Value Judgments and Economics”, British
       Journal for the Philosophy of Science, 15: 97–114.
     * Klappholz K. and J. Agassi, 1959. “Methodological Prescriptions in
       Economics”, Economica, 26: 60–74.
     * Knight, F., 1935. “Economics and Human Action”, from Knight 1935b;
       reprinted in Hausman, ed. 2008b, pp. 111–18.
     * –––, 1940. “What is ‘Truth’ in Economics?” Journal of Political
       Economy, 48: 1–32.
     * –––, 1941. “The Significance and Basic Postulates of Economic
       Theory: A Rejoinder”, Journal of Political Economy, 49: 750–3.
     * –––, 1961. “Methodology in Economics”, Southern Economic Journal,
       27: 185–93, 273–82.
     * Koopmans, T., 1957. Three Essays on the State of Economic Science,
       New York: McGraw-Hill.
     * –––, 1979. “Economics Among the Sciences”, American Economic
       Review, 69: 1–13.
     * Koppl, Roger (ed.), 2008. Explorations in Austrian Economics,
       Bingley, UK: JAI Press.
     * Kornai, J., 1971. Anti-Equilibrium: On Economic Systems Theory and
       the Tasks of Research, Amsterdam: North Holland.
     * Koslowski, P. (ed.), 1985. Economics and Philosophy, Tübingen:
       J.C.B. Mohr.
     * Kregel, J., 1976. “Economic Methodology in the Face of Uncertainty:
       The Modeling Methods of Keynes and the Post-Keynesians”, Economic
       Journal, 86: 209-25.
     * Kremer, Michael and Rachel Glennerster, 2011. Small Changes, Big
       Results: Behavioral Economics at Work in Poor Countries, Boston:
       Boston Review Press.
     * Krupp, S. (ed.), 1966. The Structure of Economic Science, Englewood
       Cliffs: Prentice-Hall.
     * Kuipers, T. (ed.), 1987. What is Closer-to-the Truth? A Parade of
       Approaches to Truthlikeness (Poznan Studies in the Philosophy of
       the Sciences and Humanities, Volume 10), Amsterdam: Rodopi.
     * Kunin, L. and F. Weaver, 1971. “On the Structure of Scientific
       Revolutions in Economics”, History of Political Economy, 3: 391–7.
     * Kuorikoski, Ja. and A. Lehtinen, 2009. “Incredible Worlds, Credible
       Results”, Erkenntnis, 70: 119–31.
     * Kydland, V. and E. Prescott, 1991. “The Econometrics of the General
       Equilibrium Approach to Business Cycles”, Scandinavian Journal of
       Economics, 93: 161–78.
     * –––, 1996. “The Computational Experiment: An Econometric Tool”,
       Journal of Economic Perspectives, 10: 69–85.
     * Lachmann, L., 1950. “Economics as a Social Science”, South African
       Journal of Economics, 18: 233–41.
     * Lange, O., 1945. “The Scope and Method of Economics”, Review of
       Economic Studies, 13: 19–32.
     * Latsis, S. (ed.), 1976. Method and Appraisal in Economics,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Lavoie, D. (ed.), 1990. Economics and Hermeneutics, London:
       Routledge.
     * Lawson, T., 1997. Economics and Reality, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2015. Essays on the Nature and State of Economic Theory,
       London: Routledge.
     * Lawson, T. and H. Pesaran, 1985. Keynes’ Economics: Methodological
       Issues, Beckenham, Kent: Croom Helm.
     * Leamer, E., 1983. “Let’s Take the Con Out of Econometrics”,
       American Economic Review, 73: 31–43.
     * –––, 1984. “Vector Autoregressions for Causal Inference?” delivered
       at 1984 Carnegie-Rochester Conference.
     * Lebowitz, M., 2015, The Socialist Imperative: From Gotha to Now,
       New York: Monthly Review Press.
     * Lee, F. and B. Cronin (eds.), 2016, Handbook of Research Methods
       and Applications in Heterodox Economics, Cheltenham, UK: Elgar.
     * Lehtinen, J.K. and P. Ylikoski (eds.), 2012 Economics for Real:
       Uskali Mäki and the Place of Truth in Economics, London: Routledge.
     * Leibenstein, H., 1976. Beyond Economic Man: A New Foundation for
       Economics, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Leijonhufvud, A., 1968. On Keynesian Economics and the Economics of
       Keynes, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * –––, 1973. “Life Among the Econ”, Western Economic Journal, 11:
       327–37.
     * Leonard, Thomas C., 2002 “Reflection on Rules in Science: An
       Invisible-Hand Perspective”, Journal of Economic Methodology, 9:
       141–168.
     * Leontief, W., 1971. “Theoretical Assumptions and Nonobserved
       Facts”, American Economic Review, 61: 1–7.
     * Lester, R.A., 1946. “Shortcomings of Marginal Analysis for
       Wage-Employment Problems”, American Economic Review, 36: 62–82.
     * –––, 1947. “Marginal Costs, Minimum Wages, and Labor Markets”,
       American Economic Review, 37: 135–48.
     * Levine, A., E. Sober, and E. Wright, 1987. “Marxism and
       Methodological Individualism”, New Left Review, 162 (March/April):
       67–84.
     * –––, 1992. Reconstructing Marxism, London: Verso.
     * Lewis, P. (ed.), 2004. Transforming Economics, London: Routledge.
     * Lichtenstein, S. and P. Slovic (eds.), 2006. The Construction of
       Preference, New York: Cambridge University Press.
     * Linsbichler, A., 2017. Was Ludwig von Mises a Conventionalist? A
       New Analysis of the Epistemology of the Austrian School of
       Economics, New York: Springer.
     * Lipsey, R. and K. Lancaster, 1956–7. “The General Theory of the
       Second Best”, Review of Economic Studies, 24: 11–31.
     * List, John and Anya Samek (eds.), 2018, Field Experiments in
       Economics, Northampton: Elgar.
     * Little, D. (ed.), 1993. On the Reliability of Economic Models:
       Essays in the Philosophy of Economics, Boston: Kluwer.
     * Loasby, B., 1976. Choice, Complexity and Ignorance, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1989. The Mind and Method of the Economist: A Criticial
       Appraisal of Major Economists in the 20th Century, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * Loewenstein, G., 2007. Exotic Preferences: Behavioral Economics and
       Human Motivation, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Loewenstein, G., S. Rick, and J.D. Cohen, 2008. “Neuroeconomics”,
       Annual Review of Psychology, 59: 647–672
     * Lowe, A., 1965. On Economic Knowledge. Toward a Science of
       Political Economics, New York: Harper & Row.
     * Lucas, R., 1976. “Econometric Policy Evaluation: A Critique”,
       Journal of Monetary Economics (Supplemental Series) 1: 19–46, 62.
     * McClelland, P., 1975. Causal Explanation and Model Building in
       History, Economics and the New Economic History, Ithaca: Cornell
       University Press.
     * McCloskey, D., 1985. The Rhetoric of Economics, Madison: University
       of Wisconsin Press.
     * –––, 1992. If You’re So Smart: The Narrative of Economic Expertise,
       Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * –––, 1994. Truth and Persuasion in Economics, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * –––, 2000. How to be Human*: *Though an Economist University, Ann
       Arbor, MI: University of Michigan Press.
     * McCloskey, Deirdre N. and Stephen T. Ziliak, 2003. Measurement and
       Meaning in Economics: The Essential Deirdre McCloskey, Northampton,
       MA: Edward Elgar.
     * Machlup, F., 1955. “The Problem of Verification in Economics”,
       Southern Economic Journal, 22: 1–21.
     * –––, 1960. “Operational Concepts and Mental Constructs in Model and
       Theory Formation”, Giornale Degli Economisti, 19: 553–82.
     * –––, 1963. Essays on Economic Semantics, ed. M. Miller. Englewood
       Cliffs: Prentice-Hall.
     * –––, 1964. “Professor Samuelson on Theory and Realism”, American
       Economic Review, 54: 733–6.
     * –––, 1969a. “If Matter Could Talk”, Repr. in Machlup 1978, pp.
       309–32.
     * –––, 1969b. “Positive and Normative Economics”, Repr. in Machlup
       1978, pp. 425–50.
     * –––, 1978. Methodology of Economics and Other Social Sciences, New
       York: Academic Press.
     * MacIntyre, A., 1967. “The Idea of a Social Science”, Proceedings of
       the Aristotelian Society Supplementary Volume 41: 95–114.
     * McKenzie, R., 1983. The Limits of Economic Science, Boston: Kluwer.
     * Mäki, U., 1988. “How to Combine Rhetoric and Realism in the
       Methodology of Economics”, Economics and Philosophy 4: 89–109.
     * –––, 1990a. “Friedman and Realism”, Research in the History of
       Economic Thought and Methodology 10:
     * –––, 1990b. “Mengerian Economics in Realist Perspective”, History
       of Political Economy, 22: 289–310.
     * –––, 1990c. “Scientific Realism and Austrian Explanation”, Review
       of Political Economy, 2: 310–44.
     * –––, 1992. “On the Method of Isolation in Economics”, in C.
       Dilworth (ed.), Intelligibility in Science (Poznan Studies in the
       Philosophy of the Sciences and the Humanities), Amsterdam: Rodopi,
       pp. 317–51.
     * –––, 2005. “Models Are Experiments. Experiments Are Models”,
       Journal of Economic Methodology, 12: 303–15.
     * –––, 2006. “On the method of isolation in economics”, in Recent
       developments in economic methodology, Vol. 3. Davis, J. & J.B.
       Davis, eds. Cheltenham: Edward Edgar pp. 3–37.
     * –––, 2007. Realism and Economic Methodology, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2009a. “Missing the World. Models as Isolations and Credible
       Surrogate Systems” Erkenntnis, 70: 29–43.
     * –––, 2009b. “Realistic Realism about Unrealistic Models”, in Harold
       Kincaid and Don Ross (eds.), The Oxford Handbook of Philosophy of
       Economics, New York: Oxford University Press, 68–98.
     * –––, 2011. “Models and the Locus of their Truth”, Synthese, 180:
       47–63.
     * Mäki, U. (ed.), 1991. Fact and Fiction in Economics: Models,
       Realism and Social Construction, Cambridge: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * ––– (ed.), 2001. The Economic World View: Studies in the Ontology
       of Economics, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * ––– (ed.), 2009c. The Methodology of Positive Economics:
       Reflections on the Milton Friedman Legacy, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * ––– (ed.), 2012. Handbook of the Philosophy of Economics,
       Amsterdam: Elsevier.
     * Mäki, U., B. Gustafsson and C. Knudsen (eds.), 1993. Rationality,
       Institutions and Economic Methodology, London: Routledge.
     * Mäki, U., Dov M. Gabbay, Paul Thagard and John Woods (eds.), 2007.
       The Rise and fall of Popper and Lakatos in Economics, New York:
       Oxford University Press.
     * Malinvaud, E., 1972. Lectures on Microeconomic Theory, tr. A.
       Silvey. Amsterdam: North-Holland.
     * Marcet, Jane, 2009. Conversations on the Nature of Political
       Economy, Reprint edition. New Brunswick, N.J. and London:
       Transaction.
     * Marchionni, C. and J. Vromen (eds.), 2014 Neuroeconomics: Hype or
       Hope?, London: Routledge.
     * Marr, W. and B. Raj (eds.), 1983. How Economists Explain: A Reader
       in Methodology, Lanham, MD: University Press of America.
     * Marschak, J., 1969. “On Econometric Tools”, Synthese, 20: 483–88.
     * Mauro, Carlos, Sofia Miguens and Susana Cadilha, 2013. Converations
       on Human Action and Practical Rationality, Newcastle: Cambridge
       Scholars.
     * Marx, K., 1867. Capital (Volume 1), S. Moore and E. Aveling
       (trans.), New York: International Publishers, 1967.
     * Marwell, G. and R. Ames, 1981. “Economists Free Ride. Does Anyone
       Else? Experiments on the Provision of Public Goods. IV”, Journal of
       Public Economics, 15: 295–310.
     * Mayer, T., 1993. Truth Versus Precision in Economics, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * Medema, S. and W. Samuels (eds.), 1996. Foundations of Research in
       Economics: How do Economists do Economics?, Cheltenham: Edward
       Elgar.
     * Meek, R., 1964. “Value-Judgements in Economics”, British Journal
       for the Philosophy of Science, 15: 89–96.
     * Meidinger, C., 1994. Science Économique: Questions de Mèthode,
       Paris: Vuibert.
     * Melitz, J., 1965. “Friedman and Machlup on the Significance of
       Testing Economic Assumptions”, Journal of Political Economy, 73:
       37–60.
     * Menger, C., 1883. Problems of Economics and Sociology, L. Schneider
       (ed.), F. Nock (trans.), Urbana: University of Illinois Press,
       1963.
     * Menger, K., 2009. Unexplored Dimensions: Karl Menger on Economics
       and Philosophy (1923–1938), Edited by Giandomenica Becchio.
       Bingley, UK: Emerald.
     * Micocci, A., 2016, A Historical Political Economy of Capitalism:
       After Metaphysics, London: Routledge.
     * Mill, J. S., 1836. “On the Definition of Political Economy and the
       Method of Investigation Proper to It”, reprinted in Collected Works
       of John Stuart Mill (Volume 4), Toronto: University of Toronto
       Press, 1967.
     * –––, 1843. A System of Logic, London: Longmans, Green & Co., 1949.
     * –––, 1871. Principles of Political Economy, 7th edition, 1909, W.
       Ashley (ed.), reprinted New York: A. M. Kelley, 1976.
     * Minford, P. and D. Peel, 1983. Rational Expectations and the New
       Macroeconomics, Oxford: Martin Robertson & Co.
     * Mirowski, P., 1988. Against Mechanism: Protecting Economics from
       Science, Totowa, NJ: Rowman and Littlefied.
     * –––, 1990. More Heat Than Light, Cambridge: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * –––, 2002. Machine Dreams: Economics Becomes a Cyborg Science,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 2004. The Effortless Economy of Science?, Durham, NC: Duke
       University Press.
     * –––, 2013, Never Let a Serious Crisis Go to Waste: How
       Neoliberalism Survived the Financial Meltdown, London: Verso.
     * Mirowski, P. (ed.), 1986. The Reconstruction of Economic Theory,
       Boston: Kluwer.
     * Mirowski, P. and E. Sent (eds.), 2002. Science Bought and Sold:
       Essays in the Economics of Science, Chicago: University of Chicago
       Press.
     * Mises, L. von, 1949. Human Action. A Treatise on Economics, New
       Haven, Yale University Press.
     * –––, 1978. The Ultimate Foundation of Economic Science: An Essay on
       Method, 2nd edition, Kansas City: Sheed Andrews.
     * –––, 1981. Epistemological Problems of Economics, G. Reisman
       (trans.), New York: New York University Press.
     * Mishan, E., 1971. Cost Benefit Analysis: An Introduction, New York:
       Praeger.
     * Mongin, P., 1986. “La Controverse sur l’Entreprise (1940–1950) et
       la Formation de l’Irréalisme Méthodologique”, Economies et
       Sociéties (Sèrie Oeconomia) 5: 91–151.
     * –––, 1992. “The ‘Full-Cost’ Controversity of the 1940s and 1950s: A
       Methodological Assessment”, History of Political Economy, 24:
       311–56.
     * Morgan, J. (ed.), 2016, What is Neoclassical Economics? Debating
       the Origins, Meaning and Significance, London: Routledge.
     * Morgan, M., 2001. “Models, Stories, and the Economic World”,
       Journal of Economic Methodology, 8: 361–84.
     * –––, 2004. “Imagination and Imaging in Model Building”, Philosophy
       of Science, 71: 753–66.
     * –––, 2012, The World in the Model: How Economists Work and Think,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Presss.
     * Morgan, M. and M. Rutherford (eds.), 1998. From Interwar Pluralism
       to Postwar Neoclassicism, Durham: Duke University Press.
     * Mueller, J.D., 2010. Redeeming Economics: Rediscovering the Missing
       Element, Culture of Enterprise series. Wilmington, Del.:
       Intercollegiate Studies Institute.
     * Mullainathan, Sendhil and Eldar Shafir, 2013. Scarcity: Why Having
       Too Little Means So Much, London: Times Books.
     * Musgrave, A., 1981. “‘Unreal Assumptions’ in Economic Theory: The
       F-Twist Untwisted”, Kyklos, 34: 377–87.
     * Muth, J., 1961. “Rational Expectations and the Theory of Price
       Movements”, Econometrica, 29: 315–35.
     * Myrdal, G., 1955. The Political Element in the Development of
       Economic Thought, P. Streeten (trans.), Cambridge, MA: Harvard
       University Press.
     * Nagel, E., 1963. “Assumptions in Economic Theory”, American
       Economic Review Papers and Proceedings, 53: 211–19.
     * Nelson, A., 1986. “New Individualistic Foundations for Economics”,
       Noûs, 20: 469–90.
     * Nelson, J., 1995. “Feminism and Economics”, Journal of Economic
       Perspectives, 9: 131–48.
     * –––, 1996. Feminism, Objectivity and Economics, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2001. “Economic Methodology and Feminist Critiques”, Journal
       of Economic Methodology, 8: 93–97.
     * Nell, 2017, Liberty. The Driving Force of the Collective:
       Post-Austrian Theory in Response to Israel Kirzner, New York:
       Springer.
     * Nell, G. (ed.), 2014a. Austrian Economic Perspectives on
       Individualism and Society: Moving Beyond Methodological
       Individualism, New York: St. Martin’s Press.
     * –––, 2014b. Austrian Theory and Economic Organization: Reaching
       beyond Free Market Boundaries, New York: St. Martin’s Press.
     * Nelson, R., 2001. Economics As Religion: From Samuelson to Chicago
       and Beyond, University Park, PA: Pennsylvania State University
       Press.
     * Nelson, R. and S. Winter, 1982. An Evolutionary Theory of Economic
       Change, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Neuberg, L., 1988. Conceptual Anomalies in Economics, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Nowak, L., 1980. The Structure of Idealization: Towards a
       Systematic Interpretation of the Marxian Idea of Science,
       Dordrecht: Reidel.
     * Oakley, A., 2002. Reconstructing Economic Theory: The Problem of
       Human Agency, Cheltenham, Edward Elgar.
     * O’Boyle, E., 1998. Personalist Economics: Moral Convictions,
       Economic Realities, and Social Action, Boston: Kluwer.
     * Ochangco, A., 1999. Rationality in Economic Thought.:
       Methodological Ideas on the History of Political Economy,
       Cheltenham: Edward Elgar.
     * Oliver, A. (ed.), 2013. Behavioural Public Policy, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Ormerod, P., 1997. The Death of Economics, New York: Wiley.
     * –––, 2007. Happiness, Economics and Public Policy, London:
       Institute of Economic Affairs.
     * O’Sullivan, P., 1987. Economic Methodology and Freedom to Choose,
       London: Allen & Unwin.
     * Papandreou, A., 1958. Economics as a Science, Chicago: Lippincott.
     * Pareto, V., 1909. Manual of Political Economy, A. Schwier (trans.),
       New York: A.M. Kelley, 1971.
     * Parsons, T., 1934. “Some Reflections on ‘The Nature and
       Significance of Economics’”, Quarterly Journal of Economics, 48:
       511–45.
     * Peterson, M. (ed.), 2015. The Prisoner’s Dilemma, New York:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Pheby, J., 1988. Methodology and Economics: A Critical
       Introduction, London: Macmillan.
     * Piketty, T., 2014. Capital in the Twenty-First Century, Cambridge,
       MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Pitt, J. (ed.), 1981. Philosophy in Economics, Dordrecht: Reidel.
     * Plott, C.R., 1991. “Will Economics Become an Experimental Science?”
       Southern Economic Journal, 57: 901–919.
     * Popper, K., 1967. “La Rationalité et le Statut du Principe de
       Rationalité”, in E. Classen (ed.), Les Fondements Philosophiques
       des Systèmes Économiques, Paris: Paypot, pp. 142–50.
     * –––, 1976. “The Logic of the Social Sciences”, in T. Adorno et al.
       (eds.), The Positivist Dispute in German Sociology, G. Adey and D.
       Frisby (trans.), New York: Harper, pp. 87–104.
     * Posner, R., 1972. Economic Analysis of Law, Boston: Little, Brown &
       Co.
     * Pratten, S. (ed.), 2015. Social Ontology and Modern Economics,
       London: Routledge.
     * Rabin, M., 1998. “Psychology and Economics”, Journal of Economic
       Literature, 36: 11–46.
     * Radcliff, Benjamin, 2013. The Political Economy of Human Happiness,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Rappaport, S., 1998. Models and Reality in Economics, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * Reder, M., 1999. Economics: The Culture of a Controversial Science,
       Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * Redman, D., 1989. Economic Methodology: A Bibliography with
       References to Works in the Philosophy of Science, 1860–1988, New
       York: Greenwood Press.
     * –––, 1990. Economics and the Philosophy of Science, Oxford: Oxford
       University Press.
     * –––, 1997. The Rise of Political Economy as a Science: Methodology
       and the Classical Economists, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Reiss, J., 2007. Error in Economics: Towards a More Evidence-Based
       Methodology, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2012. “The Explanation Paradox”, Journal of Economic
       Methodology, 19: 43–62.
     * –––, 2013. The Philosophy of Economics: A Contemporary
       Introduction, London: Routledge.
     * Reuter, M. and C. Montag (eds.), 2016. Studies in Neuroscience,
       Psychology and Behavioral Economics, New York: Springer.
     * Ricardo, D., 1817. On the Principles of Political Economy and
       Taxation (Volume 1: The Collected Works of David Ricardo), P.
       Sraffa and M. Dobb (eds.), Cambridge: Cambridge University Press,
       1951.
     * Richter, R. (ed.), 2015, Essays on New Institutional Economics. New
       York: Springer.
     * Robbins, L., 1932. An Essay on the Nature and Significance of
       Economic Science, London: Macmillan; 2nd edition, 1935; 3rd
       edition, 1983.
     * Robinson, J., 1962. Economic Philosophy, Chicago: Aldine.
     * Rochon, L. and S. Rossi (eds.), 2017. A Modern Guide to Rethinking
       Economics. New Directions in Post-Keynesian Economics, Cheltenham,
       UK: Elgar.
     * Rodrik, Dani, 2015. Economics Rules: The Rights and Wrongs of the
       Dismal Science, New York: W.W. Norton.
     * Roscher, W., 1874. Geschichte der National-oekonomik in
       Deutschland, Munich: R. Oldenbourg.
     * Rosenberg, A., 1976. Microeconomic Laws: A Philosophical Analysis,
       Pittsburgh: University of Pittsburgh Press.
     * –––, 1980. Sociobiology and the Preemption of Social Science,
       Baltimore: Johns-Hopkins University Press.
     * –––, 1988. “Economics is too Important to Be Left to the
       Rhetoricians”, Economics and Philosophy, 4: 129–49.
     * –––, 1992. Economics — Mathematical Politics or Science of
       Diminishing Returns, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * Ross, D., 2005. Economic Theory and Cognitive Science:
       Microexplanation, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * –––, 2014. Philosophy of Economics, New York: St. Martin’s Press, .
     * Roth, A., 1988. “Laboratory Experimentation in Economics: A
       Methodological Overview”, Economic Journal, 98: 974–1031.
     * –––, 2015. Who Gets What—and Why: The New Economics of Matchmaking
       and Market Design, New York: Houghton Mifflin Harcourt.
     * Rothbard, M., 1957. “In Defense of ‘Extreme Apriorism’”, Southern
       Economic Journal, 23: 314–20.
     * Rothschild, K., 1993. Ethics and Economic Theory, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * Rotwein, E., 1959. “On ‘The Methodology of Positive Economics’”,
       Quarterly Journal of Economics, 73: 554–75.
     * Roy, S., 1991. Philosophy of Economics: On the Scope of Reason in
       Economic Inquiry, London: Routledge.
     * Ruccio, D. and J. Amariglio, 2003. Postmodern Moments in Modern
       Economics, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Runde, J., 1998. “Assessing Causal Economic Explanations”, Oxford
       Economic Papers, 50: 151–72.
     * Runde, J. and S. Mizuhara (eds.), 2003. The Philosophy of Keynes’
       Economics: Probability, Uncertainty and Convention, London:
       Routledge.
     * Russo, F., 2009. Causality and Causal Modelling in the Social
       Sciences: Measuring Variations, New York: Springer.
     * Rustichini, A., 2005. “Neuroeconomics: Present and Future”, Games
       and Economic Behavior, 52: 201–12.
     * –––, 2009. “Neuroeconomics: What have we found, and what should we
       search for?” Current Opinion in Neurobiology, 19: 672–677.
     * Rutherford, M., 1994. Institutions in Economics: The Old and New
       Institutionalism, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Salanti, A. and E. Screpanti (eds.), 1997. Pluralism in Economics:
       New Perspectives in History and Methodology, Cheltenham: Edward
       Elgar.
     * Samuels, W., 2011. Erasing the Invisible Hand: Essays on an Elusive
       and Misused Concept in Economics (with the assistance of Marianne
       F. Johnson and William H. Perry), Cambridge: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * Samuels, W. (ed.), 1980. The Methodology of Economic Thought:
       Critical Papers from the Journal of Economic Thought [Issues, New
       Brunswick: Transaction Books.
     * ––– (ed.), 1987. History and Methodology of Economics, Greenwich,
       CN, JAI Press.
     * ––– (ed.), 1990. Economics as Discourse, Dordrecht: Kluwer.
     * Samuelson, P., 1947. Foundations of Economic Analysis, Cambridge,
       MA: Harvard University Press.
     * –––, 1963. “Problems of Methodology — Discussion”, American
       Economic Review Papers and Proceedings, 53: 232–36.
     * –––, 1964. “Theory and Realism: A Reply”, American Economic Review,
       54: 736–40.
     * –––, 1965. “Professor Samuelson on Theory and Realism: Reply”,
       American Economic Review, 55: 1162–72.
     * Sassower, R., 1985. Philosophy of Economics, A Critique of
       Demarcation, Lanham, MD: University Press of America.
     * Scazzieri, R., A. Sen, and S. Zamagni (eds.), 2008. Markets, Money
       and Capital: Hicksian Economics for the Twenty-First Century,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Schlefer, J., 2012. The Assumptions Economists Make, Cambridge, MA:
       Harvard University Press.
     * Schmoller, G., 1888. Zur Literatur-geschichte der Staats- und
       Sozialwissenschaften, Leipzig: Duncker & Humblot.
     * –––, 1898. Über einige Grundfragen der Sozialpolitik und der
       Volkswirtshaftslehre, Leipzig: Duncker & Humblot.
     * Schoeffler, S., 1955. The Failures of Economics: A Diagnostic
       Study, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Schrader, D., 1992. The Corporation as Anomaly, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Schumpeter, J., 1954. History of Economic Analysis, New York:
       Oxford University Press.
     * Scott, S., 2013, Architectures of Economic Subjectivity: The
       Philosophical Foundations of the Subject in the History of Economic
       Thought, New York: Routledge.
     * Seligman, B., 1967. “On the Question of Operationalism: A Review
       Article”, American Economic Review, 57: 146–61.
     * –––, 1969. “The Impact of Positivism on Economic Thought”, History
       of Political Economy, 1: 256–78.
     * Sen, A. and B. Williams (eds.), 1982. Utilitarianism and Beyond,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Senior, N., 1836. Outline of the Science of Political Economy,
       reprinted, New York: A. M. Kelley, 1965.
     * Sensat, J., 1988. “Methodological Individualism and Marxism”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 4: 189–220.
     * Sent, E., 1998. The Evolving Rationality of Rational Expectations,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Shackle, G., 1972. Epistemics and Economics: A Critique of Economic
       Doctrines, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Sharpes, D.K., 2009. The Evolution of the Social Sciences, Lanham,
       MD: Rowman and Littlefield, Lexington Books.
     * Shrader-Frechette, K., 1984. Science Policy, Ethics, and Economic
       Methodology: Some Problems of Technology Assessment and
       Environmental-Impact Analysis, Dordrect: D. Reidel.
     * Sidgwick, H., 1885. The Scope and Method of Economic Science,
       reprinted, New York: A. M. Kelley, 1968.
     * Simon, H., 1959. “Theories of Decision-Making in Economics and
       Behavioral Science”, American Economic Review, 49: 253–83.
     * –––, 1963. “Problems of Methodology — Discussion”, American
       Economic Review Papers and Proceedings, 53: 229–31.
     * –––, 1997. An Empirically Based Microeconomics, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Sims, C., 1977. “Exogeneity and Causal Orderings in Macroeconomic
       Models”, in C. Sims (ed.), New Methods in Business Cycle Research,
       Minneapolis: Federal Reserve Bank, pp. 23–43.
     * Smith, A., 1776. An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the
       Wealth of Nations, reprinted, New York: Random House, 1937.
     * Smyth, R. (ed.), 1962. Essays in Economic Method, London:
       Duckworth.
     * Sowell, T., 1980. Knowledge and Decisions, New York: Basic Books.
     * Stanfield, R., 1974. “Kuhnian Revolutions and the Keynesian
       Revolution”, Journal of Economic Issues, 8: 97–109.
     * Starmer, C., 1999. “Experiments in Economics: should we trust the
       dismal scientists in white coats?”, Journal of Economic
       Methodology, 6, 1–30.
     * Stewart, I., 1979. Reasoning and Method in Economics. An
       Introduction to Economic Methodology, London: McGraw-Hill.
     * Stigler, G. J., 1947. “Professor Lester and the Marginalists”,
       American Economic Review, 37: 154–7.
     * Stigum, B., 2003. Econometrics and the Philosophy of Economics:
       Theory“”Data Confrontations in Economics, Princeton: Princeton
       University Press.
     * Sugden, R., 2000. “Credible Worlds: The Status of Theoretical
       Models in Economics”, Journal of Economic Methodology, 7: 1–31.
     * –––, 2009. “Credible Worlds, Capacities and Mechanisms”,
       Erkenntnis, 70: 3–27.
     * Summers, L., 1991. “The Scientific Illusion in Empirical
       Macroeconomics”, Scandinavian Journal of Economics, 93: 129–48.
     * Swedberg, R., 1990. Economics and Sociology--Redefining Their
       Boundaries: Conversations with Economists and Sociologists,
       Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * –––, 2007. Principles of Economic Sociology, Princeton: Princeton
       University Press.
     * Thomas, Rod, 2017. “Karl Popper and the Methodologists of
       Economics”, Cambridge Journal of Economics, 41: 1143–1160.
     * Titmuss, R., 1971. The Gift Relationship: From Human Blood to
       Social Policy, New York: Random House.
     * Veblen, T., 1898. “Why Is Economics Not an Evolutionary Science?”
       Quarterly Journal of Economics, 12: 373–97.
     * Vercelli, A., 1991. Methodological Foundations of Macroeconomics:
       Keynes and Lucas, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Verdon, M., 1996. Keynes and the “Classics”: A Study in Language,
       Epistemology and Mistaken Identities, London: Routledge.
     * Vickers, D., 1995. The Tyranny of the Market: A Critique of
       Theoretical Foundations, Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press.
     * Vromen, J., 1995. Economic Evolution: An Inquiry into the
       Foundations of Institutional Economics, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2009. “Advancing Evolutionary Explanations in Economics: The
       Limited Usefulness of Tinbergen’s Four Questions Classification”,
       in Harold Kincaid and Don Ross (eds.), Oxford Handbook of
       Philosophy of Economics, Oxford: Oxford University Press, 337–368.
     * Vromen, J. and C. Marchionni (eds.), 2018 Neuroeconomics, London:
       Routledge.
     * Ward, B., 1972. What’s Wrong with Economics? New York: Basic Books.
     * Weber, M., 1904. “‘Objectivity’ in Social Science and Social
       Policy”, in E. Shils and H. Finch, eds. The Methodology of the
       Social Sciences, New York, Free Press, 1949, pp. 49–112.
     * Weimann, Joachim and Andreas Knabe, 2015. Measuring Happiness: The
       Economics of Well-Being, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Weintraub, E.R., 1985. General Equilibrium Analysis: Studies in
       Appraisal, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1991. Stabilizing Dynamics: Constructing Economic Knowledge,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 2002. How Economics Became a Mathematical Science, Durham, NC:
       Duke University Press.
     * Wible, J., 1998. The Economics of Science: Methodology and
       Epistemology as if Economics Really Mattered, London: Routledge.
     * Wilber, C. and R. Harrison, 1978. “The Methodological Basis of
       Institutional Economics: Pattern Model, Storytelling and Holism”,
       Journal of Economic Issues, 12: 61–89.
     * Wiles, P. and G. and Routh (eds.), 1984. What is Political Economy?
       Eight Perspectives, Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
     * Wilson, D. and A. Kirman (eds.), 2016, Complexity and Evolution:
       Toward a New Synthesis for Economics, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Winston, G. and R. Teichgraeber (eds.), 1988. The Boundaries of
       Economics, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Winter, S., 1962. “Economic ‘Natural Selection’ and the Theory of
       the Firm”, Yale Economic Essays, 4: 255–72.
     * Wiseman, J. (ed.), 1983. Beyond Positive Economics?, London:
       British Association for the Advancement of Science.
     * Wisman, J. and J. Rozansky, 1991. “The Methodology of
       Institutionalism Revisited”, Journal of Economic Issues, 25:
       709–37.
     * Witt, U. (ed.), 2008. Recent Developments in Evolutionary
       Economics, Cheltenham, UK: Edward Elgar.
     * Wold, H., 1954. “Causality and Econometrics”, Econometrica, 22:
       162–77.
     * Wolpin, K., 2013, The Limits of Inference without Theory. Tjalling
       C. Koopmans Memorial Lectures, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Wong, S., 1978. The Foundations of Paul Samuelson’s Revealed
       Preference Theory, London: Routledge.
     * Worland, S., 1972. “Radical Political Economy as a ‘Scientific
       Revolution.’” Southern Economic Journal, 39: 274–84.
     * Yeager, L., 1969. “Methodenstreit, over Demand Curves”, Journal of
       Political Economy, 68: 53–64.
     * Yuengert, A., 2004. The Boundaries of Technique: Ordering Positive
       and Normative Concerns in Economic Research, Lanham, MD: Lexington
       Books.
     * Zanini, A., 2008. Economic Philosophy: Economic Foundations and
       Political Categories, Cosma E. Orsi (trans.), New York: Lang.
     * Zellner, A. and D. Aigner (eds.), 1988. Causality, special issue,
       Journal of Econometrics, 39(1).
     * Ziliak, Stephen and Deirdre McCloskey, 2008. The Cult of
       Statistical Significance: How the Standard Error Costs Us Jobs,
       Justice, and Lives, Ann Arbor, MI: University of Michigan Press.

Ethics and economics

     * Adler, M., 2012. Well-Being and Fair Distribution: Beyond
       Cost-Benefit Analysis, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Adler, M., and M. Fleurbaey (eds.), 2016. The Oxford Handbook of
       Well-Being and Public Policy, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Adler, M. and E. Posner, 2006. New Foundations of Cost-Benefit
       Analysis, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * ––– (eds.), 2000. Cost-Benefit Analysis: Legal, Economic and
       Philosophical Perspectives, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * Allais, M., 1952. “The Foundations of a Positive Theory of Choice
       involving Risk and a Criticism of the Postulates and Axioms of the
       American School”, in M. Allais and O. Hagen (eds.), Expected
       Utility Hypotheses and the Allais Paradox, Dordrecht: Reidel, 1979,
       pp. 27–145.
     * Anderson, E., 1990. “The Ethical Limitations of the Market”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 6: 179–206.
     * Arneson, R., 1989. “Equality and Equal Opportunity for Welfare”,
       Philosophical Studies, 56: 77–93.
     * Arpaly, N. and T. Schroeder, 2014. In Praise of Desire, New York:
       Oxford University Press.
     * Arrow, K., 1990. “Liberalism, Distributive Subjectivism, and Equal
       Opportunity for Welfare”, Philosophy and Public Affairs, 19:
       158–94.
     * –––, 1951. Social Choice and Individual Values, New York: Wiley;
       2nd edition, 1963.
     * –––, 1967. “Values and Collective Decision Making”, reprinted in
       Hahn & Hollis 1979, pp. 110–26.
     * –––, 1972. “Gifts and Exchanges”, Philosophy and Public Affairs, 1:
       343–62.
     * –––, 1973. “Some Ordinalist-Utilitarian Notes on Rawls’ Theory of
       Justice”, Journal of Philosophy, 70: 245–63.
     * –––, 1978. “Extended Sympathy and the Possibility of Social
       Choice”, Philosophia, 7: 223–37.
     * Atkinson, A., 2015. Inequality: What Can Be Done?, Cambridge, MA:
       Harvard University Press.
     * Axelrod, R., 1984. The Evolution of Cooperation, New York: Basic
       Books.
     * Baker, C., 1975. “The Ideology of the Economic Analysis of Law”,
       Philosophy and Public Affairs, 5: 3–48.
     * Ballet, J., D. Bazin, j. Dubois and F. Mahieu, 2014. Freedom,
       Responsibility and Economics of the Person, London: Routledge.
     * Baumol, W., 1986. Superfairness: Applications and Theory,
       Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Bentham, J., 1789. An Introduction to the Principles of Morals and
       Legislation, W. Harrison (ed.), Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1967.
     * Bergson, A., 1938. “A Reformulation of Certain Aspects of Welfare
       Economics”, Quarterly Journal of Economics, 52: 30–34.
     * Binmore, K., 1994. Playing Fair: Game Theory and the Social
       Contract, Cambridge MA: MIT Press.
     * Boadway, R., 2016. “Cost-Benefit Analysis”, in Adler and Fleurbaey
       (eds.) 2016, pp. 47–81.
     * Boardman, A., D. Greenberg, A. Vining, and D. Weimer, 2010.
       Cost-Benefit Analysis, 4th edition, Englewood Cliffs, NJ:
       Prentice-Hall.
     * Boulding, K., 1969. “Economics as a Moral Science”, American
       Economic Review, 59: 1–12.
     * Bowles, S., 2012. The New Economics of Inequality and
       Redistribution, New York: Cambridge University Press.
     * Bowles, S. and H. Gintis, 1993. “A Political and Economic Case for
       the Democratic Enterprise”, Economics and Philosophy, 9: 75–100.
     * –––, 2011. A Cooperative Species: Human Reciprocity and its
       Evolution, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Brennan, G. and J. Buchanan, 1985. The Reason of Rules:
       Constitutional Political Economy, New York: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * Broome, J., 1989. “Should Social Preferences Be Consistent?”
       Economics and Philosophy, 5: 7–18.
     * –––, 1991. Weighing Goods, Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
     * –––, 1999. Ethics Out of Economics, Cambridge: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * –––, 2006. Weighing Lives, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * –––, 2012. Climate Matters: Ethics in a Warming World, New York:
       Norton.
     * Buchanan, A., 1985. Ethics, Efficiency, and the Market, Totowa, NJ:
       Rowman & Allanheld.
     * Buchanan, J., 1975. The Limits of Liberty: Between Anarchy and
       Leviathan, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * Carter, I., 1999. A Measure of Freedom, Oxford: Oxford University
       Press.
     * Coase, R., 1960. “The Problem of Social Cost”, Journal of Law and
       Economics, 3: 1–30.
     * Cohen, G.A., 1989. “On the Currency of Egalitarian Justice”,
       Ethics, 99: 906–44.
     * Coleman, J., 1984. “Economics and the Law: A Critical Review of the
       Foundations of the Economic Approach to Law”, Ethics, 94: 649–79.
     * Collard, D., 1978. Altruism and Economy: A Study in Non-selfish
       Economics, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * d’Aspremont, C. and L. Gevers, 1977. “Equity and the Informational
       Basis of Collective Choice”, Review of Economic Studies, 44:
       199–209.
     * Deaton, Angus, 2013. The Great Escape: Health, Wealth and the
       Origin of Inequality, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Debreu, G., 1959. Theory of Value, New York: Wiley.
     * Drakopoulos, S., 1991. Values in Economic Theory, Aldershot:
       Avebury.
     * Dworkin, G., G. Bermant and P. Brown (eds.), 1977. Markets and
       Morals, Washington: Hempisphere Publishing.
     * Dworkin, R., 1981. “What is Equality? Part 2: Equality of
       Resources”, Philosophy and Public Affairs, 10: 283–345.
     * Easterly, William, 2013. The Tyranny of Experts: Economists,
       Dictators, and the Forgotten Rights of the Poor, New York: Basic
       Books.
     * Ege, R. and H. Igersheim (eds.), 2011. Freedom and Happiness in
       Economic Thought and Philosophy: From Clash to Reconciliation, New
       York: Routledge.
     * Elster, J. and A. Hylland (eds.), 1986. Foundations of Social
       Choice Theory, New York: Cambridge University Press.
     * Elster, J. and J. Roemer (eds.), 1991. Interpersonal comparisons of
       well-being, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Eyal, N., S. Hurst, O. Norheim, and D. Wikler (eds.), 2013.
       Inequalities in Health: Concepts, Measures and Ethics, Oxford:
       Oxford University Press.
     * Fleurbaey, M., 1995. “Equal Opportunity or Equal Social Outcome”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 11: 25–56.
     * –––, 2002. “Equality of Resources Revisited”, Ethics, 113: 82–105.
     * –––, 2005. “The Pazner-Schmeidler Social Ordering: A Defense”,
       Review of Economic Design, 9: 145–66.
     * –––, 2007. “Social Choice and Just Institutions: New Perspectives”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 23: 15–43.
     * –––, 2008. Fairness, Responsibility, and Welfare, Oxford: Oxford
       University Press.
     * Fleurbaey, M. and D. Blanchet, 2013. Beyond GDP: Measuring Welfare
       and Assessing Sustainability, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Fleurbaey, M. and F. Maniquet, 2014. A Theory of Fairness and
       Social Welfare, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Frank, R., 1988. Passions Within Reason: The Strategic Role of the
       Emotions, New York: W. W. Norton.
     * –––, R., 2007. Falling Behind: How Rising inequality Harms the
       Middle Class, Berkeley, CA: University of California Press.
     * Frank, R., T. Gilovich, and D. Regan, 1993. “Does Studying
       Economics Inhibit Cooperation?” Journal of Economic Perspectives,
       7: 159–72.
     * Fankhauser, S., R. Tol, and D. Pearce, 1997. “The Aggregation of
       Climate Change Damages: A Welfare Theoretic Approach”,
       Environmental and Resource Economics, 10: 249–66.
     * Frey, B., 2010. Happiness: A Revolution in Economics, Cambridge,
       MA: MIT Press.
     * Frey, B. and A. Stutzer, 2001. Happiness and Economics: How the
       Economy and Institutions Affect Human Well-Being, Princeton, NJ:
       Princeton University Press.
     * Friedman, M., 1962. Capitalism and Freedom, Chicago: University of
       Chicago Press.
     * Friedman, M. and R. Friedman, 1980. Free to Choose, New York:
       Harcourt Brace Javanovich.
     * Gaertner, W. and E. Schokkaert, 2012. Empirical Social Choice:
       Questionnaire-Experimental Studies on Distributive Justice,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Gaertner, W., P. Pattanaik, and K. Suzumura, 1992. “Individual
       Rights Revisited”, Economica, 59: 161–77.
     * Gambetta, D. (ed.), 1988. Trust: Making and Breaking Cooperative
       Relations, Oxford: Basil Blackwell.
     * Gardenfors, P., 1981. “Rights, Games and Social Choice”, Noûs, 15:
       341–356.
     * Gaus, Gerald, 2011. The Order of Public Reason: A Theory of Freedom
       and Morality in a Diverse and Bounded World, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * Gauthier, D., 1986. Morals by Agreement, Oxford: Oxford University
       Press.
     * George, D., 2001. Preference Pollution: How Markets Creates Desires
       We Dislike, Ann Arbor: University of Michigan Press.
     * Gibbard, A., 1974. “A Pareto-Consistent Libertarian Claim”, Journal
       of Economic Theory, 7: 388–410.
     * Gilbert, M., 1990. “Walking Together: A Paradigmatic Social
       Phenomenon”, in P. French, T. Uehling and H. Wettstein (eds.),
       Midwest Studies in Philosophy (Volume 15: The Philosophy of the
       Human Sciences), Notre Dame, IN: University of Notre Dame Press,
       pp. 1–14.
     * Gotoh, R. and P. Dumouchel (eds.), 2009 Against Injustice: The New
       Economics of Amartya Sen, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Grant, R., 2012. Strings Attached: Untangling the Ethics of
       Incentives, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Greaves, H., 2015. “‘Antiprioritarianism’”, Utilitas, 27: 1–42.
     * Grether, D. and C. Plott, 1979. “Economic Theory of Choice and the
       Preference Reversal Phenomenon”, American Economic Review, 69:
       623–38.
     * Hamlin, A., 1986. Ethics, Economics, and the State, New York: St.
       Martin’s Press.
     * Hammond, P., 1983. “Ex-Post Optimality as a Dynamically Consistent
       Objective for Collective Choice Under Uncertainty”, in Prasanta
       Pattanaik and Maurice Salles (eds.), Social Choice and Welfare,
       Amsterdam: North-Holland.
     * Harburger, A., 1978. “On the Use of Distributional Weights in
       Social Cost-Benefit Analysis”, Journal of Political Economy, 86:
       s87-s120.
     * Hardin, R., 1982. Collective Action, Baltimore: Johns Hopkins
       University Press.
     * Harris, R. and N. Olewiler, 1979. “The Welfare Economics of Ex
       Post, Optimality”. Economica, 46: 137–147.
     * Harsanyi, J., 1955. “Cardinal Welfare, Individualistic Ethics and
       Interpersonal Comparisons of Utility”, Journal of Political
       Economy, 63: 309–321.
     * –––, 1977a. “Morality and the Theory of Rational Behavior”, Social
       Research, 44; reprinted in Sen and Williams (eds.) 1982, pp. 39–62.
     * Hausman, D., 2010. “Hedonism and Welfare Economics”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 26: 321–44.
     * Hausman, D. and M. McPherson, 2006. Economic Analysis, Moral
       Philosophy, and Public Policy, Cambridge: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * –––, 2007. “The Philosophical Foundations of Mainstream Normative
       Economics”, in The Philosophy of Economics: An Anthology, 3rd
       edition, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, pp. 226–50.
     * –––, 2009. “Preference Satisfaction and Welfare Economics”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 25: 1–25.
     * Hausman, D. and M.S. Waldren, 2011. “Egalitarianism Reconsidered”,
       Journal of Moral Philosophy, 8: 567–86.
     * Hausman, D. and B. Welch, 2010. “To Nudge or Not to Nudge”, Journal
       of Political Philosophy, 18: 123–36.
     * Hausman, D, M. McPherson, and D. Satz, 2017. Economic Analysis,
       Moral Philosophy, and Public Policy, 3rd edition, New York:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Hayek, F. von, 1967. “The Moral Element in Free Enterprise”,
       Studies in Philosophy, Politics and Pconomics, Chicago: University
       of Chicago Press, pp. 229–36.
     * –––, 1976. The Mirage of Social Justice, Chicago: University of
       Chicago Press.
     * Hennipman, P., 1992. “Hicks, Robbins, and the Demise of Pigovian
       Welfare Economics: A Rectification and Amplification”, Southern
       Economic Journal, 59: 88–97.
     * Hicks, J., 1939. “The Foundations of Welfare Economics”, Economic
       Journal, 49: 696–712.
     * Hirose, I., 2015. Moral Aggregation, Oxford: Oxford University
       Press.
     * Hirose, I. and J. Olson (eds.), 2015. The Oxford Handbook of Value
       Theory, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Hirsch, F., 1976. The Social Limits to Growth, Cambridge: Harvard
       University Press.
     * Hook, S. (ed.), 1967. Human Values and Economic Policy, New York:
       New York University Press.
     * Kahneman, D., 1999. “Objective Happiness”, in D. Kahneman, E.
       Diener and N. Schwarz (eds.), Well-Being: Foundations of Hedonic
       Psychology, New York: Russell Sage Foundation Press, pp. 3–27.
     * –––, 2000a. “Evaluation by Moments: Past and Future”, in Kahneman
       and Tversky (eds.) 2000, pp. 693–708.
     * –––, 2000b. “Experienced Utility and Objective Happiness: A
       Moment-based Approach”, in Kahneman and Tversky (eds.) 2000, pp.
       673–92.
     * –––, 2011. Thinking Fast and Slow, New York: Farrar, Straus and
       Giroux.
     * Kahneman, D. and A. Krueger, 2006. “Developments in the Measurement
       of Subjective Well Being”, Journal of Economic Perspectives, 20:
       3–24.
     * Kahneman, D. and R. Sugden, 2005. “Experienced Utility as a
       Standard of Policy Evaluation”, Environmental & Resource Economics,
       32: 161–181.
     * Kahneman, D. and R. Thaler, 2006. “Utility Maximization and
       Experienced Utility”, Journal of Economic Perspectives, 20: 221–34.
     * Kahneman, D. and A. Tversky (eds.), 2000. Choices, Values and
       Frames, New York: Cambridge University Press and the Russell Sage
       Foundation.
     * Kalai, E. and M. Smorodinsky, 1975. “Other Solutions to Nash’s
       Bargaining Problem”, Econometrica, 43: 513–18.
     * Kaldor, N., 1939. “Welfare Propositions of Economics and
       Interpersonal Comparisons of Utility”, Economic Journal, 49:
       549–52.
     * Kelman, S., 1981. What Price Incentives?, Boston, MA: Auburn House.
     * Knight, F., 1935. “Economics and Human Action”, in The Ethics of
       Competition, and other Essays, New York and London: Harper &
       Brothers.
     * Kolm, S.-C., 1972. Justice et équité, Paris: Editions du Centre
       National de la Recherche Scientifique.
     * Kraus, J. and J. Coleman, 1987. “Morality and the Theory of
       Rational Choice”, Ethics, 97: 715–49.
     * Layard, R., 2006. Happiness: Lessons from a New Science, New York:
       Penguin.
     * Le Grand, J., 1991. Equity and Choice, London: Routledge.
     * –––, 2003. Motivation, Agency, and Public Policy: Of Knights and
       Knaves, Pawns and Queens, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Le Grand, J., and B. New, 2015. Government Paternalism: Nanny State
       or Helpful Friend?, Princeton: Princeton University Press.
     * Lippert-Rasmussen, K., 2014. Born Free and Equal?: A Philosophical
       Inquiry into the Nature of Discrimination, Oxford: Oxford
       University Press.
     * Little, I., 1957. A Critique of Welfare Economics, 2nd edition,
       Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Lomasky, L., 1987. Persons, Rights and the Moral Community, New
       York: Oxford University Press.
     * MacCallum, G., 1967. “Negative and Positive Freedom”, Philosophical
       Review, 76: 312–34.
     * McCarthy, D., 2015. “Distributive equality”,, Mind, 124: 1045–1109.
     * –––, 2017, “The Priority View”, Economics and Philosophy, 33:
       215–57.
     * MacKay, A., 1980. Arrow’s Theorem: The Paradox of Social Choice. A
       Case Study in the Philosophy of Economics, New Haven: Yale
       University Press.
     * –––, 1986. “Extended Sympathy and Interpersonal Utility
       Comparisons”, Journal of Philosophy, 83: 305–22.
     * McKean, R., 1975. “Economics of Trust, Altruism, and Corporate
       Responsibility”, in Edmund Phelps (ed.), Altruism, Morality and
       Economic Theory, New York: Russell Sage Foundation, pp. 29–44.
     * Mansbridge, J. (ed.), 1990. Beyond Self-interest, Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press, pp. 254–263.
     * Margolis, H., 1982. Selfishness, Altruism and Rationality,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Marwell, G. and R. Ames, 1981. “Economists Free Ride. Does Anyone
       Else? Experiments on the Provision of Public Goods. IV”, Journal of
       Public Economics, 15: 295–310.
     * Meade, J., 1964. Efficiency, Equality and the Ownership of
       Property, London: George Allen & Unwin.
     * Mill, J.S., 1859. On Liberty, reprinted Indianapolis, Hackett,
       1978.
     * Miller, D., 2012, Justice for Earthlings: Essays in Political
       Philosophy, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Mirowski, P. and D. Plehwe (eds.), 2009. The Road from Mont
       Pèlerin: The Making of the Neoliberal Thought Collective,
       Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Mishan, E., 1971. Cost Benefit Analysis: An Introduction, New York:
       Praeger.
     * Mongin, P., 1995. “Consistent Bayesian Aggregation”, Econometrica,
       66: 313–51.
     * –––, 2006. “Value Judgments and Value Neutrality in Economics”,
       Economica, 73: 257–86.
     * Morris, C.W. (ed.), 2010 Amartya Sen. Contemporary Philosophy in
       Focus, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Nash, J., 1950, “The Bargaining Problem”, Econometrica, 18: 155–62.
     * Nelson, A., 1988. “Economic Rationality and Morality”, Philosophy
       and Public Affairs, 17: 149–66.
     * Ng, Y., 1983. Welfare Economics: Introduction and Development of
       Basic Concepts, revised edition, London: Macmillan.
     * Nussbaum, M. and A. Sen (eds.), 1993, The Quality of Life, Oxford:
       Clarendon Press.
     * Okasha, S. and K. Binmore, 2012. Evolution and Rationality:
       Decisions, Cooperation, and Strategic Behaviour, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Okun, A., 1975. Equality and Efficiency: The Big Tradeoff,
       Washington, DC: Brookings Institution.
     * Pattinaik, P. and Y. Xu, 1990. “On Ranking Opportunity Sets in
       Terms of Freedom of Choice”, Rescherches Economiques de Louvain,
       56: 383–90.
     * Pazner, E. and D. Schmeidler, 1974. “A Difficulty in the Concept of
       Fairness”, Review of Economic Studies, 41: 441–43.
     * Peter, F. and H.B. Schmid (eds.), 2007. Rationality and Commitment,
       Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Pettit, P., 1990. “Virtus Normativa: Rational Choice Perspectives”,
       Ethics, 100: 725–55.
     * Pettit, P. and R. Sugden, 1989. “The Backward Induction Paradox”,
       Journal of Philosophy, 86: 169–82.
     * Posner, R., 1972. Economic Analysis of Law, Boston: Little, Brown &
       Co.
     * Reder, M., 1979, “The Place of Ethics in the Theory of Production”,
       in M. Boskin (ed.), Economics and Human Welfare: Essays in Honor of
       Tibor Scitovsky, New York: Academic Press, pp. 133–146.
     * Robertson, D., 1956. “What Does the Economist Economize?” in
       Economic Commentaries, London: Staples Press, pp. 147–55.
     * Roemer, J., 1985. “Equality of Talent”, Economics and Philosophy,
       1: 151–88.
     * –––, 1986a. “The Mismarriage of Bargaining Theory and Distributive
       Justice”, Ethics, 97: 88–110.
     * –––, 1986b. “Equality of Resources Implies Equality of Welfare”,
       Quarterly Journal of Economics, 101: 751–784.
     * –––, 1987. “Egalitarianism, Responsibility, and Information”,
       Economics and Philosophy, 3: 215–44.
     * Rothschild, K., 1993. Ethics and Economic Theory, Cheltenham:
       Edward Elgar.
     * Saint-Paul, G., 2011. The Tyranny of Utility: Behavioral Social
       Science and the Rise of Paternalism, Princeton: Princeton
       University Press.
     * Samuelson, P., 1947. Foundations of Economic Analysis, Cambridge,
       MA: Harvard University Press.
     * –––, 1950. “Evaluation of Real National Income”, Oxford Economic
       Papers (New Series), 2(1): 1–29.
     * Sandel, M., 2012. What Money Can’t Buy: The Moral Limits of
       Markets, London: Allen Lane.
     * Satz, D., 2011. Why Some Things Should Not be for Sale: The Moral
       Limits of Markets, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Scanlon, T., 1975. “Preference and Urgency”, Journal of Philosophy,
       72: 655–670.
     * –––, 1986. “Equality of Resources and Equality of Welfare: A Forced
       Marriage?” Ethics, 97: 111–18.
     * Schotter, A., 1981. The Economic Theory of Social Institutions,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Scitovsky, T., 1941. “A Note on Welfare Propositions in Economics”,
       Review of Economic Studies, 9: 77–88.
     * Seidenfeld T., J. Kadane and M. Schervish, 1989. “On the Shared
       Preferences of Two Bayesian Decision Makers”, Journal of
       Philosophy, 86: 225–44.
     * Sen, A., 1970a. Collective Welfare and Social Choice, San
       Francisco: Holden-Day.
     * –––, 1970b. “The Impossibility of a Paretian Liberal”, Journal of
       Political Economy, 78: 152–57.
     * –––, 1976. “Liberty, Unanimity and Rights”, Economica, 43: 217–45.
     * –––, 1987a. On Ethics and Economics, Oxford: Blackwells.
     * –––, 1987b. “The Standard of Living: Lecture I, Concepts and
       Critiques”,, pp. 1–19 of Sen, et al. 1987.
     * –––, 1987c. “The Standard of Living: Lecture II, Lives and
       Capabilities”,, pp. 20–38 of Sen, et al. 1987.
     * –––, 1988. “Freedom of Choice: Concept and Content”, European
       Economic Review, 32: 269–94.
     * –––, 1990. “Welfare, Freedom and Social Choice: a Reply”
       Rescherches Economiques de Louvain, 56: 451–86.
     * –––, 1991. “Welfare, Preference, and Freedom”, Journal of
       Econometrics, 50: 15–29.
     * –––, 1992. Inequality reexamined, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University
       Press.
     * –––, 1999. Development as Freedom, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Sen, A. and B. Williams (eds.), 1982. Utilitarianism and Beyond,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Shiffrin, Seana, 2000, “Paternalism, Unconscionability Doctrine,
       and Accommodation”, Philosophy & Public Affairs, 29: 205–50.
     * Sidgwick, H., 1901. The Methods of Ethics, 6th edition, London:
       Macmillan.
     * Steel, D., 2015. Philosophy of the Precautionary Principle,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Streeten, P., 1953. “Appendix: Recent Controversies”, in Gunnar
       Myrdal, The Political Element in the Development of Economic
       Theory, P. Streeten (trans.), London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, pp.
       208–17.
     * Sugden, R., 1985. “Liberty, Preference and Choice”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 2: 213–31.
     * –––, 1986. The Economics of Rights, Co-operation and Welfare, New
       York: Blackwell.
     * –––, 1989. “Spontaneous Order”, Journal of Economic Perspectives,
       3: 85–97.
     * –––, 1990. “Contractarianism and Norms”, Ethics, 100: 768–86.
     * –––, 2018, The Community of Advantage: A Behavioural Economist’s
       Defence of the Market, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Sugden, R. and A. Williams, 1978. The Principles of Practical
       Cost-benefit Analysis, New York: Oxford University Press.
     * Taylor, M., 1987. The Possibility of Cooperation, New York:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Thaler, R. and C. Sunstein, 2008. Nudge: Improving Decisions about
       Health, Wealth, and Happiness, New Haven, CT: Yale University
       Press.
     * Titmuss, R., 1971. The Gift Relationship: From Human Blood to
       Social Policy, New York: Random House.
     * Tversky, A. and R. Thaler, 1990. “Preference Reversals”, Journal of
       Economic Perspectives, 4: 201–11.
     * van Parijs, P., 1990. “The Second Marriage of Justice and
       Efficiency”, Journal of Social Policy, 19: 1–25.
     * Varian, H., 1974. “Equity, Envy and Efficiency”, Journal of
       Economic Theory, 9: 63–91.
     * –––, 1975. “Distributive Justice, Welfare Economics and the Theory
       of Fairness”, Philosophy and Public Affairs, 4: 223–47.
     * –––, 1985. “Dworkin on Equality of Resources”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 1: 110–27.
     * Vickers, D., 1997. Economics and Ethics: An Introduction to Theory,
       Institutions, and Policy, London: Greenwood, Praeger.
     * Vickrey, W., 1960. “Utility, Strategy, and Social Decision Rules”,
       Quarterly Journal of Economics, 74: 507–35.
     * Wenar, L., 2016. Blood Oil: Tyrants, Violence and the Rules that
       Run the World, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Weymark, J., 1991, “A Reconsideration of the Harsanyi-Sen Debate on
       Utilitarianism”, in Elster and Roemer 1991, pp. 255–320.
     * Yaari, M. and M. Bar-Hillel, 1984. “On Dividing Justly”, Social
       Choice and Welfare, 1: 1–24.

Rationality

     * Allais, M. and O. Hagen (eds.), 1979. Expected Utility Hypotheses
       and the Allais Paradox, Dordrecht: Reidel.
     * Barberà, S., P. Hammond and C. Seidl, 1999. Handbook of Utility
       Theory: Volume 1 Principles, Dordrecht: Kluwer.
     * Bicchieri, C., 1993. Rational and Coordination, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Binmore, K., 1987/1988. “Modeling Rational Players”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 3: 179–214 and 4: 9–56.
     * –––, 1992. Fun and games, New York: D.C Heath.
     * Bonnano, G., 1991. “The Logic of Rational Play in Games of Perfect
       Information”, Economics and Philosophy, 7: 37–65.
     * Broome, J., 1991. “Utility”, Economics and Philosophy, 7: 1–12.
     * Buchak, L., 2013, Risk and Rationality, New York: Oxford University
       Press.
     * Dennis, K. (ed.), 1998. Rationality in Economics: Alternative
       Perspectives, Boston: Kluwer.
     * Eells, E., 1982. Rational Decision and Causality, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Ellsberg, D., 1954. “Classic and Current Notions of ‘Measurable
       Utility.’” Economic Journal, 64: 528–56; reprinted in A. Page
       (ed.), Utility Theory: A Book of Readings, New York: Wiley, 1968,
       pp. 269–96.
     * Elster, J., 1979, Ulysses and the Sirens: Studies in Rationality
       and Irrationality, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1983. Sour Grapes: Studies in the Subversion of Rationality,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Friedman, M. and L. Savage, 1948. “The Utility Analysis of Choices
       Involving Risk”, Journal of Political Economy, 56: 279–304.
     * Friedman, M. and L. Savage, 1952. “The Expected-Utility Hypothesis
       and the Measurability of Utility”, Journal of Political Economy,
       60: 463–74.
     * Gerrard, B., 1993. The Economics of Rationality, London: Routledge.
     * Gilboa, I., 2010. Rational Choice, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Gilboa, I., L. Samuelson, and D. Schmeidler, 2015. Analogies and
       Theories: Formal Models of Reasoning, New York: Oxford University
       Press.
     * Gilboa, I., and D. Schmeidler, 2001. A Theory of Case-Based
       Decisions, New York: Cambridge University Press Press.
     * Grether, D. and C. Plott, 1979. “Economic Theory of Choice and the
       Preference Reversal Phenomenon”, American Economic Review, 69:
       623–38.
     * Hargreaves-Heap, S., 1989. Rationality in Economics, Oxford:
       Blackwell.
     * Harsanyi, J., 1977b. Rational Behavior and Bargaining Equilibrium
       in Games and Social Situations, Cambridge: Cambridge University
       Press.
     * Hausman, D., 2012. Preference, Value, Choice and Welfare,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Hernstein, I. and J. Milnor, 1953. “An Axiomatic Approach to
       Measurable Utility”, Econometrica, 21: 291–7.
     * Houtthaker, H., 1950. “Revealed Preference and the Utility
       Function”, Economica, 17: 159–74.
     * Howson, C. and P. Urbach, 1989. Scientific Reasoning: The Bayesian
       Approach, LaSalle, IL: Open Court.
     * Jeffrey, R., 1983. The Logic of Decision, 2nd edition, Chicago:
       University of Chicago Press.
     * Kahneman, D. and A. Tversky, 1979. “Prospect Theory: An Analysis of
       Decision Making under Risk”, Econometrica 47: 263–91.
     * Kreps, D., P. Milgrom, J. Roberts, and R. Wilson, 1982. “Rational
       Cooperation in the Finitely Repeated Prisoners’ Dilemma”, Journal
       of Economic Theory, 27: 245–52.
     * Levi, I., 1980. The Enterprise of Knowledge, Cambridge, MA: MIT
       Press.
     * –––, 1986. “The Paradoxes of Allais and Ellsberg”, Economics and
       Philosophy, 2: 23–53.
     * –––, 1990. “Pareto Unanimity and Consensus”, Journal of Philosophy,
       89: 481–92.
     * Lichtenstein, S. and P. Slovic, 1971. “Reversals of Preference
       Between Bids and Choices in Gambling Decisions”, Journal of
       Experimental Psychology, 89: 46–55.
     * List, C. and P. Pettit, 2002. “Aggregating Sets of Judgments: An
       Impossibility Result”, Economics and Philosophy, 18: 89–110.
     * Loomes, G. and R. Sugden, 1982. “Regret Theory: an Alternative
       Theory of Rational Choice under Uncertainty”, Economic Journal, 92:
       805–24.
     * Luce, R. and H. Raiffa, 1957. Games and Decisions, New York: Wiley.
     * McClennen, E., 1983. “Sure Thing Doubts”, in B. Stigum and F.
       Wenstop (eds.), Foundations of Utility and Risk Theory with
       Applications, Dordrecht: Reidel.
     * –––, 1990. Rationality and Dynamic Choice: Foundational
       Explorations, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Machina, M., 1987. “Choice under Uncertainty: Problems Solved and
       Unsolved”, Journal of Economic Perspectives, 1: 121–54.
     * Paul, L.A., 2014, Epistemic Transformation and Rational Choice:
       Transformative Experience, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Pettit, P. and R. Sugden, 1989. “The Backward Induction Paradox”,
       Journal of Philosophy, 86: 169–82.
     * Ramsey, F., 1926. “Truth and Probability”, in R. Braithwaite (ed.),
       The Foundations of Mathematics and other Logical Essays, London:
       Routledge & Kegan Paul, pp. 156–98.
     * Resnik, M., 1987. Choices: An Introduction to Decision Theory,
       Minneapolis: University of Minnesota Press.
     * Roth, A. and M. Malouf, 1979. “Game Theoretical Models and the Role
       of Information in Bargaining”, Psychological Review, 86: 574–94.
     * Savage, L., 1972. The Foundations of Statistics, New York: Dover.
     * Schick, F., 1986. “Money Pumps and Dutch Bookies”, Journal of
       Philosophy, 83: 112–19.
     * Sen, A., 1970. Collective Welfare and Social Choice, San Francisco:
       Holden-Day.
     * –––, 1971. “Choice Functions and Revealed Preference”, Review of
       Economic Studies, 38: 307–17.
     * –––, 1973. “Behaviour and the Concept of Preference”, Economica,
       40: 241–59.
     * –––, 1977. “Rational Fools”, in Hahn and Hollis 1981, pp. 87–109.
     * Simon, H. 1976. “From Substantive to Procedural Rationality”, in
       Latsis (ed.) 1976, pp. 129–48.
     * Stone, P., 2011. The Luck of the Draw: The Role of Lotteries in
       Decision Making, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Sugden, R., 1986. “New Developments in the Theory of Choice Under
       Uncertainty”, Bulletin of Economic Research, 38: 1–24
     * Vickrey, W., 1945. “Measuring Marginal Utility by Reactions to
       Risk”, Econometrica, 13: 319–33.
     * von Neumann, J. and O. Morgenstern, 1947. Theory of Games and
       Economic Behavior, 2nd edition, Princeton: Princeton University
       Press.
     * Young, Peyton, 1998. Individual Strategy and Social Structure,
       Princeton: Princeton University Press.

Other works cited

     * Backhouse, R., 2002. The Ordinary Business of Life, Princeton:
       Princeton University Press.
     * Becker, G., 1981. A Treatise on the Family, Cambridge, MA: Harvard
       University Press.
     * Bentham, J., 1789. An Introduction to the Principles of Morals and
       Legislation, W. Harrison (ed.), Oxford: Basil Blackwell, 1967.
     * Bhaskar, R., 1975. A Realist Theory of Science, Leeds: Leeds Press.
     * Boyd, R., 1984. “The Current Status of Scientific Realism”, in J.
       Leplin (ed.), Scientific Realism, Berkeley: University of
       California Press, pp. 41–82.
     * Cantillon, R., 1952. “Essai sur la nature du commerce en général”,
       Paris: Institut national d’études démographiques. translated
       version available on-line.
     * Cartwright, N., 1983. How the Laws of Physics Lie, Oxford:
       Clarendon Press.
     * –––, 1989. Nature’s Capacities and their Measurement, Oxford:
       Clarendon Press.
     * –––, 2007. Hunting Causes and Using Them: Approaches in Philosophy
       and Economics, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Cartwright, Nancy and Jeremy Hardie, 2013. Evidence-Based Policy: A
       Practical Guide to Doing it Better, Oxford: Oxford University
       Press.
     * Chakravartty, Anjan, 2010. A Metaphysics for Scientific Realism:
       Knowing the Unobservable, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Coase, R., 1937. “The Nature of the Firm”, Economica 4: 386–405
     * Davidson, D., 1963. “Actions, Reasons and Causes”, Journal of
       Philosophy, 60: 685–700.
     * Dicken, Paul, 2016. A Critical Introduction to Scientific Realism,
       London: Bloomsbury Academic Press.
     * Duhem, P., 1906. The Aim and Structure of Scientific Theories, P.
       Wiener (trans.), Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1954.
     * Fish, S., 1980. Is There a Text in This Class? The Authority of
       Interpretive Communities, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Frigg, R., 2010. “Fiction and Scientific Representation”, in R.
       Frigg and M.C. Hunter (eds.), Beyond Mimesis and Convention, New
       York: Springer.
     * Godfrey-Smith, P., 2006. “The Strategy of Model-Based Science”,
       Biology and Philosophy, 21: 725–40.
     * Kuhn, T., 1970. The Structure of Scientific Revolutions, 2nd
       edition, Chicago: University of Chicago Press.
     * Lakatos, I., 1970. “Falsification and the Methodology of Scientific
       Research Programmes”, in Lakatos and Musgrave 1970, pp. 91–196;
       also in Lakatos 1978b, Volume 1, pp. 8–101.
     * –––, 1974. “Popper on Demarcation and Induction”, in P. Schlipp
       (ed.), The Philosophy of Karl Popper, LaSalle, IL, Open Court, pp.
       241–73; reprinted in Lakatos 1978b, Volume 1, 139–67.
     * Lakatos, I. and A. Musgrave (eds.), 1970. Criticism and the Growth
       of Knowledge, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Morgan, M. and M. Morrison (eds.), 1999. Models as Mediators:
       Perspectives on Natural and Social Science, Cambridge: Cambridge
       University Press.
     * Morgenbesser, S., 1956. “Theories and Schemata in the Social
       Sciences”, Ph.D. Dissertation, University of Pennsylvania.
     * Morishima, M., 1973. Marx’s Economics: A Dual Theory of Value and
       Growth, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Niiniluoto, Ilkka, 2002. Critical Scientific Realism, Oxford:
       Oxford University Press.
     * North, D., 1990. Institutions, Institutional Change and Economic
       Performance, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Nozick, R., 1974. Anarchy, State and Utopia, New York: Basic Books.
     * Nussbaum, M., 2000. Women and Economic Development: The
       Capabilities Approach, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Ochs, J. and A. Roth, 1989. “An Experimental Study of Sequential
       Bargaining”, American Economic Review, 79: 355–84.
     * Pasinetti, L., 1981. Structural Change and Economic Growth: A
       Theoretical Essay on the Dynamics of the Wealth of Nations,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Pearl, J., 2000. Causality, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * Popper, K., 1968. The Logic of Scientific Discovery, revised
       edition, London: Hutchinson & Co.
     * –––, 1969. Conjectures and Refutations; The Growth of Scientific
       Knowledge, 3rd edition, London: Routledge & Kegan-Paul.
     * Psillos, Stathis, 1999. Scientific Realism: How Science Tracks
       Truth, London: Routledge.
     * Putnam, H., 1962. “The Analytic and the Synthetic”, in Feigl and
       Maxwell 1962, pp. 350–97.
     * Quine, W.V.O., 1953. “Two Dogmas of Empiricism”, in From a Logical
       Point of View, Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, pp. 20–46.
     * Roemer, J., 1981. Analytical Foundations of Marxian Economic
       Theory, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press.
     * –––, 1982. A General Theory of Exploitation and Class, Cambridge,
       MA: Harvard University Press.
     * Roncaglia, A., 1978. Sraffa and the Theory of Prices, Chicester:
       John Wiley.
     * Smith, V.L., 1991. Papers in Experimental Economics, Cambridge,
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Sneed, J., 1971. The Logical Structure of Mathematical Physics,
       Dordrecht: Reidel.
     * Spirtes, P., C. Glymour, and R. Scheines, 2001. Causation,
       Prediction and Search, 2nd edition, Cambridge, MA: MIT Press.
     * Sraffa, P., 1960. Production of Commodities by Means of
       Commodities: Prelude to a Critique of Economic Theory, Cambridge:
       Cambridge University Press.
     * Stegmueller, W., 1976. The Structure and Dynamics of Theories,
       William Wohlhueter (trans.), New York: Springer-Verlag.
     * –––, 1979. The Structuralist View of Theories, New York:
       Springer-Verlag.
     * Stegmueller, W., W. Balzer, and W. Spohn (eds.), 1982. Philosophy
       of Economics (Proceedings, Munich, July 1981), New York:
       Springer-Verlag.
     * Swedberg, R., 2014. The Art of Social Theory, Princeton: Princeton
       University Press.
     * Tuomela, R., 2016. Social Ontology: Collective Intentionality and
       Group Agents, Oxford: Oxford University Press.
     * Van Fraassen, B., 1980. The Scientific Image, Oxford: Oxford
       University Press.
     * Von Wright, G.H., 1971. Explanation and Understanding, Ithaca:
       Cornell University Press.
     * Watkins, J., 1984. Science and Scepticism, Princeton: Princeton
       University Press.
     * Weisberg, Michael, 2007. “Who Is a Modeler?” British Journal for
       the Philosophy of Science, 58: 207–233.
     * Williams, B., 1981. “Internal and External Reasons” in Moral Luck,
       Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, pp. 101–113.
     * Williamson, O., 1985. The Economic Institutions of Capitalism:
       Firms, Markets, Relational Contracting, New York: Free Press.
     * Winch, P., 1958. The Idea of a Social Science, London: Routledge.
     * Woodward, James, 2003. Making Things Happen, New York: Oxford
       University Press.
     * Worrall, J., 2007. “Why There’s No Cause to Randomize”, The British
       Journal for the Philosophy of Science, 58(3): 451–488.

Academic Tools

   sep man icon How to cite this entry.
   sep man icon Preview the PDF version of this entry at the Friends of
   the SEP Society.
   inpho icon Look up topics and thinkers related to this entry at the
   Internet Philosophy Ontology Project (InPhO).
   phil papers icon Enhanced bibliography for this entry at PhilPapers,
   with links to its database.

Other Internet Resources

Websites

     * Economics and Philosophy
     * History of Economics Society
     * Hoover Chair in Economic and Social Ethics

Blogs

   There are now a large number of blogs by prominent economists. Though
   not predominantly concerned with methodology and typically not
   exclusively concerned with economics, these blogs show economists
   arguing with one another, responding to current events, and formulating
   and reformulating their views. The following are of particular
   interest, but there are many more:
     * Brad DeLong Grasping Reality with Both Invisible Hands: Fair,
       Balanced, and Reality-Based: A Semi-Daily Journal
     * Paul Krugman, The Conscience of a Liberal
     * Marginal Revolution: Small Steps Toward a Much Better World (Tyler
       Cowen and Alex Tabbarok)
     * Mainly Macro: Comment on Macroeconomic Issues (Simon Wren-Lewis)
     * The Grumpy Economist (John Cochrane’s Blog)
     * Dani Rodrik’s Weblog: Unconventional thoughts on economic
       development and globalization
     * Beat the Press (Dean Baker)

Related Entries

   action | Bayes’ Theorem | economics [normative] and economic justice |
   epistemology: Bayesian | folk psychology: as a theory | game theory |
   game theory: and ethics | game theory: evolutionary | Hume, David |
   individualism, methodological | intentionality | Kuhn, Thomas |
   Lakatos, Imre | laws of nature: ceteris paribus | Mill, John Stuart |
   Popper, Karl | preferences | reasons for action: justification,
   motivation, explanation | risk | scientific explanation | scientific
   realism | Smith, Adam: moral and political philosophy | social choice
   theory | socialism | well-being

   Copyright © 2018 by
   Daniel M. Hausman <dhausman@cplb.rutgers.edu>
   Open access to the SEP is made possible by a world-wide funding
   initiative.
   The Encyclopedia Now Needs Your Support
   Please Read How You Can Help Keep the Encyclopedia Free

Browse

     * Table of Contents
     * What's New
     * Random Entry
     * Chronological
     * Archives

About

     * Editorial Information
     * About the SEP
     * Editorial Board
     * How to Cite the SEP
     * Special Characters
     * Advanced Tools
     * Accessibility
     * Contact

Support SEP

     * Support the SEP
     * PDFs for SEP Friends
     * Make a Donation
     * SEPIA for Libraries

Mirror Sites

   View this site from another server:
   USA (Main Site) Philosophy, Stanford University
     * Info about mirror sites

   The Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy is copyright © 2024 by The
   Metaphysics Research Lab, Department of Philosophy, Stanford University

   Library of Congress Catalog Data: ISSN 1095-5054
